Authors
Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Number of Reviews
80

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Warner Bros. on March 31, 2000; certificate 15; 170 
minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Oliver Stone; produced by Lauren Shuler Donner, Dan Halsted, 
Clayton Townsend.
Written by John Logan, Daniel Pyne, Oliver Stone.
Photographed by Salvatore Totino; edited by Stuart Levy, Thomas J. Nordberg, 
Keith Salmon, Stuart Waks.
"Any Given Sunday" is a dramatic immersion in the world of American Football, 
looking further than commentators and managers, and jumping right in there 
with the guys in the huddle. The film gives us its view on the current state 
of the game, with character studies of both players and executives, but also 
reminds us of the intense physical experience of playing. For true sportsmen, 
that's the real thrill; for a lot of people in this movie, it's just 
something that they must go through in order to get big pay cheques.
At the heart of the movie's narrative are scenes showing pitch action from a 
first-hand point of view. If sometimes they seem irrelevant or confusing -- 
well, that's the point; players often look at their games in the same light. 
Some reviews have accused the moments of being unnecessary stylistic excess, 
but that's just because many journalists feel obliged to make unfounded 
attacks on the director, Oliver Stone, a man who does not avoid using bold 
techniques to tell his stories.
This time he follows a season in the life of the Miami Sharks, an American 
Football team coached by Tony D'Amato (Al Pacino). Tony has lost a few games 
in a row, and his old-school patience for things to get better is not shared 
by today's press, who savage him whenever he puts a foot wrong. The new owner 
of the Sharks, Christine Pagniacci (Cameron Diaz), is just as hasty, and 
demands an immediate solution to her squad's poor performance.
A young hotshot quarterback called Willie Beamen (Jamie Foxx) could be the 
answer, because he has made some great plays in a few successive games, and 
looks slick on magazine covers. Tony is cautious, though; he senses that 
Beamen's ego could be dangerous, and the lad would not be a wise replacement 
for 39-year old star performer Jack "Cap" Rooney (Dennis Quaid).
Egos are a big influence on all this, because professional sport is a 
business built around the talents of temperamental athletes. Disagreements 
over management strategy also play a big part, because it's a business full 
stop. And it's an atmosphere where ethical standards are hard to keep up -- 
one of the doctors in "Any Given Sunday" feels it's his duty to allow players 
to go on the field when injured, even at risk of death, because "for these 
guys football IS life!"
We're so used to thinking of everything as corrupt in this day and age that 
none of the above is particularly surprising. It's impressive, though, that 
Stone has managed to cover so many areas and get such a convincing overview 
of a sport. My only complaint is that the structure could have been tightened 
into something more urgent. Stone's best films -- "Platoon", "Talk Radio", 
"Born on the Fourth of July", "JFK" -- sweep us off our feet with angry gusto 
and big emotional payoffs. "Any Given Sunday" is content to document, observe 
and convey. While it does all these things well, a little more passion would 
not have gone amiss.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for High Fidelity (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on July 21, 2000; certificate 
15; 120 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Stephen Frears; produced by Tim Bevan, Rudd Simmons.
Written by John Cusack, D.V. DeVincentis, Steve Pink, Scott Rosenberg; based 
on the novel by Nick Hornby.
Photographed by Seamus McGarvey; edited by Mick Audsley.
"He's in love with rock 'n' roll, whoa... he's in love with gettin' stoned, 
whoa... he's in love with Janie Jones, whoa... he don't like his boring job, 
no!"
It's unsurprising that the song containing those lyrics is on one of Rob's 
Top Five Lists. Rob drinks and smokes too much, listens to too much loud 
music, obsesses over too many women, and isn't exactly going places 
career-wise. This hardly makes him original, but he's easy to identify with.
"High Fidelity" is his story -- that of a pop fan-boy constantly making 
lists, rearranging LPs and thinking of love songs that relate to his own 
romantic misadventures. "Never mind what people ARE like, what DO they like?" 
he philosophises at one point. "Books, movies, music... these things matter." 
He runs a big but only moderately successful store called Championship Vinyl, 
and employs two guys called Dick (Todd Louiso) and Barry (Jack Black), who he 
has nicknamed "the musical moron twins". Dick is a shy kid whose main act of 
friendship is copying tapes. Barry is one of those know-alls who rams his 
taste down other guys' throats -- which is annoying most of the time, but 
also great for business, when he intimidates guys into buying stacks of 
albums they can barely carry. "What do you mean, you don't have 'Blonde on 
Blonde'??" he asks one man, making him feel guilty enough to empty his wallet 
and rebuild his collection.
This is a film about shift work, beer, being hung over on a Monday morning, 
listening to good tunes, and dating. In the opening scene, Rob's girlfriend 
Laura (Iben Hjejle) is leaving him for the hippie who used to live next door, 
which sets off the movie's tone of romantic longing, reminiscing and 
scheming. There is a plot of sorts -- involving Rob's attempts to reunite 
with Laura, and his visiting of old girlfriends in a goofy attempt to achieve 
catharsis with the past -- but "High Fidelity" is not a complicated story, 
and exists for Rob's musings about relationships, his lists of Top Five Worst 
Breakups, his silly ways of dealing with heartache. The style of the 
narration is inspired by another single man's cinema classic, the Michael 
Caine vehicle "Alfie" (1966), as the protagonist looks straight into the 
camera to address the audience directly. It's a good device because it's 
intimate, informal and quirky, and announces that this is a frank and 
unconventional picture, uncluttered by the usual dumb distractions of 
romantic comedies, like mistaken identities and aggravated misunderstandings.
Everything is handled so well that we almost forget how badly it could have 
been done. Rob has a heart-to-heart with Laura's best friend, and she doesn't 
offer the embarrassing pseudo-psychoanalysis that would be spoken in such 
typical Hollywood flicks as "Hanging Up". She lays things out in real terms: 
"There's two of them, there's one of you, and you're all in this mess 
together -- so sort it out."  Later, when Rob lists the worst screw-ups he's 
perpetrated against Laura, he is able to explain away some of them, but not 
all, and that rings of absolute truth. Women generally think men are 
insensitive pigs, men generally think women are nagging, hypocritical and 
paranoid -- the actuality lies somewhere in between, and "High Fidelity" is 
brilliant at presenting that middle ground. Its ending is similarly realistic 
-- Rob and Laura get back together, and Rob's explanation is not an entirely 
convincing piece of resolution... but don't we all make weird decisions, 
settle into realities that may not be permanent, and justify situations to 
ourselves instead of weighing them up?
Cusack, my favourite actor, is perhaps the only man who could have played 
Rob. His boyish wide eyes and sardonic tone of voice have more of the 
required bittersweet aura than anyone I can picture. The "High Fidelity" 
screenwriting team were also behind "Grosse Pointe Blank", one of the best 
films of 1997, and Stephen Frears, who directed the picture, is a great 
filmmaker whose credits include "Dangerous Liaisons", "The Snapper" and 
"Prick Up Your Ears". Yet so many danger signals suggested that this was 
going to be a disaster. It's based on a wonderful novel -- those usually 
translate into lousy movies. It's an American adaptation of an English story, 
which usually results in examples of bland ineptitude like "Thomas and the 
Magic Railroad". Also, its blunt world view and obsession with pop culture 
would have easily allowed it to become another obnoxiously hip and cynical 
rip-off of "Scream" or "Pulp Fiction".
All of those pitfalls have been avoided. This is a wonderful movie about real 
people, real problems and real fixations, that beautifully captures the 
texture of alternative culture. It will probably be a modest box-office 
success, then a huge cult hit on video, where it will be embraced by vinyl 
junkies, comic book fans, wearers of leather jackets, people who know the 70s 
were the best decade for American movies, tattoo and body piercing 
aficionados, twentysomethings who still have their "Star Wars" toys and 
everyone who loves the Krazy House club on Wood Street. I saw it on the first 
day of summer, and could really feel the sun come out.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Saving Grace (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Fox on May 19, 2000; certificate 15; 93 minutes; 
country of origin UK; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Nigel Cole; produced by Mark Crowdy.
Written by Mark Crowdy, Craig Ferguson; from a story by Mark Crowdy.
Photographed by John de Borman; edited by Alan Strachan.
There have been a lot of small British movies opening in cinemas over the 
past two years, thanks to industry aid from National Lottery funding. Most of 
them have been made by bad filmmakers with insufficient budgets. And they've 
been comedies -- which is the hardest genre to get right, and the most 
embarrassing to fail at.
It was therefore with a sense of dread that I entered "Saving Grace", yet 
another quirky little Britcom. While it has not been paid for by the Lottery, 
its financier is Sky Pictures, the television company that ran an ad campaign 
not long ago to boast about getting exclusive rights to "What Rats Won't Do" 
and "Gargantua". Things did not look promising.
You can feel the "but" coming on, can't you? Well, as I said, things did not 
look promising... but "Saving Grace" is actually a sweet, good-natured little 
comedy with strong performances and humour that emerges naturally from a 
story taken seriously. Funny, how things turn out.
As the film opens, we see Grace Trevethan (Brenda Blethyn) in her Cornish 
mansion, preparing for the funeral of her husband. Soon she discovers that 
the late gent has left her with a killer mortgage and other assorted debts 
that total almost half a million pounds. As she has never worked, lives in a 
tiny village and is a middle-aged female, her options on how to raise the 
money are limited to say the least. What can she do?
The one thing Grace does have a knack for is gardening, and when times get so 
desperate that the bank is on the phone non-stop and debt collectors and 
surveyors are constantly knocking on the door, she decides to make a risky 
proposition to her doobie-smoking groundskeeper Matthew (Craig Ferguson): How 
about the two of them use hydroponics to rapidly grow a huge crop of 
marijuana, then sell it in London, and put an end to their money problems?
Word spreads about the plan; nobody has conversations about it, but everyone 
in town comes to know what Grace and Craig are up to, and when their 
greenhouse lights go on full blast every night, the men in the pub all put 
their sunglasses on and let out a supportive cheer. There's a cute 
conspiratorial attitude in the air -- my colleague Harvey Karten, in 
reviewing "Saving Grace", made an interesting and appropriate comparison to 
last year's "Waking Ned".
In a way, "Saving Grace" is better than that movie, because its characters 
aren't so artificially 'colourful'; they're ordinary people, reacting in 
amusing ways to a mischievous situation. Any moments with the potential to be 
dreadful gags are turned into wonderful comic set-pieces by the director, 
Nigel Cole, who makes sure everything serves the story, and knows that even 
the silliest humour must seem genuine to get laughs. One scene late on in his 
movie -- in which two old ladies mistake Grace's plants for tea, drink it, 
and then get the giggles and munchies at work -- is hash humour every bit as 
funny as anything Cheech and Chong ever gave us. Far out, madam.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Topsy-Turvy (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Pathe on February 18, 2000; certificate 12; 160 
minutes; country of origin UK; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Mike Leigh; produced by Simon Channing-Williams.
Written by Mike Leigh.
Photographed by Dick Pope; edited by Robin Sales.
CAST.....
Jim Broadbent..... William Schwenk Gilbert
Allan Corduner..... Arthur Sullivan
Lesley Manville..... Lucy Gilbert
Ron Cook..... Richard D'Oyly Carte
Timothy Spall..... Richard Temple
Wendy Nottingham..... Helen Lenoir
Kevin McKidd..... Durward Lely
Martin Savage..... George Grossmith
Shirley Henderson..... Leonora Braham
Alison Steadman..... Madame Leon
"Topsy-Turvy", for at least its first hour, is fragmented, unfocused and 
incredibly boring. When it finally settles down to actually following some 
semblance of a story, it gives us some wonderfully witty and perceptive 
moments about the putting on of a theatrical production -- but getting there 
is no mean feat. Watching the movie is like an endurance test to see how 
prepared we are to remain in the cinema, and only after a long while do we 
pass and get rewarded.
The film takes place in London in the late 19th Century, where the team 
behind some of the most successful stage musicals of all time, WS Gilbert 
(Jim Broadbent) and Arthur Sullivan (Allan Corduner), have just released 
"Princess Ida". The show is an international flop, due to sweltering weather 
and reviews that accuse Gilbert and Sullivan of repetitiveness. Sullivan 
agrees with the criticisms, and decides he cannot keep going on writing the 
same material. The partnership seems in jeopardy.
Much is made of this plot point in the early sections of "Topsy-Turvy", and 
yet it does not lead to anything else. Gilbert and Sullivan start to work 
together on "The Mikado" halfway through the film without Sullivan having to 
be won over. There's more: Actors, producers, musicians, friends, relatives 
and business partners are introduced, and then abandoned; some until the end 
of the film, some completely. Several of the main characters are shown to 
have grave weaknesses such as joyless marriages, problems with drugs and 
alcohol, ill health... but none of these things relate to the rest the story.
It's a confusing mishmash of irrelevance, not least because Mike Leigh, the 
writer and director, feels the need to jump in and out of hundreds of 
different locations without ever exploring them. He's never had to explore 
before, since all his previous films have been gritty dramas set in easily 
recognisable modern-day situations; but he does here, because the densely 
cluttered interiors of Victorian London are alien to most of us, and we need 
to get our bearings.
That is easy to do once rehearsals for "The Mikado" begin, because then 
"Topsy-Turvy" spends most of its time in one place -- the theatre. It is 
immensely satisfying to watch songs and dance routines develop, and see 
actors master their lines. Leigh knows this, and allows entire musical 
numbers to act as the payoffs to a lot of his scenes.
As someone who has both directed an independent film and starred in several 
school plays, I also enjoyed "Topsy-Turvy" for its entirely accurate 
depictions of the difficulties that arise when doing such things. Technical 
problems are a mere trifle when actors are making ridiculous complaints about 
their costumes, or not paying attention to directions and testing their own 
terrible ideas on how to play their roles. The picture's best moment comes 
when one of the "Mikado" players suddenly develops another accent, and 
Gilbert stops the rehearsal to say in shocked disbelief: "You've become a 
Cockney!"
It doesn't sound very funny, I know, but the humour is in Broadbent's timing. 
"Topsy-Turvy" features a lot of excellent performances; costume dramas bring 
something miraculous out of British actors -- they're put into different 
worlds, and so the only way to be convincing is to completely inhabit their 
roles. Nobody here does that better than Broadbent, whose eyes are always 
busy, whose mouth is always muttering something to itself -- he really does 
seem to be thinking Gilbert's thoughts.
Rethinking all the film's good qualities, though, leaves me even more 
perplexed at what on earth was going on during its first hour, which is a 
pointless, dreary waste of time made even worse by the fact that my watch was 
broken. Perhaps the projectionist got the reels in the wrong order. 
Topsy-turvy indeed.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Stuart Little (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Columbia TriStar on July 21, 2000; certificate U; 92 
minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Rob Minkoff; produced by Douglas Wick.
Written by Greg Brooker, M. Night Shyamalan.
Photographed by Guillermo Navarro; edited by Tom Finan.
Ever get the feeling that the whole world's gone mad, or is failing to 
recognise obvious weirdness? I did, during a pitch-black screening of the 
horrible new film "Stuart Little", where I was surrounded by kids sighing 
"Aaah... so cute!" at the screen, despite the fact that it was displaying a 
warped mockery of family entertainment. "Stuart Little" is about a family 
that adopt a talking mouse. Dad (Hugh Laurie) and mom (Geena Davis) go to an 
orphanage, look at all the kids playing, say to each other "How can we 
possibly choose? They're all so wonderful!", and then decide to go for the 
mutated little creature on the floor.
Stuart is voiced by Michael J. Fox, one of the most loveable of actors, but 
the only emotion I felt for the character was disgust. A few weeks ago I 
complained that the poultry in "Chicken Run" displayed implausibly human 
traits; that was nothing compared to "Stuart Little", in which everyone 
pretends that this grotesque rodent IS human. "Play with your new brother!" 
Laurie and Davis tell their biological son (Jonathan Lipnicki). At one point 
there is a family get-together, and nobody points out how odd the situation 
is. They all just say "You look wonderful together!"  I held out hope for the 
voice of reason when Lipnicki shouted "Are you people all crazy? That's not 
my brother! That's a mouse!"  But soon the boy is doting on Stuart just like 
everyone else, and they're best pals. Aaah.
Understand that this is not a comedy, a put-on, or a fantasy. It presents its 
situation as normal and plausible. It wants to be poignant. There is 
sentimental piano music playing throughout. Nobody ever seems surprised that 
they're seeing a talking mouse, or that it's being raised by humans. And even 
though the Little family are a bunch of freaks with glazed eyes, sickening 
grins and dopey voices, with archaic clothes that look like "Father Knows 
Best" hand-me-downs, the actors play them just seriously enough to dispel any 
hope that the movie could be intended as goofiness or satire.
It's an unbelievably sick and appalling picture. Even if we accepted the 
premise, which we'd have to be crazy to do, it would be hard to stomach the 
content, which does not involve a story arc or dramatic conflict, but 
basically consists of everyone marvelling at Stuart whenever he does little 
mousy tricks, and telling him how great he is. Before writing my reviews I 
usually sit and scribble down my thoughts in shorthand. Almost all of my 
notes for "Stuart Little" end with exclamation marks. It is a stroke of 
remarkable good fortune that they aren't stained with dribbles of vomit. 
Apparently, the book the film is based on had the Davis character GIVING 
BIRTH to a mouse. Thank God we were at least spared that.
The premise could have made amusing kiddie fare if it had been a deliberately 
bizarre screwball farce, with human characters pushed into the background and 
the focus on the interaction of the animals. To see what I mean, look at the 
amusing scenes featuring Nathan Lane as the family cat. When Stuart asks him 
"Shall I rub your tummy?", he replies "How would you like to rub it from the 
inside, mouse boy?"  The conversation progresses, and Lane sighs to himself 
"I can't believe I'm arguing with lunch!"
I smile when I recall that moment, but my face turns sour upon remembering 
anything else about this disaster. How interesting that this week there are 
only two movies opening ("Stuart Little" and "High Fidelity"), one of them 
among the best films I've seen, and one among the worst.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Columbia TriStar on July 14, 2000; certificate 15; 157 
minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Roland Emmerich; produced by Mark Gordon, Gary Levinsohn.
Written by Robert Rodat.
Photographed by Caleb Deschanel; edited by David Brenner.
CAST.....
Mel Gibson..... Benjamin Martin
Heath Ledger..... Gabriel Martin
Jason Isaacs..... Colonel William Tavington
Joely Richardson..... Charlotte Selton
Chris Cooper..... Colonel Harry Burwell
Tom Wilkinson..... General Cornwallis
You don't send a boy to do a man's job. Roland Emmerich -- the director of 
such dreadful action films as "Independence Day", and the recent "Godzilla" 
remake -- should not have been assigned an epic about the American 
Revolutionary War. It's nonetheless unsurprising that my opening maxim never 
occurred to anyone involved with "The Patriot". After all, they did approve a 
script in which two small boys are given guns and told to shoot at British 
people in the woods.
The tots are about ten years old, or maybe a little younger. The film's hero, 
played by Mel Gibson, is a widower whose farm is unjustly attacked by 
'Redcoats' (the nickname for the Brits); he's also the one who supplied the 
kids with their weapons, and ordered them to commit murder. After their 
shooting spree, when Gibson is tucking the lads into bed, one of them reports 
"I'm glad I've killed, pop!"
America -- although a film as blindly patriotic as this would never admit it 
-- already has enough gun-crazed maniacs. Their defence for bearing arms is 
that 1) the constitution allows it, and 2) they need to do so for home 
protection. With scenes like the one above, "The Patriot" serves as an 
incitement of those freaks, and also of the pathetic flag-wavers who wear 
stars-and-stripes shorts at street parades and recite "We really do live in 
the land of the free and the home of the brave!" as if paraphrasing a line 
from one's national anthem is the same thing as seriously examining one's 
country.
"The Patriot" is being advertised as the Revolutionary War equivalent of 
Gibson's great Scottish epic "Braveheart", but it's nowhere near as 
entertaining, and does a much more methodical job of demonising the British 
while glamorising a revolt. The narrative essentially consists of Gibson and 
a small band of merry men wandering around the country discussing "the 
cause"; although now and again Gibson meets up with his family, or there will 
be another attack from those horrid Recoats. Of course there is a token black 
character among Gibson's troupe, who gets some racist comments at first, but 
then apologies, so none of the Americans come off looking evil.
When the level of the storytelling becomes apparent, we hold out hope that we 
can at least expect some spectacular sequences of dumb action. But there is 
hardly any fighting until the climax, when comes a highly implausible battle 
scene, with Gibson running through the bloody lines unharmed, carrying the 
American flag. Then he thrusts it into the ground and has a ridiculous clash 
with a British officer (Jason Isaacs), where each man wields two swords in 
each hand, and juts them at each other in time to swashbuckler music chords. 
To picture this, recall the Jim Carrey comedy "Cable Guy", with its parody of 
the famous "Star Trek" fight.
Gibson opens every scene with a flustered, confused expression and then turns 
it into a frown. It's like "Braveheart" going senile but sporadically 
returning to his old self. The dialogue that he and all the other actors have 
to speak varies from horribly stilted ("Men! Richly fight for the cause about 
which you spake!"; "Father... this yonder boy be two years younger than I!") 
to nonsensical ("I'm a parent, I don't have the luxury of principles") to 
lazy and pedestrian ("Daddy, daddy, come back!"). And there are scenes of 
ineptitude, such as when Gibson's platoon creep up behind a British ship, and 
then Emmerich cuts to a wide shot to show the boat blow up. How the hell did 
that happen? Did they throw a hand grenade? Where did they find one of those, 
being in the 1770s an' all?
Like "U-571", another dreadful recent war movie, "The Patriot" has drawn fire 
for its reworking of history. The real-life figure Gibson's character is 
based on was known for shooting civilians for sport, and raping his slaves 
(in the film, he doesn't even keep slaves; the Negroes working his land are 
free men). And William Tavington, the English colonel who the screenplay pits 
him against, did not murder children or use any unorthodox tactics. Even if 
you don't care about the facts, "The Patriot" is incompetent and 
disappointing. I dragged a buddy to the screening with me, and felt compelled 
to apologise both during and after. I think I'll ring him again right now.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Wonderland (1999/I)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by UIP on January 28, 2000; certificate 15; 109 minutes; 
country of origin UK; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Michael Winterbottom; produced by Michelle Camarda.
Written by Laurence Cordiat.
Photographed by Sean Bobbitt; edited by Trevor Waite.
There is a school of thought that believes striving for reality in art is not 
a worthwhile pursuit. I've never understood why; we live in reality, we 
connect with it, it's exciting. Think of all the types of situations you find 
yourself in every week -- there'll always be some forms of happiness, 
sadness, expectation, disappointment, serenity, tumult, calm and anger. Life, 
to use a horrible cliché, dear friends, is an emotional roller coaster!
"Wonderland" is glorious proof of that, a film of scruffy beauty and 
spellbinding power, which seems constructed to capture the appeal of 
eavesdropping. That pastime is involving, of course, because of our 
instinctive fascination with humanity; this movie uses the same hook, diving 
into the lives of several Londoners, all of whom are connected by family 
ties, but are at different stages of their lives and have different 
occupations.
Nadia (Gina McKee) is an attractive but lonely waitress, who places a lot of 
personal ads but allows herself to get upset every time she goes on a date. 
One of her sisters, Molly (Molly Parker), is married and pregnant; the other, 
Debbie (Shirley Henderson), is raising her son alone. Their parents are 
Eileen (Kika Markham) and Bill (Jack Shepherd), two pathetically unhappy 
people who mope around the house, and occasionally cringe; because of barking 
dogs, broken appliances, boredom or simple fear of leaving the house.
We also meet up with partners and ex-partners, friends, acquaintances, 
neighbours, estranged relatives, colleagues... "Wonderland" never announces 
itself as a definite study of anything in particular, which gives it the 
freedom to roam around, to spy on whomever's interesting.
The director, Michael Winterbottom, shoots everything in a grainy, hand-held, 
almost camcorder style which makes events seem imparted to us from the inside 
out, rather than staged and shot. It's as if invisible camera crews had been 
ceaselessly exploring London. It's essential to the sense that we're watching 
real people who aren't aware of our presence.
This could have come across as solemn and grimy, like any of those pathetic 
TV documentaries that follow losers around their places of work and play. But 
in between the quiet, sober scenes are astounding sequences where the camera 
submerges in neon light, the editing plays around with cutting and speed, and 
Michael Nyman's grand score soars on the soundtrack. The whole movie uses 
London as a backdrop, letting us unconsciously absorb it; these grand musical 
moments explicitly rejoice in the city's strange beauty, and announce that 
the film is not scrutinising life, but gazing at it in wonderment.
So music is an important tone-setter in "Wonderland" -- but it's always kept 
for these side-moments, and never interferes with the drama. Scenes do not 
follow typical Hollywood constructions; there isn't a little climax every 
five minutes, characters don't subtly recap their situations to each other to 
let the audience know what's going on. Everything plays out at a realistic 
pace, and we get our bearings by picking up on mood, tone, emotions. 
Winterbottom, his actors, and even his extras, have a knack for capturing the 
way conversational rhythms actually do sound -- in homes, hairdressers' shops 
and pubs; on dates, the phone, and everywhere else the story goes.
And that is why this beautiful film has been made. It is a devoted record of 
modern human behaviour. I dreaded that there would be some hugely 
inappropriate surprise plot development near the ending, but no -- 
Winterbottom and screenwriter Laurence Cordiat know that most of us don't end 
a typical weekend by stumbling into life-changing experiences. "Wonderland" 
is such an acute observance of people that it makes us confront our essential 
feelings about our fellow man. And to any foreigners out there, wondering 
what it's like to be in Britain -- just take a look at this movie.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, The UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Bachelor, The (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Entertainment Distribution on February 18, 2000; 
certificate 12; 102 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Gary Sinyor; produced by Bing Howenstein, Lloyd Segan.
Written by Steve Cohen.
Photographed by Simon Archer; edited by Robert M Reitano.
Deadlines should almost always be important in thrillers, and never in 
comedies. Yet screenwriters insist on letting all kinds of plots depend on 
them; not to provide suspense, because we know Hollywood heroes always get 
wherever they need to be in the nick of time. Nor to show how the characters 
react to the pressure, because it's usually just an excuse for gags. Only, I 
guess, because it's what they were told to do in screenwriting class.
"The Bachelor" is an excellent example, a film with a lot of good ideas that 
never sits still long enough for any of them to work. It should be a romantic 
comedy about a young man learning the value of true love, but wastes a lot of 
time showing him running around trying to beat the clock. He is Jimmie 
Shannon, the manager of a successful pool-table factory, who is in love with 
the perks of being affluent, youthful and unmarried.
But Jimmie (Chris O'Donnell) is getting anxious that he may have to give up 
this lifestyle. Now that almost all of his friends are married, and he's been 
dating the lovely Anne (Renne Zellweger) for three whole years, it occurs to 
him that she expects him to follow suit. He tries to pop the question, but 
obviously his heart's not in it, and Anne becomes so offended that she gets 
on the first train out of town for time alone with her understanding sister.
Then Jimmie discovers that his recently deceased grandfather (Peter Ustinov) 
has bequeathed $100million to him on the condition that he gets married by 
six o'clock on his thirtieth birthday. Wouldn't you know it, this news 
arrives on the day before, so it's a race against time for Jimmie's friends 
and lawyers to find Anne. In case they don't, Jimmie must seek out all his 
other ex-girlfriends to see if any of them are prepared to be his bride.
As he takes this wild journey through his past, which doesn't produce any 
favourable results, Jimmie of course comes to appreciate how much Anne really 
means to him. I wish it could mean something to the audience, but in a huge 
storytelling blunder, the couple's three-year history is spent entirely 
off-screen. Thus, we've only ever seen them when they've been fighting or 
awkward with one another, and we have no idea if we like them enough to want 
them to be united. O'Donnell and Zellweger are both attractive performers -- 
why aren't we allowed to find out whether or not they have any chemistry 
together?
Probably because the filmmakers have no confidence in any of their material, 
and perpetrate disastrous attempts to spice it up. The awkward climax 
features hundreds of people in expensive set-pieces, but isn't at all 
exciting or funny. Special guest stars such as Brooke Shields, Mariah Carey 
and Jennifer Esposito have been brought in to play the ex-girlfriends, but 
their presence is distracting. Even the beginning of the movie, which 
features a narration of potentially witty observations about bachelorhood, is 
ruined by a stupid special-effects accompaniment. Matters are not helped by 
O'Donnell speaking in a deliberately goofy manner to underline the fact this 
is a comedy.
It is Ustinov, though, who gives a really embarrassing performance, as a man 
with unexplained oddities of body language and speech. Hal Holbrook is pretty 
dreadful too, drifting in and out of an Irish accent, and chain-smoking 
cigars with the amateurish trepidation of a kid taking his first drag.
Aside from that, "The Bachelor" is an easy-to-watch film that held my 
attention. The soundtrack is wonderful, the structure is clear, the people 
and places look good. But all the way through I kept thinking that it could 
have been better, and wishing it would stop getting side-tracked by gimmicks. 
I must track down "Seven Chances", the Buster Keaton film it was inspired by. 
It was made in the 1920s, when they knew how to tell a story 
straightforwardly.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Room for Romeo Brass, A (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by Alliance Atlantis on February 4, 2000; certificate 15; 
90 minutes; countries of origin Canada/UK; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Shane Meadows; produced by George Faber, Charles Pattinson.
Written by Paul Fraser, Shane Meadows.
Photographed by Ashley Rowe; edited by Paul Tothill.
"A Room for Romeo Brass" is alternately a tender suburban comedy and a harsh 
cautionary tale about a violent psychopath. Yes, that is as weird as it 
sounds. On my way out of the screening, I glanced over a synopsis which 
described the movie as a "tender coming-of-age tale". Thank goodness that's 
an inaccurate description -- if coming-of-age were as unsettling as this 
movie, most people would commit suicide before getting out of high school.
The movie takes place in Nottingham, where we meet two schoolchildren, Romeo 
(Andrew Shim) and Gavin (Ben Marhsall). The two exchange playful insults, but 
are close, really, spending every day together and depending on each other's 
moral support to get through their hardships: Romeo has been abandoned by his 
father, except for occasional visits which provoke huge family rows; Gavin is 
awaiting a serious back operation.
Early in the story, the boys are involved in a fight with two older lads, 
which is broken up by the quaint Morell (Paddy Considine), a scruffy chap who 
tells odd stories and seems somewhat clueless as to how most people behave. 
When dropping Romeo home, he meets the lad's sister Ladine (Vicky McClure), 
is instantly attracted to her and proceeds to pester her for a date.
Feeling sorry for this social misfit, Ladine eventually agrees, which is a 
mistake, as it makes him a permanent fixture around the neighbourhood. He 
befriends Romeo, but secretly obsesses over Ladine and threatens Gavin's 
family, in sinister scenes which reveal Morell to be an angry, disturbed 
individual. But at times his phoney accent, conversational tangents and 
shifty body language are presented as comic. I wouldn't have minded if the 
film had started in this vain and then gradually become serious, but even 
after the introduction of danger, the film still feels able to dart in and 
out of tomfoolery.
At first this is embarrassing; it goes on long enough to be repellent. Things 
get confusing, too, in terms of the characters' interaction with each other. 
We never see Romeo and Gavin fall out, for example, but halfway through the 
movie they suddenly start avoiding each other, then start speaking awkwardly, 
and finally become mates again. Eh?
Each scene is involving in itself, whether funny, creepy, or whatever, but 
the movie as a put-together whole doesn't go anywhere or make a whole lot of 
sense. Is there a point to this juxtaposition of dark terror and light 
humour? The director is Shane Meadows, whose feature debut was the excellent 
"TwentyFourSeven" (1998), a straightforward, moving story of a boxing 
instructor helping the kids in his area stay on the straight and narrow. 
We'll have to take "A Room for Romeo Brass" as a case of the Sophomore Slump 
-- the jinx that often affects directors of terrific first films, making 
their second ones muddled and odd.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on April 7, 2000; certificate 
15; 145 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Norman Jewison; produced by Armyan Bernstein, Norman Jewison, 
John Ketcham.
Written by Armyan Bernstein, Dan Gordon; based on the books "The 16th Round" 
by Rubin 'Hurricane' Carter and "Lazarus and the Hurricane" by Sam Chaiton, 
Terry Swinton.
Photographed by Roger Deakins; edited by Stephen Rivkin.
We all have talents that mystify other people -- some folks can work complex 
equations in their heads, others can run for miles without getting short of 
breath, and we all know some show-off who can cartwheel like there's no 
tomorrow. I can't do any of that stuff, but I do know Bob Dylan's 
eight-minute ballad "Hurricane" off by heart. Impressive, eh?
The song is the first track on Dylan's 1975 album "Desire", and tells the 
story of Rubin 'Hurricane' Carter, a black middleweight boxer from New Jersey 
who angered intolerant locals with his cocky handling of success. In 1966, 
when the authorities saw a chance to frame him for murder, they jumped at it. 
"How can the life of such a man be in the palm of some fool's hand?" Dylan 
asked, and for quite some time Ellen Burstyn, Muhammad Ali and a whole host 
of other celebrities and activists were equally concerned.
Despite his status as a cause célčbre, though, it took twenty years for 
Carter and his co-defendant to be released from prison. When they were, 
according to Norman Jewison's film "The Hurricane", it was largely due to the 
efforts of a commune of Canadians and a young boy they were schooling. The 
kid, Lesra Martin (Viscellous Reon Shannon), had bought Carter's 
autobiography for twenty-five cents at a used book sale. This event changed 
the course of both his life and that of the fighter.
Carter (Denzel Washington), as Lesra discovers from his reading and we learn 
in the film, had an upbringing heavily influenced by racial persecution, and 
vowed to make weapons out of his body and mind. In prison, his shell grows 
harder, and he becomes a vessel of mistrust and hate. "There's no more Rubin 
Carter," he says in his book. To his wife: "I'm dead. Move on. Bury me."
Somehow Lesra is able to strike up a correspondence with him; he DOES feel 
alive when he's writing, because he doesn't have to look at the dehumanising 
prison walls. The communication develops into friendship and love, and 
results in the boy and his surrogate family dedicating their lives to 
Carter's appeal. One of the most involving things about "The Hurricane" is 
how it demonstrates the power of the written word -- showing that it can free 
souls, stimulate emotions and overcome violence and evil. Another is its 
portrayal of how Rubin, who had so thoroughly trained himself to use hatred 
as a means of survival, earned liberation by having the courage to feel love 
and trust.
This is fantastic material -- the kind of thing we're talking about when we 
refer to "triumphs of the human spirit". It's regrettable that Jewison has 
not presented it with more panache. Gone is the powerful staccato rhythm of 
Dylan, and instead we get such ludicrous dialogue as "You're going down, 
punk!" and "Jeez... you're having a smoke for breakfast?" There are tears, 
speeches behind bars and far too much sentimental scoring. Dan Hedaya gives a 
ludicrous performance as a corrupt cop who lurks in corners grimacing and 
growling.
The movie is made with such lack of edge that at times it runs the risk of 
alienating us, like a made-for-TV weepie. But the story somehow survives, and 
remains potent, and that is a testament to how great a tale it is. Just as 
'Hurricane' himself championed over oppressive forces, so too does his legend 
transcend a sloppy telling, and remain one worth knowing.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Up at the Villa (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on April 14, 2000; certificate 12; 105 minutes; 
countries of origin USA/UK; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Philip Haas; produced by David Brown, Geoff Stier.
Written by Belinda Haas; based on the novella by W. Somerset Maugham.
Photographed by Maurizio Calvesi; edited by Belinda Haas.
It was Akira Kurosawa, I think, or perhaps Luis Buńuel, who said that movies 
which tell us everything often have nothing to say. It was one of the great 
directors, anyway, and those guys know what they're talking about. "Up at the 
Villa" feels like it was made to prove the point. If you removed every bit of 
its dialogue that strains to make sure we understand obvious details, the 
film would be half as long. That would be great for the authors, because 
they'd have plenty of free space in which to insert a comprehensible story.
Kristin Scott Thomas stars as Mary Panton, a young English widow staying in 
Florence at the advent of Word War Two. She receives a marriage proposal from 
Sir Edgar Smith (James Fox), a man she does not love, but who could provide 
her with security. This point is emphasised by an American society lady, 
Princess San Fernando (Anne Bancroft), who informs her guests "He has his 
qualities..." while rubbing her fingers together to make clear she's alluding 
to his money.
Of course, EVERY minor point is emphasised in "Up at the Villa". "Surely he 
didn't come all the way here just to dance with you," Princess asks Mary, 
while needlessly adding "He must be wanting to marry you!" We understand what 
the characters are talking about, but the screenplay keeps providing them 
with unnecessary clarifications. My reviews have featured a lot of quotations 
as of late, because sometimes that's the best way to illustrate what a film 
is like. It's absolutely essential here; the dialogue is the key point, 
drawing attention to itself by insulting our intelligence and cluttering 
things up.
There is a love interest for Mary in the movie, a playboy named Roley Flint 
(Sean Penn). He too gets some awkward lines, the most memorable of which are 
spoken at a dinner party. The topic of conversation is electricity shortages. 
"It's because of the munitions factories," says Roley. "They're using up all 
the power." So far, so good. But then: "They're preparing for war. The 
situation in Europe is getting really tense right now. Opposing countries are 
getting ready for armed conflict, and preparing arsenals of weapons."
As the film goes on, Mary finds she needs to turn to Roley for help: After 
she breaks the heart of a young Austrian refugee (Jeremy Davies), the boy 
shoots himself in her bedroom, and Roley is needed to help get rid of the 
corpse. This part of the plot becomes the middle section of the film; it's 
intended, I suppose, to show Mary and Roley getting to know each other. But 
it sidetracks the drama by bogging it down in thriller elements -- the 
characters are closely observed, all right, but as conspirators rather than 
potential lovers. The emotions of the film get confused and lost, and by the 
finale I wasn't sure what had happened. Mary ends up with neither Edgar nor 
Roley, but is this intended as a sad or happy ending, and what made her come 
to her decision?
"Up at the Villa" was written, directed and edited by the husband and wife 
team of Philip and Belinda Haas, who adapted the novella by W. Somerset 
Maugham. It's tempting to say that two people with an intimate psychological 
connection shouldn't work on a film together without some other significant 
creative influence, because they run the risk of making it so personal that 
other people won't understand it. But that's just not true -- think of the 
wonderful movies made by such auteurs as the Coen, Hughes and Marx brothers. 
This is a bland and aimless film. I don't know why and I don't much care.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Fox on February 11, 2000; certificate 15; 118 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Danny Boyle; produced by Andrew Macdonald.
Written by John Hodge; based on the novel by Alex Garland.
Photographed by Darius Khondji; edited by Masahiro Hirakubo.
Danny Boyle is one of the most hyperactive boors in modern cinema, the film 
director equivalent of someone who'd take your arthritic father to a rave, 
forcibly make him dance to the horrible music and claim to be promoting 
social integration between the generations. He takes gritty works of 
literature, which are filled with reality and truth, and shakes them up into 
shallow feature-length pop videos. Obviously he paid attention in film 
school, where they teach you conventional Hollywood structures and cheap 
tricks that please mass audiences; if only he'd realise you're supposed to 
move on after you graduate.
Boyle first trampled on a great book with "Trainspotting" (1996), a 
grotesquely lively romp based on Irvine Welsh's epic study of drug addiction 
in inner-city Scotland. Now the filmmaker, and his team of writer John Hodge 
and producer Andrew Macdonald, have brought us an adaptation of Alex 
Garland's "The Beach", in which Leonardo DiCaprio plays Richard, an American 
backpacker disillusioned by the tacky Westernisation of foreign culture. He 
walks through the cities of Thailand shaking his head at the hustle and 
bustle of yapping market traders, café bars full of people watching 
television, and vulgar drunken tourists.
In his fleapit hotel, the kid is kept awake by the sounds of a crazed 
Scottish pot-head who goes by the pseudonym of Daffy Duck (Robert Carlyle) 
and raves about a perfect beach which has so far been kept secret from these 
ruinous tourist crowds. He takes a liking to Richard, though, and gives him a 
map to this paradise before killing himself.
Richard and his French travelling companions, Étienne (Guillaume Canet) and 
Françoise (Virginie Ledoyen), do eventually get to the place Daffy promised 
them, and settle into the beautiful locale, which is populated by young folks 
just as sick as they are at the state of traditional holiday destinations. 
Their community is rather sophisticated -- everyone has work assignments, 
there are group meetings, huts have been well-built -- and yet more than 
anywhere else these people have been, their island offers them the 
opportunity to absorb parts of the world that haven't been trodden on. One of 
them describes it as a "beach resort for people who can't stand beach 
resorts".
The dream doesn't last, because inevitably people do find out about the 
place, and try to come. This invokes the violent anger of the dope farmers on 
the other side of the island -- an added devastation to the lives of our 
beach-dwelling friends, who have already begun to destroy their own peace by 
developing hostile paranoia about their privacy.
In his book, Garland found all the right notes to tell this story; he knew 
that the experience of paradise found and lost had to really HAPPEN to the 
reader, so it had some emotional charge and didn't just become a pretentious 
cogitation on man's tendency to ruin the gifts God gave him. His hero was a 
perceptive, down-to-earth Brit we could identify with. The beach society was 
made up of people looking for clean fun, not a bunch of freaks with some 
twisted revolutionary ideology. And their downward spiral emerged gradually, 
tragically, out of reasonable concerns that got out of hand.
Boyle and company, however, plunge enthusiastically into every pitfall 
possible. The middle passages of their film should settle into beach life, 
capture a feeling of tranquillity and make us hope that it can last; instead, 
the happy part of the plot is covered in a short montage where we see 
snippets of activity and hear DiCaprio's narration tell us how everything was 
going fine. Consequently the madness and carnage of the latter passages come 
from nowhere and mean nothing. The condensed structure, the introduction of 
irrelevant romantic subplots and the brief dialogue make "The Beach" a film 
of plot, which is a mistake, since it should be one of journey.
The production design and photography are impeccable, and DiCaprio's intense 
screen presence is always fascinating. Strange, then, how bland and 
superficial the film feels; I think it's because Boyle jumps around instead 
of absorbing atmosphere, and is working from a screenplay without any 
well-defined characters or key moments. The experience of reading "The Beach" 
and then seeing the film resembles the plight of the characters -- they found 
something wonderful, rejoiced in it, and then saw a bunch of careless 
bastards trample it into bloody pulp.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Angela's Ashes (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on 14 January, 1999; certificate 15; 145 minutes; 
countries of origin Ireland/USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Alan Parker; produced by David Brown, Alan Parker, Scott Rudin.
Written by Laura Jones, Alan Parker; based on the memoir by Frank McCourt.
Photographed by Michael Seresin; edited by Gerry Hambling.
At first, things did not look good for Frank McCourt. The eldest of six 
children in a poor Irish family, born in America before his parents made the 
fatal decision to go back to the old country looking for work, he witnessed 
three of his siblings die before he was old enough to take his first 
communion. His family, living in Limerick in the '30s and '40s, had to put up 
with a flooded house next to a communal lavatory, a city plagued by 
tuberculosis and a man of the house with a fondness for the drink. Malachy 
McCourt didn't often have a job, but when he did, the wages were spent on 
Guinness.
And yet Frank did endure, and prevail. He coped with a no-good father, 
lunatic teachers and bouts of conjunctivitis and diptheria; then returned to 
America, got a degree, became a teacher and wrote a pair of best-selling 
autobiographies, "Angela's Ashes" and "'Tis". The movie rights to Frank's 
memoirs were quickly snapped up -- unsurprising, as tales of hardship, 
poverty, misery and escape are just what studios need for their Oscar season 
prestige releases.
The film of "Angela's Ashes" has been directed by Alan Parker, whose credits 
make him seem ideal: "The Commitments" was an Irish film, "Bugsy Malone" was 
filled with wonderful child performances and few big movies are as harsh as 
"Midnight Express" or "Mississippi Burning". Here, however, he doesn't have 
so much as a basic grasp on the material -- this should not be the story of 
Frank McCourt's suffering, but that of his survival, and what should be 
emphasised is the way he maintained his sanity by using gallows humour and 
ambitious dreaming. Instead, the movie shows us a series of miserable 
vignettes, which end with Frank suddenly hopping onto a boat to get away from 
everything.
There is never any rhythm established; Parker has just filmed all the moments 
of the book that took place in Limerick and edited them together in a way 
that keeps jumping ahead but still takes two-and-a-half hours to end. He and 
his co-writer, Laura Jones, should have taken a look at Steven Spielberg's 
brilliant adaptation of "The Color Purple", another rambling, episodic novel 
about growing up in brutal surroundings. It makes clear the main character's 
wish to reunite with her sister, and uses that ever-present desire as the 
backbone of the film, to give some significance to everything else that goes 
on. Here, the scenes in America are over before the opening credits, and 
we're left with no indication that Frank even remembers the place, let alone 
that he yearns to go back there more than anything.
The film stars Emily Watson and Robert Carlyle, but even the acting is off. 
People who are unfamiliar with the source material will still be able to 
detect which lines are direct quotes -- the performers seem to say them in 
respectful inverted commas, after solemn dramatic pauses. There is no life 
here, especially not in the narrator, Andrew Bennett, whose flat, forced, 
monotonous delivery kills every bit of irony and truth the script assigns him.
"Angela's Ashes" is a terrific production, with realistic period detail and 
atmospheric photography. But it bewilders me that this is the film Parker, 
one of the best of all working directors, has been so publicly exerting 
himself over for the past two years. Perhaps he put so much effort into 
worrying about getting it right that he forgot to actually do so. Is it a 
dull waste of time, talent and toil? 'Tis.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, located 
at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Manchester City Centre)
Released in the UK by Fox on March 31, 2000; certificate 15; 82 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Steve Miner; produced by David E. Kelley, Michael Pressman.
Written by David E. Kelley.
Photographed by Daryn Okada; edited by Marshall Harvey.
Our brains need a constant level of the chemical dopamine to stay alert. 
That's why people can become addicted to smoking -- nicotine gets them used 
to a dopamine high which their brains have trouble functioning without. I am 
a non-smoker, but now I have found a movie that made me need a cigarette, by 
deadening my brain with its unrelenting dullness.
I would have settled for some popcorn, actually, or even a bag of Jelly 
Babies. Anything to perk me up. But once I'm in the auditorium, the lights go 
down and the film starts, I always stay put. Trapped, in this case. Agonised. 
"Lake Placid" runs only 82 minutes and yet feels interminable. It's one of 
the year's worst films.
It's a monster movie, I guess, although the villain is just a big crocodile 
who rips people to shreds in a large stretch of water in Maine. For no 
significant reason, museum researcher Kelly Scott (Bridget Fonda) is sent by 
her boss to investigate the situation, joining wildlife experts Jack Wells 
(Bill Pullman) and Hector Cyr (Oliver Platt), and grumpy local cop Sheriff 
Keough (Brendan Gleeson).
The plot is a silly routine of people venturing into the water, getting 
munched by the big croc and our heroes solemnly trying to conjure a solution. 
Gleeson snarls over every development with a phoney New England accent. Platt 
makes pathetic wisecracks. And Fonda shrieks and jumps, as attractive airhead 
heroines are supposed to do in cheesy B-pictures such as this.
Steve Miner, the director of the film, and David E. Kelley, who wrote and 
produced, clearly think they've made a movie that is so bad it's good. But 
the untalented men, whose credits include such crap as "Halloween H20" and 
"Ally McBeal", don't have the mastery of tone needed to pull off comedy or 
horror, and so "Lake Placid" is flat and embarrassing. It contains neither 
the silly sincerity that makes cheap horror flicks laughable nor the 
entertaining cheese of films like "Whatever Happened to Harold Smith?", 
because the filmmakers don't have the courage to go over-the-top -- something 
that is absolutely necessary to achieve their goal. Most disastrously, there 
are ironic wisecracks in the dialogue, just to remind us that the film is a 
comedy. It's as if Miner and Kelley knew their general approach wouldn't 
work, and so threw in all the comic material they could think up, just to be 
on the safe side.
Some pathetic writers will give "Lake Placid" positive reviews, just to show 
they know that it's not supposed to be taken seriously. But the film is not 
funny or hip, it's a miserable waste of time. Even its actors look sluggish 
and depressed. Unlike us, they got paid to show up.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on February 11, 2000; 
certificate U; 85 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by John Lasseter; produced by Karen Robert Jackson, Helene Plotkin.
Written by Doug Chamberlain, Rita Hsiao, Andrew Stanton, Chris Webb.
Photographed by Sharon Calahan; edited by Edie Blehman, Lee Unkrich.
CAST.....
Voice of Tom Hanks..... Woody
Voice of Tim Allen..... Buzz Lightyear
Voice of Don Rickles..... Mr Potato Head
Voice of Jim Varney..... Slinky Dog
Voice of Wallace Shawn..... Rex
Voice of John Ratzenberger..... Hamm
Voice of Annie Potts..... Bo Peep
Voice of Joan Cusack..... Jessie the Cowgirl
Voice of R Lee Ermey..... Sergeant
Voice of Kelsey Grammer..... Prospector
Voice of Wayne Knight..... Toy Collector
Well, do YOU really care whether or not David Schwimmer gets the girl? I sure 
don't, and yet that's about as challenging an issue as you'll find in most 
movies intended for grown-ups. No wonder kids are so sharp -- they have 
movies like "Toy Story 2" to fire their imaginations. The film's central 
dilemma, albeit one that has to be faced by a cowboy doll, is a complex 
question of loyalty that requires careful diplomacy to solve. This is not 
just 85 minutes of mindless cartoon action, but a work that could conceivably 
be shown to an ethics class, as stimulus for group discussion.
Or to a drama class, a parody-writing class, a nursery class... "Toy Story 2" 
is wonderful universal entertainment, a worthy sequel to "Toy Story" (1995), 
which was the first ever feature film created entirely through computer 
animation. It's not quite as good, but I didn't expect it to be -- the 
original was one of the most involving movies ever made. But it is even more 
ambitious, and delights us in different ways.
Less of this film's appeal lies in discovering its world; it assumes 
familiarity with the first movie, where we were introduced to the toys in the 
bedroom of a kid named Andy. Whenever humans were out of sight, the toys came 
to life, and made sure their domain was running smoothly. They've really got 
their work cut out for them this time; the stakes are now much higher than a 
fight for Andy's affections.
It all starts with greedy toy merchant Al (Wayne Knight) stealing cowboy doll 
Woody (Tom Hanks) from Andy's house. Woody, it seems, was the star of a hit 
puppet show on television in the 1950s, the merchandise of which has been 
like gold dust ever since the programme was cancelled. A toy museum in Japan 
is prepared to pay Al millions of dollars for the complete set of "Woody's 
Roundup" action figures, which he now has.
Surely the other toys must save Woody before Andy gets back from summer camp! 
Space-ranger Buzz Lightyear (Tim Allen) takes charge of this mission, 
bringing along the motley crew of pig-shaped money bank Hamm (John 
Ratzenberger), dinosaur model Rex (Wallace Shawn), Slinky Dog (Jim Varney) 
and Mr Potato Head (Don Rickles). This is a grand adventure, and also leads 
us to Woody's aforementioned dilemma.
You see, Woody would love to return to Andy; the kid and the toy rely on and 
enjoy each other. But if he leaves the "Woody's Roundup" characters, who have 
all been abandoned by their owners, they will not be bought by the museum and 
will be put back in storage, which is as close to hell as toys can go. Who 
needs him the most? Is it worth going back to Andy, when one day the boy will 
grow up and forget about him? Is living in a museum a tolerable 
self-sacrifice?
These are questions worth caring about, for characters you just gotta love. 
Some have criticised "Toy Story 2" as a marketing tool to sell a bunch of 
toys; even if that were true, it would be okay, because these are beautiful 
toys. They may have been created on computers, but they still have energy, 
perfect comic timing and an astonishingly natural sense of irony. I once saw 
a short film from the same animation team, PIXAR, which contained nothing but 
two jumping lamps -- and somehow the geniuses made even these faceless 
objects convey emotion. 
With so much revolutionary technology involved, I really think it says 
something that the most awesome things about the "Toy Story" movies are 
elements of plot and character. The screenplay provides obvious heroes with 
simple goals, but still never settles into formula; and so we never know how 
much more of the story is left to unfold, we get lost in individual moments 
and the time flies by.
"Toy Story 2" deserves to be analysed with more depth and elaboration than 
this. But my strongest memory of the film is simply the laughter of myself, 
my companions and the rest of the audience. It is a pure, innocent, visceral 
delight -- good fun for adults, and nothing short of a gift for children all 
over the world.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on February 4, 2000; certificate 18; 122 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Sam Mendes; produced by Bruce Cohen, Dan Jinks.
Written by Alan Ball.
Photographed by Conrad L Hall; edited by Tariq Anwar, Christopher Greenbury.
Sam Mendes, the director of "American Beauty", has shot a glorious film about 
a man who gets a life; what a pity that the screenwriter kills the character 
off. On the basis of this horrible ending, I'm tempted to call the movie a 
thematic mess. But the rest of it is too darn involving. I guess I'll just 
say that it's great while it lasts.
The film is a study of two dysfunctional three-member families in suburban 
Connecticut. Mainly we follow the Burnhams -- Lester (Kevin Spacey), a 
depressive loser who writes mindless magazine copy and lusts after his 
daughter's best friend Angela (Mena Suvari), Carolyn (Annette Bening), a 
hideously perky estate agent whose vernacular of upbeat capitalist platitudes 
seems to have come from 1980s self-help tapes, and Jane (Thora Birch), a 
typically moody teenager. Just moved in next door are the clan Fitz -- Frank 
(Chris Cooper), a violent, homophobic colonel in the marine corps, Barbara 
(Alison Janney), his senile wife, and young Ricky (Wes Bentley), who makes 
vast sums of money selling pot behind his parents' backs.
These are, for the most part, people who refuse to face how disconnected and 
desperately unhappy they really are, clinging to societal labels and 
conventional ideas of propriety and beauty to convince themselves that things 
are going fine. Lester and Carolyn don't see themselves as a loveless couple 
working jobs they hate, but as productive middle-class earners. Frank would 
not stand to be called a bigoted psychopath, because he's officially an 
American hero, and he'd never admit that Barbara has gone batty -- after all, 
she performs her housekeeping tasks efficiently; she MUST be functioning 
perfectly well!
This sounds like ugly and depressing material, but Mendes doesn't try to 
evoke typical reactions of disgust from the audience; his camera holds back, 
viewing things from a sympathetic distance, emphasising the absurdity of 
situations rather than their scandal. We're invited to find both pathos and 
pantomime humour in behaviour that could have come across as creepy. Lester's 
infatuation with Angela is a perfect example -- just look at the scene where 
he's eavesdropping on her outside Jane's door, thinks she's on to him and 
darts  away like a child who doesn't want to be caught misbehaving.
It is Lester's conduct throughout "American Beauty" which points to why this 
movie is worth seeing, whereas last year's "Happiness" was not. In that 
movie, the characters just sat and whined about their miserable lives -- 
here, Lester sees how easily Ricky gets on with life, and finds himself 
inspired to change, to be honest with himself after all these years of 
blackout. Even if you instinctively find more happiness in looking at a 
plastic bag than in buying a silk sofa, the kid quite reasonably points out, 
then why go to the trouble of pretending otherwise?
In taking stock of what's important to him, Lester quits his job, starts 
pumping iron and resolves to be frank whenever he speaks -- actions that, in 
practice, most people would think weird, and the signs of mid-life crisis. 
But they're healthy for Lester; he's starting to grow as a person. By the end 
of the movie he's rejecting Angela's sexual advances; at the beginning, he 
would never have had the self-control or even the opportunity.
Spacey is wonderful in this role. There is an enthused glint people get in 
their eyes when they begin to re-invent themselves -- he nails it. And pay 
attention, too, to the subtle way his voice and body language come across as 
sluggish at the start of the movie and become progressively cooler. There are 
several good performances in "American Beauty", but his is the standout.
It would have been a great film, too, if it had followed through on its 
ideas, and allowed Lester's character to develop even further. But instead he 
is shot dead -- which we're told is going to happen from the outset, but 
still doesn't feel right. The point of Lester's self-improvement is to show 
us how it's possible to wake up from self-delusion and embrace what touches 
us. Killing him off implies that life is meaningless, everyone might as well 
lead unhappy lives and there's no point trying to work ourselves out of ruts 
because we're all doomed anyway. As if this isn't bad enough, the final 
scenes of the movie turn into tacky murder mystery, and set up a series of 
preposterous misunderstandings to give the killer a motive. What a letdown.
But don't take my word for it. My view is in the minority, and "American 
Beauty" looks set to win the top Oscars, having been named best picture of 
the year by the Online Film Critics Society and at the Golden Globes. Me, I 
think it unfolds as a profound masterpiece, then collapses in a muddle of 
probably unintentional, certainly unnecessary pessimism. It's as if Aladdin 
had forgotten how to unleash the genie, gone nuts and used his lamp to burn 
himself to death.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for House! (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Warner Village (Birkenhead Conway Park)
Released in the UK by Pathé on May 5, 2000; certificate 15; 89 minutes; 
country of origin UK; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Julian Kemp; produced by Michael Kelk.
Written by Jason Sutton; based on an idea by Eric Styles.
Photographed by Kjell Vassdal; edited by Jonathan Rudd.
Bingo is one of the most boring and aimless pastimes there is. How it became 
popular with elderly people in this country is beyond me. They've had so much 
experience of life that surely they know of something to do that's more 
interesting, and less cheesy. Why do they spend their evenings in garish 
halls, listening to lounge performers calling out random numbers?
It's probably just as well, then, that the focus of "House!" is an attractive 
young lady named Linda, played by Kelly MacDonald, who you will remember from 
"Trainspotting" (1996). She gets our attention even in the ugly atmosphere of 
La Scala, a damp and creaky building that's been a music hall and a cinema, 
but now just caters to the bingo players.
The owner, Mr. Anzani (Freddie Jones), remembers fondly his days as a film 
projectionist in the same place, telling stories about the wonders of Fellini 
and Lang. "I'd still like to think we offer more than just bingo," he says, 
and indeed between games he engages the patrons in friendly chit-chat and 
cooks them spaghetti from a family recipe. But the personal touch just won't 
cut it: A quick drive away, a huge new bingo hall is set to open, with 
celebrity guests, bright lighting and a huge car park. La Scala offers dust 
and dry rot.
Linda, who works as an usher, is getting worried about whether the place can 
survive, when she discovers a sort of telepathic ability. In any bingo game, 
when she thinks of a number, it comes up! If she can use this to win the 
Ł1million star prize in an important national tournament, then her own 
security, as well as that of her place of business, is guaranteed. I don't 
know why she doesn't just play the National Lottery and bugger off to the 
Caribbean with the jackpot, but hey, to each his own.
The problem with "House!" is that its good parts cancel each other out and 
its bad parts are just plain bad. There are some involving passages of 
dialogue and glimpses at the drab locations -- the ambience of "The Full 
Monty" is achieved once or twice, if not the genius. Then again, one of the 
things which keeps the film interesting is exactly what spoils that drama, 
and that's the way the director, Julian Kemp, uses flashy camera and editing 
tricks to bring his picture to life. Consider an early, obligatory scene in 
which Linda speaks to The Guy She's Always Loved But Has Never Made A Move 
On, and Kemp flash-cuts between tiny hand and eye gestures. The technique 
turns a would-be clichéd conversation into something intense and passionate. 
Directing the story in the same manner, however, just causes obstruction.
It's also pretty hard to enjoy a movie whose climax hinges on a bingo game. 
It needs to charm our pants off before we set aside enough prejudice to put 
up with it. There's no way "House!" can do that when it's being cluttered by 
such annoying things as the performance of Mossie Smith. She plays one of 
Linda's co-workers, an obese woman in tight-fitting clothes who reminded me 
of those "You're too large to dress sexy!" episodes of Ricki Lake. Smith 
delivers her lines in a flat, rambling monotone without ever emphasising any 
particular word, with a combination of smug grin and miserable wince, and 
eyes stretched open to the size of tennis balls.
This could have been an okay picture if the filmmakers had cleared away some 
of the obvious dreck, and then decided what kind of movie they wanted to make 
-- hyperactive stylised piece or sweet British comedy? Interestingly enough, 
"House" was also the title of a very successful horror movie when I was 
growing up. If they'd thrown in some of THAT, things would really have been 
interesting! Consistency be damned!
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Bromborough)
Released in the UK by UIP on January 7, 2000; certificate 15; 105 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Tim Burton; produced by Scott Rudin, Adam Schroeder.
Written by Andrew Kevin Walker; from a screen story by Kevin Yagher, Andrew 
Kevin Walker; based upon the short story "The Legend of Sleepy Hollow" by 
Washington Irving.
Photographed by Emmanuel Lubezki; edited by Chris Lebenzon.
Washington Irving's short story "The Legend of Sleepy Hollow", first 
published in 1819, is a well-respected folk tale of supernatural secrets, and 
has survived the generations long enough to spawn several film adaptations -- 
among them an Emmy-winning mini-series for kids and a Disney animation. When 
Tim Burton, that distinctive director of twisted heroic journeys and gothic 
fantasies, decided to do his own remake of the Irving work, the project was 
expected to be his prestigious bid for Oscar success. If David Lynch can make 
a subtle movie with a premise as weird as that of "The Straight Story", 
people thought, surely Tim Burton can take a delicate approach to a classic?
Actually, this "Sleepy Hollow" is as Burtonesque as possible, a gory 
special-effects extravaganza set in 1799 that plays like a cross between 
Thomas Hardy and "The Evil Dead". Tim has determined to stay in his own wild 
world, and along with his screenwriters, Andrew Kevin Walker and Kevin 
Yagher, has confidently shuffled around the details of Irving's plot for his 
own purposes. Even the image of the famous literary figure Ichabod Crane has 
been altered -- he's no longer a lanky, curious schoolteacher who lives where 
the story is set, but a clumsy New York City police constable played by 
Johnny Depp.
Burton and Depp's Crane travels to the village of Sleepy Hollow to 
investigate the murders of three local men -- all of whom were found in the 
woods without heads. The town elders -- Van Tassell (Michael Gambon), 
Hardenbrook (Michael Gough), Steenwyck (Jeffrey Jones) and Phillipse (Richard 
Griffiths) -- inform Crane that they suspect the legendary 'Headless 
Horsemen' of the crimes, a warrior ghost who is said to stalk and decapitate 
the inhabitants of the area in search of his own noggin. But the constable 
does not want to listen, claiming to be a man of science and reason, and 
searching for a human culprit.
There is fun to be had in just watching Crane try to operate his newfangled 
scientific gadgets, which are elaborately designed for no visible purpose, 
with windows and panels and knobs aplenty, which constantly spring out of his 
control. Depp plays the character as a clearly preposterous man who 
nonetheless attempts to maintain serious authority, and who rigidly keeps 
eyes wide open, head upright and mouth poised properly even while cowering 
from a spider, or shrieking in peril under bed sheets.
The amusingly clumsy fellow soon learns that the Headless Horseman is indeed 
a real figure, and also finds such sights as a witch and a magical tree. 
Crane carries out silly interrogations, investigates town records and digs up 
the victims' graves for further research, getting closer to the explanation 
behind Sleepy Hollow's odd events, and to a violent confrontation with the 
villain responsible. There are slow patches, and at times the film gets 
tangled up in unnecessary confusing details on the way to its simple 
resolution. But the payoff redeems the flaws, thanks to Burton's visuals, 
which are not inaccurate to the location and period, but are larger than 
life, with the depth of Emmanuel Lubezki's photography slightly swelling 
every image and casting a sinister blue mist over the night air. When the 
horseman jumps out from these clouds, the camera rushes around in jarring 
close-ups to follow the havoc he wreaks, and this makes for stunning action 
sequences.
Admittedly, I expected terrific production values and an amusing Johnny Depp 
performance from "Sleepy Hollow". Burton, as I keep stressing, is one of the 
most visually astute of all working filmmakers, and Depp has performed 
creatively in the challenging title roles of the director's "Edward 
Scissorhands" and "Ed Wood". The pleasant surprise here is Christina Ricci, a 
young actress whose recent persona has only been fit for satire, with its 
rebellious, dead-eyed, flat-voiced arrogance. She is sincere and subtle as 
Katrina, the innocent maiden who loves and protects Icabod Crane, displaying 
versatility I believed her to have lost.
No doubt Ricci was just so amazed by the movie's carefully constructed 
atmosphere that she could not stand in the way of it with her usual 
distracting sarcasm. "Sleepy Hollow" proves -- as do "Pee Wee's Big 
Adventure", "Batman", "Edward Scissorhands" and "The Nightmare Before 
Christmas" -- that the offbeat crannies of Tim Burton's mind are worth 
visiting, and he knows how to take us into them.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on June 2, 2000; certificate 15; 115 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Jonathan Mostow; produced by Dino de Laurentiis, Martha de 
Laurentiis.
Written by David Ayer, Sam Montgomery, Jonathan Mostow.
Photographed by Oliver Wood; edited by Wayne Wahrman.
CAST.....
Matthew McConaughey..... Lieutenant Tyler
Bill Paxton..... Lieutenant Commander Mike Dahlgren
Harvey Keitel..... Chief Klough
Jon Bon Jovi..... Lieutenant Pete Emmett
Matthew Settle..... Larson
David Keith..... Marine Major Coonan
Jake Weber..... Lieutenant Hirsch
"The moment I get confused, I check out of the movie. When all of a sudden 
stuff starts happening, and I don't know where I'm at... well, I think an 
audience has, like, an umbilical cord to the screen, and it gets severed when 
confusion comes in."
    --Quentin Tarantino
Well put. That's exactly what happened to me right in the middle of "U-571". 
Submarine movies are inevitably going to be claustrophobic, sweaty, noisy and 
dark -- tension turns this into masterful entertainment, confusion kills it.
The setting is World War Two. A squad in the U.S. Navy, led by Bill Paxton 
and Matthew McConaughey, have been ordered to seize a German U-boat that 
carries the radio codes used by Nazi submarines to plan attacks on Allied 
shipping. The movie opens with a cliché -- introducing us to all the boys at 
a big gala, before an urgent telegram comes in, informing them to return to 
their posts -- but there was still hope for the film at this point, because 
it has a promising appearance, with period texture perfectly captured. People 
looked, talked and walked differently in the 1940s; they had different ways 
of eating, washing, learning, wearing clothes. Many period films just plant 
obviously contemporary figures among archaic props, but the director of 
"U-571", Jonathan Mostow, gets the details just right.
There is tension on the boat before the big attack. It's a risky assignment, 
having to seize this sub, and these guys are sailors, not combat soldiers. If 
it goes wrong, not only is everyone dead, but the Germans will change their 
codes and tighten their security, and that may have implications for the 
outcome of the war.
At the decisive moment of action, when the Americans sneak onto the German 
boat by posing as a supply ship, I got completely lost as to what was going 
on. One of the sailors plants dynamite somewhere, and we can't tell if he's 
supposed to be doing so or not. Something explodes elsewhere, and the cause 
is never made clear. Someone thinks they've found a code book, and we're not 
sure if they have or not. A load of Americans end up in the water for no 
reason, and they don't swim the few metres back to their sub, they just 
scream and drown. Why?
This isn't one of those battle scenes that's supposed to disorientate us. 
It's an incompetently shot beginning to the film's middle section. So, with 
my umbilical cord severed, I found it hard to watch the rest of the film, 
with the guys in the submarine shouting impenetrable jargon and running 
around tight spaces, often with no clear purpose.
The scenes I did manage to follow were repetitive and silly: Every now and 
again a new obstacle would come up, and McConaughey would give an order as to 
how to combat it. Two of the other men would take separate turns to repeat 
these instructions verbatim, in hushed awe. It would be carried out to the 
letter, and work. Then they'd repeat it back to themselves, and say "Phew!"
Even some of the visual effects are shoddy. I'm amazed that Hollywood seems 
to be going backwards in this respect -- two or three years ago complimenting 
a movie's technological wizardry seemed redundant, but now, with releases 
such as "Battlefield Earth" on our screens, we seem to have returned to the 
days of shoddy "Star Wars" rip-offs. "U-571" has a torpedo attack that looks 
like it was shot by a kid throwing toys at a camcorder in the bathtub. And in 
the shots where people are supposed to be drowning, they look awfully in 
control: remember the scene with the rubber octopus in "Ed Wood"?
I feel sympathy for Mostow, who spent eight years of his life on this 
project, and has come out with something that can't be taken seriously. It 
did fill me with respect for World War Two veterans, but only in the sense 
that if their experiences were anything near as stifling or boring as the 
movie, then it's amazing they managed to carry on making important strategic 
decisions. The end credits reveal, by the way, that it was the British, not 
the Americans, who were actually the heroes of the German code-breaking 
operation. How nice that the filmmakers thought to tell us.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Whatever Happened to Harold Smith? (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on March 10, 2000; certificate 15; 96 minutes; 
country of origin UK; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Pete Hewitt; produced by Ruth Jackson.
Written by Ben Steiner.
Photographed by David Tattersall; edited by Martin Walsh.
There are some basic facts about the 1970s that many movies have trouble 
understanding -- they took place in reality, and they took place on earth. If 
I've seen one, I've seen a dozen films and shows whose characters run around 
alive with the knowledge they're in The Seventies, squeeze the word "groovy" 
into almost every sentence, wear huge polyester garments and disco-dance at 
every given opportunity.
Perhaps I'm exaggerating, but my point is an excellent one -- it was a very 
loud decade, but not as loud as recent pop culture is making it out to be. 
Normally the misrepresentation irks me, but "Whatever Happened to Harold 
Smith?", a film chock-full of cheesy retro designs, brought a smile to my 
face. It's fun because it goes wildly over-the-top at every turn. 1977-1978 
is therefore the perfect setting, especially this preposterous vision of the 
period; after all, is there any other recent era so notorious for being so 
tawdry?
Two stories run concurrently throughout the film. One is the coming-of-age 
tale of Vince Smith (Michael Legge), a teenage legal clerk who is beginning 
to wonder if he really does identify with the disco scene, and who has fallen 
in love with an attractive young colleague, Joanna (Laura Fraser). Joanna is 
a strange girl, I think -- she's usually sweet, but has rash mood swings, 
getting angry at people out of the blue, or asking them provocative questions 
such as "Are you a virgin?" But she's gorgeous, so never mind.
Meanwhile, Vince's father, Harold (Tom Courtenay), is attracting nationwide 
publicity. After seeing Uri Geller bend spoons on television, you see, he 
decided to utilise his own magical talents, which include the ability to stop 
watches. When he performed this trick at a nursing home, he accidentally 
stopped some of the resident's pacemakers, and is under suspicion for murder.
The plot threads eventually come together in a scene that doesn't have any 
thematic resonance at all, and exists only to get us tapping our toes to the 
Bee Gees' song "Night Fever". But somehow, for all its lack of sense, 
"Whatever Happened to Harold Smith?" never seems bad, and comes across as 
more of a screw-loose send-up of bad movies. The bizarre comic set-pieces, 
which include Stephen Fry stripping to give his daughter a "birds and the 
bees" talk, are pumped so full of visual histrionics that we have to laugh -- 
partly from embarrassment, partly because we're impressed at the film's 
audacious lack of taste.
So everything that's going on is silly. That's a one-joke premise. The reason 
it doesn't get annoying or boring is that the three lead performances follow 
the essential rule of comedy -- nine times out of ten, it has to be played 
straight. Legge, Courtenay and Fraser (who was so terrible in last year's 
"Virtual Sexuality") are all straightforward and down-to-earth. Their 
surroundings are going mad, but they don't join in; they stand outside them 
looking bemused, which is a perfectly sensible reaction.
Normally people tell me I'm too critical a viewer. In the case of this film, 
though, I'm going to be getting letters and emails asking how I could 
possibly defend such nonsense. But first of all, I do not defend it. I praise 
it. And to paraphrase famed New Yorker critic Pauline Kael, movies are so 
rarely great art that if we cannot appreciate great trash we might as well 
not attend the cinema. "Whatever Happened to Harold Smith?" is not great 
trash, but it is good trash. Sometimes that's harder to pull off than good 
art.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on May 26, 2000; certificate 
15; 88 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Mike Mitchell; produced by Barry Bernadi, Sid Ganis.
Written by Harris Goldberg, Rob Schneider.
Photographed by Peter Lyons Collister; edited by George Bowers, Lawrence 
Jordan.
A lot of the reviews of "Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo" have laid the blame for 
its failure on the star, Rob Schneider. But it's not his fault that the film 
is obnoxious, it's the situations that his character is put in. Schneider 
plays the eponymous Deuce, a pond cleaner asked by a gigolo to mind his sick 
fish when he is away on business in Switzerland. He warns Deuce in no 
uncertain terms that he must not mess up his beautiful apartment, which of 
course Deuce does almost immediately, by letting things smash on the floor 
and getting the place flooded. To raise some money to replace the damaged 
property, Deuce contacts the gigolo's pimp (T.J. Hicks), who helps him become 
a "man-whore" (this phrase is used every two minutes, as if we'd forgotten 
it, and will laugh every time). The comedy of the movie is intended to come 
from the assortment of freaks Deuce has to date, including a lady who keeps 
passing out, a 7-foot giant, an amazingly obese slut with a man's voice and a 
usually sweet girl who has obscene outbursts.
The reason Deuce can't attract choice clientele is he's supposed to be an 
unattractive slob. Schneider has an awfully well-toned, hairless body to be 
playing such an undesirable, so I guess the movie must be set in Los Angeles, 
where almost everyone is obsessed with physical perfection, and anyone except 
the most die-hard health freak is an outcast. Not that "Deuce Bigalow: Male 
Gigolo" would play well in L.A. -- its jokes are far too politically 
incorrect. As soon as Deuce begins his new job, for example, he's having a 
fistfight with a woman. And then there are the inappropriate pot shots that 
the screenplay takes at narcoleptics, the overweight, the disabled, etc.
The portrayals of all these people are too broad to be convincing, and so 
they're not sharp or funny, they're just offensive. The fat woman hides 
pizzas and chicken in her dress. And the Tourette's Syndrome sufferer doesn't 
have proper mood swings, but simply starts screaming obscenities out of the 
blue, in the middle of regular conversations. That's such a transparent 
attempt to be funny; a calm, realistic portrayal of a gigolo dating a 
Tourette's patient would be infinitely more entertaining. Remember the scene 
in Woody Allen's "Celebrity" where the polymorphously perverse supermodel 
caused Kenneth Branagh to crash his car? That took time to develop, and 
played out seriously, even though it was a slapstick situation, and was an 
example of how to do this sort of thing better.
"Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo" is easy to watch because of Schneider, who is a 
likeable comic hero, with goofy posture, wide ol' puppy-dog eyes and a cutely 
timid voice. The film doesn't work, though, even though the premise has 
potential. It's the kind of thing that has to be credible to make us laugh, 
and who could believe in any movie where someone puts a cheese sandwich in a 
toaster?
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Holy Smoke (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by Film Four on April 7, 2000; certificate 18; 115 
minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Jane Campion; produced by Jan Chapman.
Written by Anna Campion, Jane Campion.
Photographed by Dion Beebe; edited by Veronika Jenet.
"Something... something happened, didn't it?"
So suggests Ruth Barron at the end of "Holy Smoke", and she's right -- 
something has happened. I'm just not sure what. Here is a movie that promises 
to be a drama about two passionate people waging intellectual war on each 
other, but disintegrates into a bizarre mixture of "Ticket to Heaven", "Last 
Tango in Paris", "Klute" and "Coneheads".
The early scenes glimpse Ruth (Kate Winslet), a young Australian woman, 
vacationing in India. Back home her parents are informed that she has joined 
some sort of religious cult. They go beserk; this is not a sophisticated or 
open-minded family. Their house is in worse shape than their caravan. The 
patriarch, Gilbert (Tim Robertson), flaunts a hairpiece, fake tan and bulging 
belly. Mother Miriam (Julie Hamilton) has weird mood swings and runs around 
wincing. The grown-up kids burp, fart, groan and attend tacky theme nights at 
pubs.
Given that she's grown up around these boors, it's hardly surprising Ruth 
wants to escape into an alternative lifestyle. So the family lure her back to 
Oz with cruel lies about dying relatives, and then arrange for her to meet 
with an American "exit counsellor", P.J. Waters (Harvey Keitel). The guy has 
a great track record, having convinced almost two hundred people to leave 
clandestine sects.
P.J. takes Ruth to an isolated shack. It is agreed that they will talk for 
three days. "You're never gonna break me," Ruth insists. "You're right," 
responds P.J. "Your own reason should break you." There is real tension 
onscreen at this point, because Winslet and Keitel are intelligent actors who 
don't avoid each other's gazes. Even when their characters are refusing to 
talk, we see them seething, and trust that when they finally do argue their 
conversations will set the screen ablaze.
Unfortunately there never really is much opening up about the issues at hand, 
or reasons for the characters' beliefs. Ruth does not even tell us what she 
thinks she's learned in India, so we can never judge whether she has been 
taken in by a sinister cult or simply found solace in a peaceful commune. 
"Holy Smoke" therefore lacks context -- is Ruth's indignation to P.J. 
something we're supposed to cheer or pity?
I haven't even hinted at the film's more bizarre reaches. One is the 
portrayal of Ruth's family, which goes so over the top it undermines the 
drama, by painting its members as a bunch of giggling, snorting animals who 
express their feelings through twitching and raised voices. Then there's Ruth 
and P.J.'s fourth day in the hut, in which both characters lose their reserve 
in favour of violence, sex and mind games. "Holy Smoke" begins with important 
discussion, follows it by poking fun at rural lifestyles and ends with Harvey 
Keitel wearing a dress and trying to break people's noses. What's going on? 
Answers on a postcard please.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Million Dollar Hotel, The (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Icon on April 28, 2000; certificate 15; 122 minutes; 
countries of origin Germany/USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Wim Wenders; produced by Bono, Nicholas Klein, Deepak Nayar, Wim 
Wenders.
Written by Nicholas Klein; based on a story by Bono and Nicholas Klein.
Photographed by Phedon Papamichael; edited by Tatiana S. Rigel.
The people behind the scenes of "The Million Dollar Hotel" probably thought 
they were making a great movie. It's so far out there, odd on such a grand 
scale, with such emotional sounds and warped visuals, that there must have 
been a lot of risk and passion put into it. Nobody wants to do that in 
service of a big disaster. But they have.
To give you an idea of what the movie is like, I must describe some of the 
characters, because they dominate the film. They reside in the hotel of the 
title, a large but decrepit old hole that is a perfectly apt place for the 
grubby bunch of freaks, addicts, losers and nutcases who fill its rooms. At 
the forefront is Tom Tom (Jeremy Davies), a skinny, fidgety young 
skateboarder who everyone seems to agree is retarded. He's in love with 
Eloise (Milla Jovovich), a quiet but self-destructive prostitute who likes to 
read.
Geronimo (Jimmy Smits), another friend of Tom Tom, wears a cape, paints tar 
over stolen goods and communicates through shouting. Dixie (Peter Stormare), 
who has not left the hotel since 1980, still awaits a visit from his dentist, 
and is convinced that he was the real songwriter for The Beatles. Vivien 
(Amanda Plummer) shoots heroin and is engaged to a dead man. Shorty (Bud 
Cort) is a pretty standard drunk. Jessica (Gloria Stuart) is a sweet old lady 
who swears a lot -- and if there's a comic device I'm really getting tired of 
in the movies, it's that one.
The story begins with an FBI agent played by Mel Gibson coming to investigate 
the death of a guy called Izzy, a former inhabitant of the Million Dollar 
Hotel who fell from the roof. It seems like suicide, but Izzy's rich father 
is convinced that his boy was murdered, and Gibson determines to find a 
culprit, aggressively interrogating the hotel's weirdoes and secretly 
enlisting Tom Tom's help.
We soon learn that the Gibson character, who wears a neck brace and moves in 
a robotic fashion, did himself grow up among 'freaks', after being born a 
deformed child with a third arm growing out of his back. As his investigation 
goes on, he develops an affinity for the hotel occupants, an emotional 
involvement that threatens to get in the way of his professionalism.
This should be poignant, but never is, because Gibson's body language is 
risible and distracting, and his dilemma never strikes us as being 
particularly meaningful. The rest of the movie doesn't work because we have 
to spend time with a plethora of wretched cretins, who get to be annoying 
very quickly. "Being John Malkovich" is a recent example of how entertaining 
eccentricity can be; "The Million Dollar Hotel" is filled with grating noise 
and murky sets, and most of it is about as fun as a bad trip.
Some of the music is fantastic -- U2's Bono wrote the film's story, and stuck 
around to create tracks for the soundtrack. There are moments of rich 
photography, and the editing is often hypnotic, with its fascinating use of 
shot repetition and emphasis on slow, seductive camera moves. It's even 
possible to get wrapped up in the plot, simply because we have no way of 
predicting what's going to happen. Then again, the eventual answer to the 
murder mystery is lacklustre, and it takes too long to get there. And the 
bottom line: "The Million Dollar Hotel" is far too ugly and strange for my 
tastes, and hey, I'm the guy who enjoyed "12 Monkeys".
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Warner Village (Birkenhead Conway Park)
Released in the UK by Warner Bros. on May 19, 2000; certificate 15; 99 
minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Jonathan Lynn; produced by Allan Kaufman, David Willis.
Written by Mitchell Kapner.
Photographed by David Franco; edited by Tom Lewis.
It's easy to make a bad movie look good in a trailer: Arrange a couple of 
moments into a fast-paced rhythm, stick a nice song on the soundtrack, and 
overlay some snappy lines. Recently, though, some wonderful movies have been 
getting sloppy treatment in the ads -- think of "Three Kings" and "The Green 
Mile", and now "The Whole Nine Yards". The studios must have pissed off their 
publicists something awful.
The commercials for "The Whole Nine Yards" make it look like a completely 
inane buddy comedy, full of people goofily shouting and bumping into doors. 
It's actually a much more skilful and witty picture; even Matthew Perry, an 
actor I previously hated, impressed me with his performance. In the 
television show "Friends" he scrunches his face, raises his voice, and always 
seems to be asking a question. Here, his voice is slower and calmer, and he 
plays a more likeable man, with reasonable worries and desires.
His name is Oz, a Chicago dentist living in Toronto because his bloodsucking 
French-Canadian wife Sophie (Rosanna Arquette) refuses to move. In next door 
moves Jimmy (Bruce Willis), who Oz recognises as an infamous Mafia hitman 
from back home. Sophie discovers that some of Jimmy's old gangster pals have 
a contract out on his life, and tries to get Oz to turn him in and collect a 
reward.
Oz travels to Chicago just to humour her and get a break, and even though he 
has no intention of actually getting involved with any criminals, they 
somehow know he has information, and are on his back as soon as he steps off 
the plane. Our hero's life gets complicated from here on in, and so does the 
movie's plot --Oz just wants to keep his head above water, but both the 
groups of enemies are using him as a pawn, he's fallen in love with Jimmy's 
wife, and his secretary Jill (Amanda Peet) wants to jump in and become a 
contract killer herself.
The story is violent, and features a lot of complex plotting and 
double-crossing, but it's sweet, enjoyable and easy to follow because the 
director, Jonathan Lynn, sets such an easy-going tone, and there's a cute 
central friendship between Oz, Jimmy and Jill. Perry, as I've already 
mentioned, performs in an uncharacteristically grounded manner; and Bruce 
Willis is an actor who always seems calm and self-assured, even when 
buildings are falling down around him. By simply adding a grin to this, he 
gives Jimmy an amusingly devious authority. And Amanda Peet, as the secretary 
who gets excited and giggly from the most perverse and macabre of things, 
gives off wonderful vibes of silly energy.
It was also a wise decision to set the movie in Toronto. American light 
comedy movies are normally set in stunningly clean and stylish versions of 
big US cities, and the unusual location makes Lynn pay attention to the 
surroundings, and use them to add texture to his picture. He was in the same 
position when he made the Alabaman "My Cousin Vinny" (1992), which is one of 
my favourite films. "The Whole Nine Yards" is not its equal, but it's a lot 
better than you'd expect from those damned trailers.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on January 21, 2000; certificate 18; 102 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Rupert Wainwright; produced by Frank Mancuso Jr.
Written by Tom Lazarus, Rick Ramage.
Photographed by Jeffrey L Kimball; edited by Michael J Duthie, Michael R 
Miller.
"Stigmata" starts as a badly made film, proceeds as a muddled one and ends up 
as psychotic. The final moments of this movie attack the Roman Catholic 
Church in the manner of a deranged ex-girlfriend -- wasting our time, 
solemnly declaring ridiculous accusations, making a lot of noise but no sense.
The first act introduces us to Frankie Paige (Patricia Arquette), an 
attractive Pittsburgh hairdresser who exists in one of those fairytale movie 
worlds where, at work, she walks in to find everyone greeting her like she's 
just come back from holiday, and, at night, she always gets to her favourite 
night club to find her friends already waiting there. There are lots of 
lingering close-ups of her drinks and cigarettes; look, kids, she's 
naughty... this is what big grown-up people call a 'wanton lifestyle'!
Meanwhile a priest played by Gabriel Byrne, Father Andrew Kiernan, is 
travelling around the world investigating reports of miracles. He's an 
objective, scientific fellow, we learn, who would never be taken in by a 
hoax. But when he assesses a statue of the Virgin Mary that cries blood, and 
comes to the conclusion that the relic is genuine, the cardinals at the 
Vatican don't pay it any mind.
Instead, they just send him on another assignment, this time to examine 
Frankie. She has been seen reacting to hallucinations and displaying signs of 
stigmata, a phenomenon whereby Christians with strong faith and empathy with 
Jesus will break out in the wounds their saviour suffered on the cross. But 
Frankie is an atheist, and the pointless middle of "Stigmata", which is a 
battle to stay awake through, mentions this discrepancy a lot without 
actually explaining it. Instead, every "How could this happen to me?" moment 
is interrupted by jarring music chords and fits of screaming, as Frankie 
freaks out like Linda Blair in "The Exorcist".
Is she possessed by something evil, as Blair's character was? I'm still not 
sure. If I followed the movie correctly, the soul of a dead Catholic priest 
has invaded her by storing his soul in magic rosary beads, to use her as a 
messenger and announce his discovery of Christ's own version of the Gospel. 
The stigmata is a side-effect of all the holy phenomena floating around, and 
this joyful miracle only seems like an attack by a demonic force because the 
priest is so darn angry at the state of the Vatican.
This is ridiculous, but gets even more farfetched, when the film explicitly 
accuses Catholicism of being a conspiracy against God. Just before the end 
credits, factoids and statistics appear onscreen to tell us how many reports 
of miracles the Vatican have dismissed as fake. That the director, Rupert 
Wainwright, could think this is serious evidence of corruption suggests he's 
the kind of guy who would look at the circus antics of a kooky talk show like 
"Jerry Springer" and declare them to contain compelling social exposé. Even 
his visual style gets on my nerves -- from the outset he keeps switching 
between grainy documentary realism and saturated slow-motion montages of bad 
dance music, which play like demented Coca-Cola commercials.
Watching Gabriel Byrne in this movie, I pondered the possibility that he 
enjoys deliberately appearing in bad religious pictures. Only a few weeks ago 
he played Satan in "End of Days", which, like "Stigmata", used half-baked 
knowledge about Catholicism as an excuse for a lot of ugly gore and noise. 
Byrne is a good actor; if you ever pass by a film set and see him, try to get 
his autograph. If you see a crucifix anywhere nearby, though, ask him the 
title of the movie he's working on and tell all your friends to avoid it.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Honest (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Pathé on May 26, 2000; certificate 18; 110 minutes; 
country of origin UK; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by David A. Stewart; produced by Eileen Gregory, Michael Peiser.
Written by Dick Clement, Ian La Frenais, David A. Stewart, Karen Lee Street.
Photographed by David Johnson; edited by David Martin.
"Honest" is too confident and professional to really be called bad, but it's 
still a bewildering mess. There's too much going on in terms of art direction 
and too much going nowhere in terms of plot, and although it's intended as a 
star vehicle for the pop group All Saints, two of them are hardly ever 
onscreen and the third plays a character who hides her feelings. I have a 
question for the four screenwriters: What the hell is this movie about, why 
does it take so long to get going, is it comic or dramatic, and who is the 
main player?
Those All Saints girls -- Nicole Appleton, Natalie Appleton and Melanie Blatt 
-- play three sisters in the East End of London in the 1960s. They dress up 
as men and pull armed robberies, but the folks in the neighbourhood don't 
know this, and think they're just a bunch of harmless young tarts. During one 
botched heist of a magazine office, an American hippie journalist, Daniel 
Wheaton (Peter Facinelli), captures and then proceeds to fall in love with 
Nicole's character, Gerry. Most of the movie is taken up by him following her 
around, and her telling him she's not interested (but not why), and then he 
gets entangled in a big violent chase, as the girls' criminal pasts catch up 
with them.
This probably sounds dull and confusing, and it is, not least because it's 
all that happens in the movie. Things take forever to unfold, and yet somehow 
nothing is ever fleshed out. The three sisters never have a conversation that 
tells us anything about their personalities -- all their lines are questions, 
answers, orders or points of information. The script tries to use some of 
Gerry and Daniel's exchanges to compare the revolutionaries of the 1960s with 
the unchanging working class, but nothing much is made of this theme, because 
"Honest" does not give us a convincing re-creation of its time. It doesn't so 
much take place in the 60s as in one of those "Austin Powers"-style pieces of 
production design overkill that pretend to be the 60s by teeming with joints, 
psychedelic polka-dot clothes, people saying "Far out!" and hit songs 
blasting out of every radio.
Lazy critics will blame the failure of this movie on the All Saints, or on 
the director, the Eurythmics' Dave Stewart, who are all musicians making 
their film debuts. But it's not their fault that they can't make sense of a 
script in which nothing happens for long stretches, and there is no real 
focus for anything, or reason for the period setting. It's not that I wasn't 
paying attention -- I watched "Honest" so attentively that I even noticed the 
in-jokes on the road signs of the sets.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Simpatico (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Home (Screener tape courtesy of Fine Line Features USA)
Released in the UK by Alliance Atlantis on January 28, 2000; certificate 15; 
106 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Matthew Warchus; produced by Jean-François Fonlupt, Dan Lupovitz, 
Timm Oberwelland.
Written by David Nicholls, Matthew Warchus; based upon the original stage 
play by Sam Shepard.
Photographed by John Toll; edited by Pasquale Buba.
"Simpatico" doesn't involve us in its story, so much as it blackmails us into 
it. Yes, I kept wondering what was going to happen next, but not because I 
cared -- I simply wanted to make sense of it all. The film's method is to 
throw a lot of bewildering information at us, and keep us watching by 
promising it'll all be sorted out by the end.
The main characters are Carter (Jeff Bridges), a successful businessman whose 
acres of property include a sleek country mansion, and Vinnie (Nick Nolte), 
an angry slob whose rotting bungalow lies in the middle of sandy nowhere. As 
the movie opens, Carter is getting ready to sell his family's prized 
racehorse, but is interrupted from the deal by a phone call from Vinnie, who 
orders him to come cross-country to see him. Carter immediately hops on a 
plane.
With the possible exception of Hugh Grant, millionaires don't often abandon 
their busy schedules to visit shady bums, so what strange hold does Vinnie 
have on Carter? After a lot of unspecific talk about 'the past", we learn 
that years ago the two men were involved together in gambling and bribery 
scams, and Vinnie has always held onto proof of these illegal actions that 
could destroy Carter's credibility in legitimate circles. Since Vinnie is 
more than a little unstable, Carter does not want to upset him, and appeases 
his old friend as much as he can. We get the sense that this arrangement has 
been going for quite some time -- Vinny making threats, Carter giving him 
things to keep him quiet.
Things may not, however, be so simple this time. Vinny is really starting to 
act like he'll do something with his evidence; perhaps he'll expose Carter, 
perhaps just re-open old wounds for the man's wife Rosie (Sharon Stone), 
whose part in her husband's extortion rackets left her permanently 
emotionally scarred.
Right there is, more or less, the whole story of "Simpatico", which unfolds 
in an odd manner: Characters pop up onscreen now and again talking about 
secretive things the audience don't know anything about. Flashbacks appear, 
to explain tiny pieces of the puzzle. Then come moments of quiet reflection.
While this deliberately perplexing method of storytelling must have seemed 
like a hot idea to the filmmakers, because it lets them stretch their meagre 
plot out to feature length, it leaves the audience at a loss to understand 
whether or not the actors' performances are any good. We're never let know 
what the motivations of the characters are, let alone whether these 
motivations are being played convincingly. Nolte and Bridges do a lot of 
grunting and shouting; Stone appears far too late in the film for her 
passionate anger to redeem the dullness of the script. Albert Finney, playing 
a man Vinnie and Carter ruined, does a lot of weird babbling in a typically 
terrible American accent; Catherine Keener, as a checkout girl who never 
wanted to be involved with a bunch of crooks, switches between tough cookie 
and gullible simpleton, often within the same scene. Maybe all this made 
sense in the Sam Shepard stage play upon which "Simpatico" is based. It 
doesn't in the movie.
This would have been a fascinating piece of work if the plot had been 
outlined in the opening twenty minutes, and the rest of the script had 
focused on the characters. Who are these people? Who were they? How do they 
feel about each other? How did the consequences of their swindles 
specifically affect them? "Simpatico" ignores all these potentially 
interesting avenues, trying to work on the level of its mystery alone -- 
mystery that isn't mysterious, just confusing.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, The UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Bless the Child (2000)

Bless the Child     *1/2
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on January 5, 2001; 
certificate 18; 107 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:120
Directed by Chuck Russell; produced by Mace Neufeld.
Written by Clifford Green, Ellen Green, Tom Rickman; based on the novel 
by Cathy Cash Spellman.
Photographed by Peter Menzies Jr; edited by Alan Heim.
After winning an Oscar for "L.A. Confidential", Kim Basinger had a baby 
and took a rest from movies for three years. This is not a great way to 
return. "Bless the Child" is yet another shoddy and uninteresting movie 
about dark forces -- throw it onto the pile with "Stigmata" and "Book of 
Shadows: Blair Witch 2".
Basinger stars as Maggie O'Connor, a psychiatric nurse left to raise her 
young niece Cody (Holliston Coleman) when her heroin-addicted sister 
Jenna (Angela Bettis) skips town. The child is quiet and withdrawn -- 
autistic, everyone assumes, until she's kidnapped by a gang of 
Satan-worshipping child killers who have discovered she's the Second 
Coming, and want to use her power for evil.
The first half of the movie involves Basinger's raising of the child; 
it's dumb in its hammy dialogue and cliched, obvious scenes of creepy
noises coming from nowhere clear, but so familiar it's somewhat 
involving, and contains the potential to turn into good pulp fiction. 
Structural elements are stolen from "The Exorcist", and hey, if you're 
gonna steal, steal from the best.
Ah, but it turns to vinegar. It's annoying stupid, not fun stupid. There 
are a parade of vulgar scenes depicting the kid's greatness, showing her 
bring birds back to life and light candles through telekinesis, during 
which I thought, shouldn't the child of God be a wise and kind-hearted 
revolutionary, rather than a smug little kid pulling Houdini tricks? 
Several moments defy common sense, such as one in which a cult defector 
sits in a cafe giving Basinger information, and in run a bunch of 
Satanists who give the defector chase and don't think to touch Basinger 
at all. The movie wants us to take it seriously, and yet there are 
sneering villains, guns waved around, and cars dangling off bridges.
It's funny at times -- how could it not be when one of the baddies is a 
ludicrously stone-faced Mrs. Danvers clone, the climax takes place in a 
cobweb-filled haunted house, and at one point knitting needles are used 
as murder weapons? At other times it's just sick -- you can't laugh too 
hard when you're watching Devil-worshippers burning homeless people to 
death and committing ritual infanticide.
One other thing -- the special effects are terrible. They look like 
pieces of cartoon superimposed over live action. Five years ago movie 
visuals were so perfect that mentioning them in reviews seemed 
redundant. Nowadays they almost always suck. A sign, perhaps, that the 
digital revolution ain't all it's cracked up to be?
COPYRIGHT 2001 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
The UK Critic is located at www.ukcritic.com

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Warner Bros on June 2, 2000; certificate 12; 118 
minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Roger Christian; produced by Elie Samaha, Jonathan D. Crane, John 
Travolta.
Written by Corey Mandell, J.D. Shapiro; based on the novel by L. Ron Hubbard.
Photographed by Giles Nuttgens; edited by Robin Russell.
I sometimes get angry, looking at the smug cynicism of organisations like the 
Golden Raspberry Awards and www.thestinkers.com, which exist to discuss bad 
movies. After a while they forget about their purpose, and just rip into 
everything they can, regardless of the quality. It takes a movie like 
"Battlefield Earth" to remind us why they were formed in the first place; 
it's a big-scale disaster that brings back memories of all the shoddy 
space-opera crap that came out when I was a kid in the 80s. Watching those 
grainy tapes in the early days of VHS, I wondered what the same crappy 
special effects and drab colours would look like on the big screen. Now I 
know.
"Battlefield Earth" is based on a novel by L. Ron Hubbard, the founder of the 
new-age religion Scientology, but if the book contains any moral messages or 
symbols, then they've been lost in the transition to the screen, in favour of 
dimensionless sci-fi. The story takes place in the year 3000. An alien race, 
the Psychlos, has taken over Earth, and man is an endangered species. The few 
humans who are not enslaved in manual labour camps roam the countryside, 
hunting for food and making weird noises, like cavemen.
The hero of the movie is one of these Neanderthal chaps, Johnny Goodboy Tyler 
(Barry Pepper), who announces, in his own grunting way, that he is going to 
find the Psychlos, arrange a revolt against them and reclaim the planet. When 
his plan gets underway, Johnny comes to the attention of Terl (John Travolta) 
and Ker (Forest Whitaker), two chiefs of staff in the Psychlos' security 
command. They try to stop him by keeping him busy, having him mine gold for 
them in some kind of secret corrupt operation.
Humans grumble, aliens snarl, and then there's an action climax that attempts 
to rip off the Death Star attack in "Star Wars" but looks more like an Atari 
game. Throughout everything, plot holes and contradictions abound. At the 
start of the movie, everyone has to wear breathing apparatus resembling big 
lines of snot, because Earth air is unbreathable -- people are even executed 
by being deprived of their tubes. Next thing you know, Terl comes up with his 
idea of having humans mine for gold, because they don't need breathing 
apparatus. Eh? How about the fact that the Psychlos are obviously a bunch of 
incompetents who can be defeated by rebellious cavemen, and yet they 
apparently conquered all human armies in nine minutes? Why doesn't Terl have 
a clue about human levels of intelligence or behaviour patterns, when he has 
a computer programme full of details about our languages, history, biology 
and technology? Why does Terl want to mine gold, when it is a worthless 
substance to the Psychlos? Why does Johnny seize Terl's gun, make a rousing 
speech about how human comrades should fight for freedom, then return the gun 
and go back to work??
The production values are just as inexplicable. Travolta and Whitaker are 
virtually unrecognisable underneath pounds of rotten makeup, they talk like 
drunkards telling jokes, and they wear codpieces that restrict their 
movements. And everything is seen in tilt shots or slow motion, through a 
pall of bluish mist that makes everything look grubby. Although special 
effects have improved dramatically in the last twenty years, those in 
"Battlefield Earth" are a throwback to worse times -- the soundtrack is made 
up of distorted echoes, and the visuals are a collection of blurred model 
shots and weird-looking props scattered around cheap sets.
The movie is so outrageously, spectacularly, unbelievably bad that we stare 
at it with some sort of appalled curiosity. It fails on so many levels that 
it's fascinating, although not so much that I'd sit through it again. 
Remember all that "Who Shot JR?" merchandise? Maybe one day they'll also have 
T-shirts and bumper stickers declaring "I SAT THROUGH BATTLEFIELD EARTH!"
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Manchester City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on January 21, 2000; certificate PG; 132 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Chris Columbus; produced by Michael Barnathan, Chris Columbus, 
Gail Katz, Lawrence Mark, Neal Miller, Wolfgang Petersen, Mark Radcliffe.
Written by Nicholas Kazan; based on the short story by Isaac Asimov and the 
novel "The Positronic Man" by Isaac Asimov and Robert Silverberg.
Photographed by Phil Meheux; edited by Neal Travis.
"Bicentennial Man" made my thoughts and responses clash -- I knew that its 
plot was stupid, but even as the fact nagged at me, the movie held my 
attention. Its premise is one that has appeared in several movies already, 
and is one that I always react against; but somehow I got enough out of the 
picture to leave with a smile on my face.
Robin Williams stars as Andrew, a big metal robot in the shape of a human 
being. Remember the maid in the TV cartoon show "The Jetsons"? Just like 
that. Andrew is bought by a well-to-do family man (Sam Neill), who notices 
that his new machine is displaying signs of emotion and creativity; it carves 
cute little models for the man's children, for example, and points out which 
one is its favourite.
The businessman is kind-hearted and patient, not to mention open-minded, and 
so decides to treat Andrew as a 'he', not an 'it'. He converses with the 
robot, trying to figure out just how much humanity there is inside its head, 
eventually coming to treat it as one of the family. The man allows Andrew to 
wear clothes, keep the income from the things he builds, and ask questions 
about any topic he feels curious about.
Time moves on, the man and his wife pass away, their children grow up, and so 
on and so forth. Andrew, immortal of course, since he wasn't made in Taiwan, 
stays alive throughout; observing a great deal of humanity, absorbing it, and 
becoming more human. He searches the globe for other robots displaying signs 
of emotional life, and while he doesn't find any, Andrew does run into a 
scientist (Oliver Platt) who agrees to help him become actually physically 
human.
This is a grand journey, that, as the movie's title suggests, takes two 
hundred years to complete. So "Bicentennial Man" has a lot of ground to 
cover, and that leads to one of its stylistic downfalls -- events are skimmed 
over, relationships are suggested rather than portrayed, and the piece is 
tied together with constant soppy music.
With no strong structure to sweep us away, what gets our attention is the 
IDEA of what is happening, and the idea is stupid. Like "D.A.R.Y.L.", 
"Bicentennial Man" doesn't seem to understand that no matter how much its 
characters accept it, and how insistently it forces the notion upon us, the 
concept of a robot developing human features is just not plausible. A 
computer is a device that follows programmed instructions; a living brain is 
an organic member that can grow, learn, and process metaphysical ideas. Of 
all the movies about computers with minds of their own, only "Demon Seed", a 
1977 thriller starring Julie Christie, has made any attempt to remember these 
simple facts.
So what did I get out of "Bicentennial Man"? Well, it features plenty of 
amusing scenes in which Williams uses a robot's cold logic to try to figure 
out the disorganised way humans behave. The joke doesn't wear out its welcome 
because human life has so many different facets, and there's comic potential 
in every one. I also loved the visual style of this movie, which is set 
between the years 2005 and 2205, but doesn't shove overblown space-age 
fantasy designs down our throats. It takes a stunningly sensible approach to 
how the technology and fashions of the next two centuries are likely to 
develop, and the production design never calls attention to itself as 
'futuristic' -- it's present as realistic background. 
While the wretchedness of its premise bothered my in every scene, the 
wonderful look and feel of this picture delighted me just as often. I dreaded 
a mawkish performance from Williams (it has been less than a year since 
"Patch Adams"), but the limitations of his character keep him in check, and 
he serves as a charming lead in this creative and pretty original piece of 
work. The brief, impersonal structure makes the events in "Bicentennial Man" 
seem cold; the aesthetics make them amazing. Funny. Andrew probably 
experiences the world in rather a similar way.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Love's Labour's Lost (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Manchester City Centre)
Released in the UK by Pathe on 31 March, 2000; certificate U; 93 minutes;
counties of origin UK/USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Kenneth Branagh; produced by David Barron, Kenneth Branagh.
Written by Kenneth Branagh; based on the play by William Shakespeare.
Photographed by Alex Thomson; edited by Daniel Farrell, Neil Farrell.
Kenneth Branagh's "Love's Labour's Lost" conceives many good ideas on how to
inject life into one of Shakespeare's most inane plays, then spoils them with
bizarre execution. It's one thing to intersperse the Bard's original dialogue
with Busby Berkeley-style musical numbers, and quite another to fill the
frame with actors who look like they've been smoking crack.
In the story, a young king (Alessandro Nivola) forms a pact with several
countrymen, who pledge to lock themselves away for three years and dedicate
their attentions to study. They will sleep only three hours per night, fast
frequently and avoid female company. It's a bit like boarding school, I
guess, except without the buggery.
The early scenes show words of concern coming from Berowne, the character
played by Branagh, who doubts whether he and his chums will be able to live
without romance. This is an accurate prediction, and soon he and the king, as
well as fellow scholars Dumaine (Adrian Lester) and Longaville (Matthew
Lillard), are bewitched by the charms of four French ladies -- Princess
(Alicia Silverstone), Rosaline (Natasha McElhone), Maria (Carmen Ejogo) and
Katherine (Emily Mortimer).
Neither the play nor the film explain what possessed the king to lock himself
away -- is it intentional that the man seems mad? If so, why do none of the
characters ever mark his insanity? More importantly, what is supposed to be
so entertaining about men and women sending each other messages of love,
shuffling away tittering, discussing the process and then repeating it?
That's the ridiculous game that fills most of "Love's Labour's Lost". Hardly
Shakespeare's finest hour.
Because its story is so very lame, I was grateful for the film's singing and
dancing -- at least some energy is brought to the proceedings. Wouldn't you
rather hear songs such as "Cheek to Cheek" and "There's No Business Like Show
Business" than the frivolous chatter of sub-standard Elizabethan drama? The
movie's problem is its excess of reaction shots, and its performers'
over-the-top gestures, bulging eyes and sweeping hand movements. Especially
irritating is Timothy Spall, who attempts to be a jester by way of an
embarrassing fake Spanish accent and clumsy walk.
Branagh loves the work of William Shakespeare, and UNDERSTANDS it, which is
why his screen adaptations garner so much acclaim. "Hamlet" (1996) was one of
cinema's great directorial achievements. "Love's Labour's Lost" is a film of
ingenious concepts put into practice with disappointing clumsiness.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Filth and the Fury, The (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by Film Four on May 26, 2000; certificate 15; 107 minutes; 
country of origin UK; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Julien Temple; produced by Anita Camarata, Amanda Temple.
Edited by Niven Howe.
A documentary with interviews of Paul Cook, Steve Jones, Johnny Lyden, Glen 
Matlock, Malcolm McLaren, Nancy Spungen and Sid Vicious.
No, I'm afraid Johnny Rotten is wrong: the Sex Pistols were not the first 
band to provide anthems for the young discontented. And their gigs were not 
the first opportunity for females to express individuality. But thank God 
they thought so, because their self-importance spurred them on, and as they 
became more extreme, they pissed off all the right people. It wasn't exactly 
a case of their lyrics exposing the depravity or hypocrisy of the British 
establishment; their outrageousness provoked it into exposing itself.
Consider: At one point during the group's short life, in the period of 
1977-78, one London city councillor was riled enough to declare that they 
would be "much improved by sudden death". When their controversial single 
"God Save the Queen" rose to Number One on the British charts, it was denied 
a listing, leaving the top spot blank. And who could forget their infamous 
live television appearance with Bill Grundy, where they exploited his 
drunkenness by slipping swear words into the conversation. Grundy, half 
asleep, thought he was having a calm chat; the audience was outraged. 
Julien Temple's "The Filth and the Fury" is a masterful new documentary about 
the fuss the Sex Pistols caused, which takes us through the above events and 
many more. It's one helluva colourful history. The title comes from one of a 
multitude of angry tabloid headlines, that sit in public record as a reminder 
of what a ridiculous fuss the reaction to the Pistols was. They of course 
found it delightful, because pushing the buttons of stuffed shirts gave them 
a thrill, and everyone who took a stern line on them ended up looking 
foolish. "The Filth and the Fury" shows this well. For anyone who thinks 
violent thoughts at the sight of Daily Mail reporters or conservative MPs, 
it's a movie that inspires applause, and giggles of subversive glee.
The story of the Pistols has been told in two previous feature-length 
documentaries, "The Great Rock and Rock 'n Roll Swindle" (1980) and "D.O.A." 
(1981). "Swindle" was reportedly manipulated into a piece of self-exaltation 
by the band's control-freak manager, Malcolm McLaren, and most critics 
rejected "D.O.A." as obvious junk. Since "The Filth and The Fury" has been 
made twenty years after the events it depicts, Temple, the director, has the 
benefit of hindsight, maturity, and access to a bigger collection of footage 
than ever before.
His film sets up a historical context for its tale, depicting the atmosphere 
of Britian in the 70s, when garbage piled up in central London, protests 
about everything dominated the news, the National Front gained support and 
wild fashions offered people an escape from reality. The Sex Pistols did not 
solve this with revolutionary profundity, but you have do give them credit 
for a dirty and aggressive form of artistic expression that was much more 
in-keeping with the spirit of the time than cheery disco music. Screaming 
about anarchy and wearing torn leathers simply made more sense than longing 
for "Night Fever" over a blow-drier.
Temple takes this idea too far when he cuts between the Pistols sizzling 
onstage and such images as the stand-up comedy of Ken Dodd and the 
over-the-top celebrations of the Queen's Silver Jubilee. He's trying to show 
how awesome the greatness of the band was against the cheesy culture of its 
time, but this is the one argument in the film that doesn't ring true, 
because we're never convinced that the excerpts we see are truly emblematic 
of that culture. Think about it -- you could take clips of a Peter Kaye 
routine and public grief over Princess Diana, and intercut them with a Blur 
performance of "Song 2". It wouldn't prove anything about the 90s.
This is a minor quibble, because the Sex Pistols' songs are strong enough to 
give power to the film without having to serve as a rebuttal for lesser art. 
Reviews shovelling the old cliché that you can enjoy the movie without being 
a fan seem to have been written by critics who either liked the music but 
felt silly afterward, or got a headache from the movie but didn't want to 
look square for denouncing it on that basis. "The Filth and the Fury" revels 
in Pistols iconography, and if you hate that, you'll hate the picture.
But I love the Sex Pistols -- their filth, their fury, their irony, energy, 
edge. And as long as viewers go without an aversion to the band, they should 
find "The Filth and the Fury" to be a work of greatness. The film mixes 
present-day interviews with archive footage shot on primitive videotape, but 
it's not like every other music documentary doing that -- the audio from the 
interviews is mostly overlayed over the old film clips, and so everything 
happens in our head, like a radio play. The few times the new interviews are 
shown onscreen, the faces are in silhouette, and the photographic style 
matches the grainy, pixelated stuff -- so we're never conscious of the film 
transitions, and the hypnotic spell is unbroken.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Manchester)
Released in the UK by UIP on May 5, 2000; certificate 15; 119 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Miloš Forman; produced by Danny DeVito, Michael Shamberg, Stacey 
Sher.
Written by Scott Alexander, Larry Kawaszewski.
Photographed by Anastas Michos; edited by Linzee Klingman, Christopher 
Tellefsen.
The comedian Andy Kaufman was perpetually aware that a performance was not 
just a piece of material, but an event, happening in a time and place. He 
wanted his audiences to have an experience; to know they were in the room, 
watching somebody putting on a show. People didn't always applaud his 
outrageousness as they watched it, but he always got laughs somehow. Maybe 
they would laugh AT him. Or chuckle afterward, in disbelief. Or make their 
friends crack up by telling them what he did. The sheer lunacy and audacity 
of his acts was hilarious; maybe not first-hand, but certainly in concept, 
when you stopped to think about them.
After all, Kaufman is the guy who once went onstage, read "The Great Gatsby" 
in its entirety, then walked off. Whose act once consisted of standing in 
silence through the "Mighty Mouse" theme song, except for the "Here I come to 
save the day!" line, which he'd mouth along to. And who, to close a concert 
in the gigantic Carnegie Hall, took all the spectators out for milk and 
cookies. Kaufman was always pulling gags you had to experience, even if that 
required you to be the butt of them. When he died of cancer in 1984, many 
thought it was just another practical joke.
There are of course those who hail him as a genius. His detractors find him 
confounding. Future generations can make up their minds by watching Miloš 
Forman's "Man on the Moon", a film which some have described, unfairly, as a 
sort of Greatest Hits compilation reel. Yes, the film has a straightforward 
structure in chronological order, and is mostly made up of its hero's onstage 
appearances. But it is therefore a faithful and successful presentation of a 
very interesting character, leaving us to love or hate him at will. The 
surprising thing is that so many of Kaufman's antics are amusing in 
themselves, and not just as ideas. This is a very funny picture.
It's also a deeply moving screen biography, following years of success right 
through to times of pain, and made by some of the masters of the bio-pic 
genre. Forman, the director, was also the helmsman on the Oscar-winning 
Mozart epic "Amadeus" (1984), as well as "The People Vs. Larry Flynt" (1996), 
a movie about the controversial publisher of "Hustler" magazine. The 
screenwriters, Scott Alexander and Larry Karszewski, wrote both "Flynt" and 
"Ed Wood" (1994). And Jim Carrey is a terrific choice for the starring role. 
It's his second performance as a dramatic lead, and he proves that his turn 
in "The Truman Show" was no flash in the pan, letting his eyes and voice 
become possessed by his character. His appearance always seems a little odd, 
but that's kinda the point. Anybody who knew Andy Kaufman will tell you that 
he was always "on"; his mind was always pushing something new up his sleeve, 
he made you keep your guard up. "There is no real you," one of the characters 
tells him. That character is his wife.
Of course the essential problem with any film about this man is that it 
explains somebody who refused to be explained. Figuring out what Kaufman was 
up to was part of the fun. Then again, on his deathbed he did ask for a movie 
to be made about his life. Maybe he did think it was important to be 
understood. He just thought that speaking for himself would be a cop-out.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Three to Tango (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Warner Bros. on June 30, 2000; certificate 12; 98 
minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Damon Santostefano; produced by Bobby Newmyer, Jeffrey Silver, 
Bettina Sofia Viviano.
Written by Aline Brosh McKenna, Rodney Vaccaro.
Photographed by Walt Lloyd; edited by Stephen Semel.
I've had slightly over a week to consider "Three to Tango", and the 
realisation hits me that it must not be called useless. This is a movie that 
will satisfy the curiosity of anyone wondering what it's like to be stuck in 
the cold next to a drunken alien at a bus stop for an hour and a half, who 
laughs at his own bad jokes despite the fact they don't have logical 
progression or punch lines.
I myself have never fantasised about that particular experience, and 
therefore found the movie an ordeal. The plot has nothing to do with aliens, 
but might as well have done, so strange are the actions of its humans. 
Matthew Perry stars as Oskar Novak, an architect asked by a millionaire 
client (Dylan McDermott) to make sure his mistress (Neve Campbell) doesn't 
get up to any mischief when out of sight. McDermott feels safe in this 
because he thinks that Perry is gay.
What we have here is yet another example of what James Blish called the Idiot 
Plot -- a story that would be over in a second if anybody in it had an 
inkling of brainpower. Dialogue tortuously contrives to avoid stumbling on 
the obvious truth that Perry ain't homosexual. McDermott and Campbell 
inexplicably laugh him off when he tries to clear matters up. And then later 
Perry gives a newspaper interview about the difficulties of being a gay 
professional -- why??
Much of the humour in "Three to Tango" is based around misunderstandings. 
Aside from the central dilemma, there are countless scenes where people 
mistake innocent suggestions for sexual propositions, such as when a 
secretary overhears Perry and his business associate (Oliver Platt) tell each 
other "We're partners, and proud of it!", or Perry when idly asks a guy at a 
party "What are you doing later?" Ho, ho, ho. This sort of thing could have 
been made funny in the 1930s, when there was more of a naivete to cinema, but 
now that trends of filmmaking and acting edge so much closer to realism, 
onscreen stupidity is rarely amusing and often embarrassing.
Nothing in "Three to Tango" makes sense. It's weird. Perry gets home to find 
Platt dancing around his apartment, sniffing his fingers and displaying a 
spiky hairdo. "What are you doing?" Perry asks. Platt's answer: "I was 
bored!"  Previously, we opened on shot of them walking down a street chanting 
animal noises, to psyche themselves up for work. The most inane moment comes 
when Perry runs through town, chickens are thrown at him from offscreen, by 
no one, for no reason. He stops, looks at the camera, and carries on running. 
What was going on in the mind of the director when he ordered those chickens 
thrown? Did he really think it would have us rolling in the ailes?
I will resist making a cheap crack about the main actors being television 
stars, because they've done good work in movies before, and there's just no 
opportunity for them to breathe life into this indefensible material. One 
more oddity to wonder about, though: where does the title come from? There 
are either two or five main characters, depending on how you look at it, but 
not three. I can picture the story conferences, where savvy executives no 
doubt realised that if they were going to greenlight a project in which 
nothing made sense, it couldn't do any more harm to name it after an 
unrelated song.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on April 14, 2000; certificate PG; 113 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Brian De Palma; produced by Tom Jacobson.
Written by Lowell Cannon, Jim Thomas, John Thomas, Graham Yost.
Photographed by Stephen H. Burum; edited by Paul Hirsch.
"Mission to Mars" is too long-winded and stone-faced to be intended as 
comedy, and yet I wonder how anyone could expect us to take it seriously. 
This is one of the most ridiculous sci-fi movies ever made, which is no mean 
feat, considering all the trashy B-pictures of the 1950s and zombie flicks of 
the 80s. 
The tone is set early on, by clunky passages of dialogue designed to get the 
audience up to speed on the plot. An example: "Hey, man, you must be feeling 
really upset now, because this used to be your mission. Jeez, if only your 
wife hadn't died, and you hadn't gotten so depressed and had to pull out." 
Give me a break.
The speaker is Luke Graham (Don Cheadle), an astronaut preparing to go on a 
four-man mission to Mars. His team's goal is to research the feasibility of 
human colonisation. When drilling for water on the red planet, his partners 
come under the spell of a giant face-shaped sculpture, which sucks them into 
a sandstorm reminiscent of last year's "The Mummy" and disembowels them.
News of the deaths reaches NASA headquarters. Soon afterward radio contact is 
lost. A new quartet, played by Gary Sinise, Jerry O'Connell, Tim Robbins and 
Connie Nielsen, are sent to the rescue. The three of them who survive the 
trip find Graham with Christ-like hair and beard, ranting and raving about 
the mystical life forces that guide us, or something. Everybody gathers round 
to look at the big sculpture, and through guesswork so miraculous that it 
must be based on telepathy from the gods, they suss out how to enter it 
safely.
This illogical business leads to an amazing moment in which the film's heroes 
discover an alien learning zone; it's a visually arresting scene, but too 
little too late to save this silly movie. Want to know why only three of the 
four rescue pilots make it to Mars? Because halfway through their journey 
they abandon ship and decide to float through outer space to another one. 
Robbins is unable to manoeuvre himself successfully -- what a surprise, I 
thought the task would be something anyone could pull off with ease!
They've taken the drastic measure because of an emergency onboard their 
rocket, which emerges completely nonsensically, when O'Connell is typing an 
instruction into the ship's computer. For no particular reason, the keyboard 
breaks, and in an unfathomable development, this causes the cabin to start 
losing pressure. At first we don't even realise there's any danger, partly 
because of the situation's implausibility, but mainly due to the scene's lack 
of urgency. The characters drift around without any panic, talking things 
over in technical jargon, as a slow, toneless organ tune plays on the sound 
track. Odd for most movies, typical of this one.
"Mission to Mars" was directed by Brian De Palma, who once made pictures like 
"Carrie", "Blow Out" and "Scarface". Watching it, I was reminded of a 
television interview with Quentin Tarantino, in which he mentioned that a lot 
of good filmmakers lose their creativity, and end up doing bad studio 
vehicles just for the pay packet. I hope De Palma isn't going down that road. 
But surely even Tarantino, who is one of the director's greatest fans, will 
recognise that "Mission to Mars" is not a good sign.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Thomas and the Magic Railroad (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Manchester City Centre)
Released in the UK by Alliance Atlantis on July 14, 2000; certificate U; 85 
minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Britt Allcroft; produced by Britt Allcroft, Phil Fehrle.
Written by Britt Allcroft.
Photographed by Paul Ryan; edited by Ron Wisman.
To begin, some background information: "Thomas the Tank Engine" was a strange 
and wonderful British TV show for children, first broadcast when I was 
growing up in the 1980s, and still popular today. It took place at a railway 
station, where every day virtuous steam engines and malevolent diesel trains 
would pull in to tell the one human character, Fat Controller, what scrapes 
they'd been getting into. It was innocent fantasy, complete with a great 
theme tune, and narration by Ringo Starr.
Now it has been adapted to the big screen in a movie that shows why 
'Americanisation' is a pejorative term. "Thomas and the Magic Railroad" is 
nonsensical, cheesy, saccharine drivel, with all the charm of its source 
material removed, and the low-tech special effects kept in. The original 
television programme was on a limited budget, and so the trains were plastic 
models with stationary painted-on expressions that talked without moving 
their mouths. This is a big Hollywood movie, but uses the same technique, 
despite having computer graphics for its other sections.
The movie's shabby, mismatched visual style prevents its multiple story 
threads from coming together, and creates a schizophrenic tone, especially as 
characters zoom across different worlds "Alice in Wonderland"-style without 
ever looking shocked. There are scenes in 'reality' -- where a reclusive 
railway tycoon, Burnett Stone (Peter Fonda), is being visited by his 
granddaughter Lily (Mara Wilson). Their time together is interrupted by a 
distress call from the film's main character, Mr. Conductor (Alec Baldwin), a 
midget pixie who uses a magic whistle to transport himself across the 
multiple universes he inhabits.
These include Shining Time -- a whitewashed theme park of a town, whose 
residents wear zombie-like smiles and uniform clothing -- and the Island of 
Sodor, which resembles episodes of "Thomas the Tank Engine" but has nothing 
to do with anything else in the movie. The plot follows Mr. Conductor's 
search for gold dust, which he needs to power his whistle. Efforts to 
resupply keep getting thwarted by naughty trains like Diesel, Splatter and 
Dodge, and he must speak to flowers, send supernatural spells to dogs and do 
a lot of other incomprehensible stuff to succeed.
I found this hard to follow. Kids will be so confused you might as well hand 
them the work of Plato in the original Ancient Greek tablets. The actors 
deserve sympathy, too, because they had to pretend that it all made sense. 
Baldwin is the most embarrassing -- wandering around on his own, attempting 
to breathe excitement into nothing in particular, talking as if to an 
imaginary friend. Fonda delivers a ridiculous series of sentimental, deadly 
serious speeches; he looks like he's trying to win an Oscar, even though his 
lines are all similar to the following: "Lady was the best steam engine in 
the world... ah, how I loved her... and my wife loved her, too... but Diesel 
chased her... and her coal all ran out! O God!"
"Thomas and the Magic Railroad" was written, produced and directed by a 
first-time helmsman named Britt Allcroft. He should be ashamed of himself. 
Projects like this -- incompetent and tortuous, but advertised as 'family 
entertainment' -- not only insult children's intelligence, but eat away at 
them, causing devastation. Kids will approach it with high expectations, 
because of love for the TV show; then refuse to believe it's bad, convince 
themselves that it must be good, and that they just weren't paying attention. 
Then they will slowly realise that, no, it WAS bad, and that they have been 
cheated and fooled.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Mansfield Park (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on March 31, 2000; 
certificate 15; 110 minutes; country of origin UK; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Patricia Rozema; produced by Sarah Curtis.
Written by Patricia Rozema; based on the novel "Mansfield Park", letters and 
early journals by Jane Austen.
Photographed by Michael Coulter; edited by Martin Walsh.
One of these days I must train myself to read the novels of Jane Austen. So 
many people love them, but as of yet, I've been unable to comprehend them. 
Her sentences are too long for me, and written in complex structures of 
defunct words -- unless I pause to absorb each one individually, they run 
past me like a foreign language. Thank goodness for film adaptations.
The latest is "Mansfield Park", written and directed by Patricia Rozema, and 
based on the book Austen was most proud of, as well as the author's letters 
and early journals. The nature of the additional source material means the 
movie's heroine is more like the real Austen than the character in the book. 
This can't be too harmful, since most writers impose their own desires and 
values on the protagonists of their stories.
The girl's name is Fanny Price (Frances O'Connor), whose mother sent her away 
as a child, to live with her rich aunt Lady Bertram (Lindsay Duncan) in the 
lavish country estate of Mansfield Park. Fanny has grown up knowing her place 
-- when to say "Yes, ma'am" or shuffle off in a corner -- but releases her 
emotions through story writing, and confiding in her cousin Edmund (Jonny Lee 
Miller).
"Mansfield Park" is a generally light and funny film which invites us to 
watch Fanny handle the coldness and pressure of her priggish relatives, and 
not only survive, but somehow prevail. I have no idea how much of this comes 
from the novel, and it's hard for me to analyse the film from that angle. 
This is not a position I enjoy. I feel out of my depth when watching a film 
based on a famous book that I haven't read. It's as if I'm missing some 
necessary piece of general knowledge.
I suppose I must, however, try to respond to some of the charges that have 
been levelled at Rozema's picture, which has become notorious among Austen 
purists (some of whom may even have seen it). One thing people are up in arms 
about is the making of Fanny into a writer. From my ignorant point of view, 
this makes perfect sense: Since Fanny's environment prevents her from 
shouting out her thoughts, and a movie cannot contain a narration telling us 
what's going on in her head, we understand her feelings through what she 
writes.
Another controversy surrounds the way Rozema explicitly reveals that 
Mansfield Park profits from the slave trade, something that was only hinted 
at in the book. Again I would argue that this is unavoidable: In film, if 
something isn't on screen, it isn't anywhere, and besides, Austen wouldn't 
have insinuated something if she'd wanted us to ignore it.
Then there are the claims regarding Rozema's sex scenes -- which are 
ridiculous, because no such moments exist! There is one brief glimpse of a 
breast, very late on in the film, as an incidental character is caught en 
flagrante. But plenty of hack journalists are making out that this is some 
sort of wild bonkfest, with Fanny Price leading the way.
Ah, sigh. There will always be cretins who invent falsities to get their 
names in print. All I can say is that "Mansfield Park" is an enjoyable piece 
of cinema, with charming performances and rich, colourful photography. It 
hasn't dissuaded me from attempting the Austen novels a few more times.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on January 7, 2000; 
certificate 18; 121 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Martin Scorsese; produced by Barbara De Fina, Scott Rudin.
Written by Paul Schrader; based on the novel by Joe Connelly.
Photographed by Robert Richardson; edited by Thelma Schoonmaker.
Go long enough without sleep and you don't just feel tired, you feel like 
you're in another world. Hot and cold take turns to surge through your body 
as you stagger and yawn. You mumble nonsense, speak with great clarity, then 
relapse into mumbling again. Your eyes open and close like frustrated 
curtains as you drift between alertness and snoozing. The self-destructive 
feelings are heightened if you haven't eaten, and are surviving on cigarette 
smoke, or coffee, or booze. Trust me. I have experience in this area.
Frank Pierce, the New York City ambulance driver played by Nicolas Cage in 
"Bringing Out the Dead", lives like this for weeks on end. He sees himself as 
a "grief mop", paid to bear witness to hopeless situations, and it's damaging 
him. He gets through the long days and nights on a diet of whisky, coffee and 
Marlboros, begging his boss to fire him because he hasn't got the energy to 
quit.
The film has been written by Paul Schrader and directed by Martin Scorsese, 
and has been unfairly compared to their 1976 masterpiece "Taxi Driver". Both 
pictures feature angst-ridden insomniac protagonists who look out at the 
urban jungle from uncomfortable driver's seats, and both have dizzying images 
of garish neon light. But "Taxi Driver" was about a sensitive Vietnam vet 
whose terrible experiences were turning him into a psychopath; "Bringing Out 
the Dead" follows an essentially good man who is aware and afraid of his 
impending mental collapse.
Once, of course, Frank was good at his job -- acting with skill and speed, 
relishing the satisfaction of saving peoples' lives. Now he wanders around 
like a zombie, essentially performing a taxi service for corpses and crank 
callers. He feels tormented by the ghosts of those who he failed to save, and 
sometimes hears their voices: Particularly haunting is an asthmatic 18-year 
old girl named Rose, whose death signalled the beginning of Frank's unlucky 
streak.
We follow Frank around for three days, and see him work with three other 
ambulance men: Larry (John Goodman), a family man who dreams of starting his 
own private medical service; Marcus (Ving Rhames), who calls himself a 
Christian but has a mischievous spirit; and Tom (Tom Sizemore), who can only 
be described as a nutcase. Each of these men is distinctively written and 
played, and yet, in some odd way, all three shifts seem the same. Whoever's 
in the ambulance with you, it's just another miserable day on the job.
Most of the characters that are revisited by the screenplay revolve in some 
way around Mary (Patricia Arquette), a recovering drug addict who Frank 
thinks he could fall in love with. Her father is in hospital after a heart 
attack. A crazy guy from her neighbourhood keeps putting himself in dangerous 
situations, and winding up in Frank's vehicle. And her former drug dealer is 
given some attention, too. But none of this stuff really signifies much, 
because "Bringing Out the Dead" is told from Frank's point of view, and is 
about his inability to find meaning in anything.
That's not as bleak as it sounds, because the closing shots leave us with the 
impression that Frank will eventually find some peace in his life. But it is 
exhausting, because to get the point across Schrader and Scorsese have had to 
make a two-hour film in which nothing can be seen to develop after the 
initial set-up.
And yet I recommend "Bringing Out the Dead" as a marvellous atmospheric 
achievement. Like Frank, from the opening moments we're immersed in neon 
light and bumpy automobile movements, and in such techniques as jump cuts, 
dissolves, slow-motion, fast-motion and subjective camera. Scorsese's 
instinct to employ Robert Richardson was a good one -- the cinematographer's 
juxtaposition of extreme brightness and darkness create an overpoweringly 
drowsy mood that brings us into Frank's head. Not that it's a particularly 
nice place to be, as Cage demonstrates with his amazing performance -- 
whenever we glimpse him, he's hollow-eyed, desperate, hunched over, hesitant.
There is much dark humour in this movie, arising from the absurdity of some 
of the patients' predicaments, and the twisted games we see medics engage in 
to pass the time. But it's the harsher images that stick in our minds, 
because Scorsese makes us feel like we're seeing them first-hand. John Lennon 
once sung about "a place where nothing is real... where everything flows". 
I'm sure Frank Pierce would love to go there.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, The UK Critic's website, located 
at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Boys Don't Cry (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by Fox on 21 April, 2000; certificate 18; 118 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Kimberly Pierce; produced by John Hart, Jeff Sharp, Eva Kolodner, 
Christine Vachon.
Written by Andy Bienen, Kimberly Pierce.
Photographed by Jim Denault; edited by Tracy Granger, Lee Percy.
"Boys Don't Cry" is a harsh and penetrating study of heartland America, 
powerful enough to earn comparison with "At Close Range" and "The Onion 
Field", two brilliant deliberately messy films about emotional devastation. 
Its early scenes inspire impatience -- they don't seem to be going anywhere, 
and nothing is happening. Then we realise that's the point, and that is 
astonishingly moving.
The film tells the true story of Brandon Teena (Hilary Swank), a guy from 
Nebraska who was actually a girl named Teena Brandon in drag. This is not 
someone merely uncomfortable with his real gender; he's a rolling stone in 
every respect, moving from town to town, mixing with different gangs, 
constantly getting into fights and trouble with the law. He's also forced to 
move on whenever people discover he's not a real 'he', because people are 
always enraged by the deception.
Near the beginning of the movie, Brandon becomes determined to find stability 
among a band of white trash buddies from Falls City, because he falls in love 
at first sight with one of their number, the beautiful Lana (Chlöe Sevigny). 
Most of this group are sad, lonely people with no prospects, who try to 
distract themselves into thinking they're doing something with their lives by 
filling their nights with loud, boozy bravado. Lana doesn't do anything more 
purposeful, but she is a quieter, more peaceful creature, who seems more 
aware of the rut she's in. Brandon is a meek, reserved presence as well, and 
he and Lana get involved in private moments that are quiet enough to allow 
them to talk. Finally they've each found someone to discuss their dreams with.
Does Lana know that Brandon is really a girl? Probably not, although when she 
finds out, it doesn't seem to matter to her, and she does her best to keep 
the fact from her pals. She's in love, and doesn't want to see the beauty of 
that crushed, even though it's inevitable that it will be, considering the 
terrible world that she inhabits. We can tell that Lana's ex-boyfriend John 
(Peter Sarsgaard), a jealous bully with violent mood swings, will eventually 
find out about Brandon's secret, and of course there will then be tragic 
consequences.
That's what "Boys Don't Cry" is about -- how it's impossible to lead lives of 
peace, meaning or value in an atmosphere like the one the film is set in. 
Everyone grows up miserable and confused, and then gets punished for being 
that way. Brandon had no option but to live a lie, Lana couldn't help but 
loving him, and John did not choose to be brought up in an environment of 
bigotry and rage... but their fates have been sealed at birth, and there can 
be no happy endings.
The actors give this startling intimacy. Nobody seems to be playing to the 
camera -- they simply live in their characters' shoes, in the midst of a 
meandering story structure, and then find themselves stuck, as things spiral 
out of control. No other film I've seen has made the problems of white trash 
Americans so real to me. This is not one of those movies where some slutty 
single mom goes across country to find herself, and the audience couldn't 
care less. It is desperate, gritty and animalistic, and by its end there were 
tears in my eyes, because all over America people are living and dying like 
this, and they are trapped, and will be for a long time to come.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Circus (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Warner Village (Birkenhead Conway Park)
Released in the UK by Columbia TriStar on May 5, 2000; certificate 18; 95 
minutes; country of origin UK; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Rob Walker; produced by James Gibb, Alan Latham.
Written by David Logan.
Photographed by Ben Seresin; edited by Oral Norrie Ottey.
The writer of "Circus", David Logan, has such an ability to create 
convolutions that some day he may give us a great gangster picture. This is 
not it. His screenplay features too many twists and turns, from too many 
unexpected angles, for too damn long, and after a while we just groan at 
every new 'surprise'. It's suspenseful in a story when anything can happen. 
It's kind of ridiculous when everything does.
"Circus" is a British movie starring John Hannah as a hit man who is asked by 
an old crime-boss friend (Brian Conley) to run his Brighton casino. Before 
Hannah can take him up on the offer, though, he must take care of one piece 
of unfinished business -- the assassination of a rich man's wife (Amanda 
Donohoe).
We see the killing carried out. Then it transpires there is much more to the 
story. At first we think Hannah's client is entrapping him, but there's 
actually a whole pageant of double-crossing, blackmailing, double-dealing and 
scamming going on behind the scenes. It's far too complicated to go into 
here. When my companion leaned over and said "I've lost the plot!", it wasn't 
a confession of madness.
Actually, it's simple in one sense -- everyone's screwing over everyone else. 
That lets Logan turn out twist after twist, but we soon realise what he's 
doing, and so none of his tricks have the ability to shock us. The plot has 
low credibility anyway, because most of the characters' secret schemes are 
dependent on coincidence, guesswork and chance.
A movie like this needs more than complicated puzzles to keep us involved. It 
requires characters who inspire our fascination. Just look at the colourful 
ensemble in "The Usual Suspects". The people in "Circus" are distinctive, all 
right -- they include a gigantic bodyguard who drives a Mini; a fidgety, 
screw-loose accountant with eccentric dress sense; a debt collector who sings 
all his conversations in the rhythm of old pop songs; and a bank robber who 
dresses in cowboy clothing and experiences coitus interruptus with a hotel 
receptionist who'll "suck you off for twenty quid". But this troupe belongs 
in a comedy sketch show, not a thriller that expects to hold our attention. 
And Hannah, such a soft-spoken everyman, is far too bland for the lead role.
What can I say? At least the film tries hard, is sincere, and has ambition. 
It's better than the ads make it out to be, and if you really can't fight the 
urge to see a gangster film in the cinema this season, "Circus" is a much 
better bet than "Love, Honour and Obey".
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on May 12, 2000; certificate 15; 150 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Ridley Scott; produced by David Franzoni, Branko Lustig, Douglas 
Wick.
Written by David Franzoni, John Logan, William Nicholson; from a story by 
David Franzoni.
Photographed by John Mathieson; edited by Pietro Scalia.
Ridley Scott's "Gladiator" is an interesting and attractive action movie, but 
not a very forceful one. It needs to spend more time with the gladiator 
himself. This is a "hero out for revenge" picture that keeps cutting away to 
its cardboard villain, just as we're starting to cheer on the protagonist. 
It's like channel-hopping between "Spartacus" and "Caligula".
Russell Crowe stars as Maximus, a Roman army general under emperor Marcus 
Aurelius (Richard Harris). Marcus is so impressed by Maximus's leadership 
that he appoints him as his successor. His son Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix) is 
not best pleased by this news, as he himself had expected to be next in line 
for the throne. Commodus kills his father, seizes power, and orders the death 
penalty for Maximus and his family.
Of course, Maximus escapes this fate, but his wife and child do not. Then 
Maximus is kidnapped and sold into slavery. His master, Proximo (Oliver 
Reed), forces him to become a gladiator, and when his military training leads 
to great slaughtering talent, Proximo takes him to Rome, to perform at the 
Coliseum. There the crowd falls in love with him, which forces Commodus into 
an awkward position; yes, he's found Maximus, but he can't deal with him, 
because if he kills him then he'll lose the support of his people.
The movie is basically taken up by Maximus and Commodus doing a lot of 
plotting against each other, punctuated by lofty speeches and gruesome 
fights. That is as it should be. The problem is that we don't spend enough 
time with Maximus -- the film is divided pretty much equally between him and 
the enemy, when it needs to be much more single-minded. Look at "Ben-Hur" or 
"Braveheart" -- these films are driven completely by their heroes' 
determination, and that's why we get emotionally involved. Crowe gives a 
great performance as Maximus -- he has a penetrating stare, commanding voice, 
muscular body and towering demeanour. He's a powerful, passionate Hollywood 
lead, and we want to invest our care in him. We just don't get the chance.
Because "Gladiator" never gets us wrapped up in Maximus's struggle, the 
action sequences are not as tense or affecting as they should be. We can't 
simply enjoy the excitement of the violence, either, because it's not 
stimulating, it's sick. Roman bloodlust is one of the most shameful things in 
history, and Scott, the director, presents it realistically, throwing us into 
the middle of gladiator fights by way of giddy close-ups and shutter speeds, 
while the chants of the despicable onlookers thunder at our ears in stereo 
surround sound.
What we have here, ultimately, is one amazing piece of acting and several 
flourishes of wonderful technique, spoiled by unwanted distractions. The 
overall bold, colourful nature of the filmmaking might have been enough to 
recommend the picture if its better parts hadn't led us to expect something 
superior. Strange: "Gladiator" would have been a more enjoyable movie if it 
had been made with less skill.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale; Screening venue - Odeon (Liverpool City Centre); 
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on 14 January, 1999; 
certificate 18; 136 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Spike Lee; produced by Jon Kilik, Spike Lee.
Written by Victor Colicchio, Michael Imperioli, Spike Lee.
Photographed by Ellen Kuras; edited by Barry Alexander Brown.
It's exciting to own a camera; you can look through your viewfinder and 
comfortably mould life into perfect little rectangular artworks. Click on a 
button, and you've preserved a moment of reality. Cine cameras are even 
better; you've got the means to capture situations in more depth, and hey, 
you're making movies!
The filmmaker Spike Lee got his first cine camera in the Summer of 1977, and 
the imagination of the gifted young New Yorker must have been running wild. 
He must have done a lot of dreaming at that time, a lot of playing with his 
camera, and a lot of important thinking. I'll bet he remembers it well.
Lee's new film "Summer of Sam" is about that summer in his city, and takes a 
lot of time to illustrate the atmosphere. This was the strange, short time 
when disco and punk music were concurrently successful. When the Yankees had 
Reggie Jackson, and were winning the World Series. And when a serial killer 
dubbed 'Son of Sam' was terrorising the Bronx.
'Sam', eventually identified as a crazy mailman named David Berkowitz, 
stalked brunette women, or however they were with, and blew their heads off 
with a .44-caliber pistol. He sent creepy letters about his motives to the 
police, and to newspaper columnist Jimmy Breslin; his case made front-page 
news every day; and he was as hot a topic of conversation as the sun, music 
or baseball.
Among those discussing 'Sam' are Lee's main characters, a bunch of 
Italian-American guys who hang out on a street corner all day, letting 
boredom and poverty lead them into talking a lot of crap. Vinny (John 
Leguizamo) is a chain-smoking, disco-dancing hairdresser who can't help but 
cheat on his wife Dionna (Mira Sorvino). His best friend Ritchie (Adrien 
Brody) is losing popularity in the neighbourhood, because of his punk 
hairstyle and his romance with Ruby (Jennifer Esposito), the local slut. Joey 
T (Michael Rispoli), a drug dealer, and his goon Bobby (Brian Tarantino), 
slouch back and watch everything through arrogant eyes, convinced that 
they're better than all the scum out there, and that they'd kick the crap out 
of anyone who wants to try them. 
Lee plunges into this community and lingers around to see if any themes 
emerge. "Summer of Sam" is partly recollection, and partly a daydream about 
how elements of summer '77 could have driven people crazy. We get chilling 
glimpses into the apartment of Berkowitz himself, witness the tension and 
ignorance of our guys lead to the feeling that someone in their neighbourhood 
MUST be 'Son of Sam', and watch the lynch mob find its justifications for 
singling out an innocent culprit because he is different from the crowd.
"Summer of Sam" displays much fast cutting, grainy nostalgic footage and 
fancy tricks with lighting and loud music; like most of Lee's work, it's a 
visually and aurally engulfing film. As emotions get tenser, the temperature 
gets hotter, Sam takes more victims and people take too many ludes, Lee ups 
the film's pace, volume and reliance on close-ups, leading us into some 
frightening scenes of vigilante scapegoating.
The film is so involving because it seems to be a dance around Lee's memory 
and imagination. Yes, it falls far short of greatness because it's not really 
about all the themes that it brings up. But Lee has already made one strongly 
plotted examination of the way a community can be pushed over the edge in 
summertime, with his 1989 masterpiece "Do the Right Thing". Here he's trying 
something new. Good on him.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, The UK Critic's website, located 
at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Kevin and Perry Go Large (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Icon on 21 April, 2000; certificate 15; 83 minutes; 
country of origin UK/USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Ed Bye; produced by Harry Enfield, Peter Bennett-Jones, Jolyon 
Symonds.
Written by David Cummings, Harry Enfield.
Photographed by Alan Almond; edited by Mark Wybourn.
What we have here is the worst possible way to adapt "Harry Enfield's 
Television Programme" for the big screen. "Kevin & Perry Go Large" simply 
takes the most tiresome and obnoxious routine to ever play on that comedy 
sketch show and spins it out to feature length. Enfield could have given us a 
better film by searching the video vaults of the British Broadcasting 
Corporation for anything he'd previously done, arranging it in any order and 
transferring the result straight to celluloid.
The title characters, played by Enfield and Kathy Burke, are two teenage 
slobs desperate to lose their virginity. Dialogue tells us they are fifteen 
or sixteen years old, but their actions are more suited to retarded infants, 
and it's hardly a surprise that the closest they've got to sex is buying a 
porn magazine from the local corner shop while getting red-faced and 
suppressing giggles. Whenever they see girls they leer, drool and make loud 
whimpering noises like dogs with rabies and bullet wounds.
As fans of computerised 'dance music', the pair decide they will take a 
summer vacation to Ibiza, where English clubs are big, and, according to 
Perry, "It'll be easy to get a shag!" Nobody would ever make love with these 
boys in real life -- their walk is a mixture of hobbling and jumping, they 
talk in gulps, groans and squeaks, and their wrong-size clothes are ugly and 
inside-out. But of course the film must end with some ladies jumping all over 
them, after an 83-minute journey of whatever lame sight gags the filmmakers 
come up with. You can predict every move of a film like this just by looking 
at the trailer.
According to Enfield, who co-wrote, it's a send-up of the teenage years. But 
if satire is the intention the method is too ham-handed and obvious. Kevin 
and Perry say things like "I'm a profound artist waiting to be discovered," 
and we're supposed to laugh just because they're so oblivious to their own 
stupidity.  I find Enfield's own attitude funnier than that of his 
characters. He thinks he's given us a sharp comedic commentary, when he's 
really just created two annoying dopes and surrounded them with toilet 
humour. "Kevin & Perry Go Large" finds grand mirth in close-ups of acne, 
erections, gaping jaws and defecation. The film's most sophisticated running 
joke is that Kevin puts on an awkward James Bond voice whenever he is in 
female company. And what are we supposed to make of the fact that this is a 
professionally-made motion picture featuring an adult man and woman playing 
adolescent boys?
Teenage virginity is indeed embarrassing. I remember my own -- a period in 
which the only thing my friends and I ever thought about was getting laid. 
The constant chasing after girls, the silly 'foolproof' plans on how to woo 
them and the pathetic adherence to bad fashions in an attempt to impress them 
could all make a poignant, funny movie. I did not expect "Kevin & Perry Go 
Large" to be that movie, but that doesn't change its badness, or the fact 
that its budget could have been better spent.
The film does have one funny moment. It comes when Kevin's parents have 
agreed to let him and Perry go to Ibiza. The boys look down at the kitchen 
table, and are momentarily shocked by the huge logo on the plane tickets: 
Virgin Airlines.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Manchester City Centre)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on April 28, 2000; 
certificate 18; 117 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Wes Craven; produced by Cathy Konrad, Marianne Maddalena, Kevin 
Williamson.
Written by Ehren Kruger; based on characters created by Kevin Williamson.
Photographed by Peter Deming; edited by Patrick Lussier.
CAST.....
Neve Campbell..... Sidney Prescott
David Arquette..... Dwight 'Dewey' Riley
Courteney Cox Arquette..... Gale Weathers
Patrick Dempsey..... Detective Mark Kincaid
Scott Foley..... Roman Bridger
Lance Henriksen..... John Milton
Jenny McCarthy..... Sarah Darling
Parker Posey..... Jennifer Jolie
The character Neve Campbell plays in "Scream 3" has been so badly shaken in 
the first two movies that she now lives in Monterey with a reclusive 
anonymous lifestyle. When she finally drives to California to join in with 
the rest of the action, she's quieter, thoughtful and more authoritative. 
Watching this makes us realise what great potential Campbell has for 
performing in serious drama. I kept fantasising about writing a great 
screenplay for her, to showcase her captivating presence and win her 
international acclaim.
It's not just time for Neve to move on, though, but everyone involved. When 
the original "Scream" was released in 1996, it was a stunning comic idea -- a 
film with the structure of a slasher pic in which the characters knew all the 
clichés and had self-referential conversations about them. Unfortunately, the 
idea was copied, and quickly became a cliché in itself. Now almost every 
American movie starring kids under 20 is filled with smug, cynical allusions 
to pop culture that just make us groan and yawn.
Given that its options are limited and it's the third trek over the same 
ground, "Scream 3" does a pretty good job of engaging us. The filmmakers have 
announced that it's the last in the series, and while I'm not about to 
complain, at least their latest work is watchable. It comes up with a pretty 
ingenious way of generating more jokes, in fact, by setting its story in 
Hollywood, and featuring the production of a movie called "Stab 3". A horror 
movie, wouldn't you know it, based on characters from the first two "Scream" 
pictures.
This gives the director, Wes Craven, and his screenwriter, Ehren Kruger, the 
freedom to blur the line between what's going on in the 'reality' of the 
story and the world of movies. The plot involves another mystery about who is 
perpetrating a murderous rampage, and at this point in the trilogy we've been 
introduced to so many characters with so many conflicting personality traits 
that there is indeed a fair amount of suspense about the identity of the 
killer. In the end, Craven and Kruger come up with an unpredictable and 
arbitrary solution, but hey, at least we're not bored, as we were in "Scream 
2". That sequel made a bad mistake in thinking it was a real horror movie, 
and ditching the humour.
"Scream 3" is generally easy to watch, with colourful, sexy visuals, and 
although its form of parody is becoming old hat, there is enough successful 
ironic chatter to get us giggling. As I've suggested, it's better than 
"Scream 2". But somehow it doesn't work well enough to recommend. The idea 
has been stretched too far. They should have made one movie, and called it 
quits.
My biggest concern is that a lot of the violence is excessive for a 
lighthearted flick. Every time a knife is pulled out, for example, there is a 
disgusting metallic 'zing!' on the sound track, and a bright gleam on the 
screen. People get slaughtered in cruel, not amusing, ways. Unnecessary. Sick.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on March 3, 2000; certificate 18; 182 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Frank Darabont; produced by Frank Darabont, David Valdes.
Written by Frank Darabont; based on the serialised novel by Stephen King.
Photographed by David Tattersall; edited by Richard Francis-Bruce.
CAST.....
Tom Hanks..... Paul Edgecomb
David Morse..... Brutus 'Brutal' Howell
Michael Clarke Duncan..... John Coffey
Bonnie Hunt..... Jan Edgecomb
James Cromwell..... Warden Hal Moores
Michael Jeter..... Eduard 'Del' Delacroix
Graham Greene..... Arlen Bitterbuck
Sam Rockwell..... William 'Wild Bill' Wharton
Doug Hutchison..... Percy Wetmore
Here is a thoroughly absorbing supernatural fairytale about good and evil 
living under the same roof. Decent men work with cruel ones in this movie, 
and a creature with miraculous healing power winds up in a place inextricably 
linked with death. Perhaps that's the most appropriate place to witness him.
The location is E-block in a 1935 Louisiana prison, where inmates await the 
electric chair, and the condemned man's 'last mile' has been nicknamed 'the 
green mile' after the lime-coloured linoleum on the floor. We meet some of 
the guards: Paul Edgecomb (Tom Hanks), Brutus Howell (David Morse), Dean 
Stanton (Barry Pepper), Harry Terwilliger (Jeffrey Demunn), Percy Wetmore 
(Doug Hutchison).
All of these, except for the slimy Percy, who got his job because of a 
powerful relative, are good and patient men, who are firm yet kind to their 
prisoners. They view their role, correctly, as being a calming influence on 
inmates who would be dangerous if they got too nervy. "Think of this place as 
like an intensive care ward in a hospital," advises Paul.
One of the new guests is John Coffey (Michael Clarke Duncan), a gigantic 
black man who has been convicted of the rape-murders of two young girls, but 
seems to exude simplicity and goodness, and turns out to have a very special 
ability. Other odd plot points creep up and get a fair bit of attention, such 
as a urinary infection Paul suffers from, an unusually talented mouse, and a 
boorish prisoner named Wharton. We wonder what significance all these things 
could possibly have, and then finally they come together in a climax of 
moving drama, religious symbolism and clever epilogue.
My vague descriptions are intentional. "The Green Mile" does not announce 
what it is about, but drops little clues here and there, letting its story 
unfold carefully, intriguing and enveloping us with its atmosphere. That is 
why virtue and depravity are set at equal levels throughout the film; the 
conflict is needed to create quietly gripping tension. And it is exactly how 
the original Stephen King source material worked -- slyly revealing the story 
by taking things slowly, letting us settle in, earning our care.
King released "The Green Mile" as a novel in six parts, leaving intervals of 
several months between instalments, engaging his public in a guessing game 
about what direction the material would go in. Even if you read the whole 
series at once, as I did, you still felt led through it slowly, because the 
author's prose was so delicate and detailed. The film captures this 
remarkably well; Frank Darabont, the writer and director, who previously 
adapted a King work into the great "Shawshank Redemption", recognises 
deliberate pacing as an essential part of this story, and never falls into 
the trap of condensing it into a series of meaningless spooky events.
If only Darabont had bought the rights to Alex Garland's "The Beach", instead 
of that hyperactive boor Danny Boyle! The way he lets "The Green Mile" 
develop involves us with the intimacy of a good book. The film is three hours 
long, but contrary to the opinions of some critics, extensive length is not 
the film's problem, but its appeal. We get so immersed in the routine of life 
on the 'green mile' that when paranormal activity starts to happen, we accept 
it, and are amazed along with the characters. Audience members prepared to 
sit still and give the movie a chance will be handsomely rewarded.
Not that you'd think it from the ads. This week two brilliant new releases, 
"The Green Mile" and "Three Kings", have been so badly misrepresented by 
their television commercials that many cinema-goers will be persuaded to stay 
at home. Darabont's film has been portrayed as some sort of mawkish 
sentimental drama, with its scenes of good fable taken out of context, and 
made to look like bad attempts at realism. This is a movie that knows exactly 
what it's doing, and while it does have its fair share of tender moments, 
they're needed to balance out the brutality. One scene, for example, 
graphically depicts an execution Percy has rigged to go wrong, and is one of 
the most horrifying single moments ever shown on film -- my hand 
instinctively jumped to cover my eyes. I was able to remove it, and look on, 
but it really means something when a film can trigger involuntary defensive 
movements.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Story of Us, The (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Manchester City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on April 21, 2000; certificate 15; 92 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Rob Reiner; produced by Jessie Nelson, Rob Reiner, Alan Zweibel.
Written by Jessie Nelson, Alan Zweibel.
Photographed by Michael Chapman; edited by Alan Edward Bell, Robert Leighton.
Oh my word, what a weird movie this is. Rob Reiner's "The Story of Us" is 
atrocious from every angle, a film with a pointless concept, evasion of its 
central issue and the most embarrassing moments of comic relief you could 
possibly imagine. Who wants to see clips of a married couple fighting for an 
hour and a half, especially when we never really understand what they're 
arguing about, we don't know how seriously we're supposed to take it, and it 
keeps getting interrupted by some of the worst-written 'wit' in entertainment 
history? Not me.
Bruce Willis and Michelle Pfeiffer star as the husband and wife, who live in 
suburbia and have two young children. He's a sitcom writer. She scripts 
crossword puzzles. They put on an act of happy families for the kids, but in 
private can no longer stand each other. Flashbacks attempt to show us the 
marriage disintegrating. Present-day scenes involving the former lovebirds 
are a combination between shouting matches and uncomfortable silence.
One my major problems with "The Story of Us" is that we're rarely actually 
informed what it is the couple are fighting about. The one scene that does 
reveal the problem at hand is completely insipid -- Willis is trying to tell 
Pfeiffer that his old apartment block has been demolished, and she's doing 
something else, and can't hear him. Aww. The rest of the time the pair are 
telling each other how bad they feel or how much they hate each other, but 
they don't say WHY. What started all the fights we see? Who knows. Reiner, 
the director, and his screenwriters, Jessie Nelson and Alan Zweibel, just 
want to show us a parade of insults.
The characters are strange people anyway. At the dinner table, they always 
play a game called "High-Low", which involves all family members taking turns 
to share their best and worst moments of every day. Do people do things like 
that in real life? I thought that kind of sentimental crap was just for 1950s 
sitcoms?
The dialogue is abysmal. People around me in the screening of the film must 
have thought I was an oddball, because I was literally wincing at it. Then 
again, maybe they knew how I felt. There is an array of dire ironic speeches 
in the movie, all of which are so transparently constructed that they come 
across as read rather than spoken. They appear when Willis and Pfeiffer are 
asking their friends for advice, and resemble obnoxious versions of the 
chatter in "Seinfeld". Typical example: "Hey, I jerked off to your secretary 
last night; is that okay, or against the rules?" "Pound away, man, it's not 
an affront to me." "Cool. Hey -- whaddya think -- is masturbating technically 
cheating, or not?"
Here's an even worse moment, involving Reiner himself, in a smug cameo 
appearance as one of Willis's friends. The two guys are walking in the park, 
talking things over. Reiner stops in the middle of a pathway, bends over and 
says something to the effect of: "You see that? That's my ass, right? Wrong. 
There is no ass. Just a fatty part at the top of my legs. There just is no 
ass! And just as there is no ass, there is no true love. It's all an 
illusion." I swear to God I'm not making this up. The movie really is this 
bad.
The ending is yet another speech, a big, loud emotional moment in which 
Pfeiffer starts screaming a revelation about why she and Willis should stay 
together. This goes against everything that has gone before, and her 
reasoning, essentially, is that even if the couple end up leading miserable 
lives, at least they won't have to face change. Was this movie made by aliens 
who wanted to satirise human irrationality? If so, I wish someone had told me 
before I went in. It would have clicked things right into context.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Bromborough)
Released in the UK by UIP on February 4, 2000; certificate 18; 115 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by William Malone; produced by Gilbert Adler, Joel Silver, Robert 
Zemeckis.
Written by Dick Beebe; based on an original screenplay by Robb White.
Photographed by Rick Bota; edited by Anthony Adler.
William Castle was one of the great showmen of cinema, a creator of cheesy 
horror features who once said he modelled his career on that of P.T. Barnum. 
The gimmicks Castle used to market his films would make a good movie in 
themselves -- he once, for example, arrived at one of his premieres in a 
coffin, delivered by a hearse.
Far more characteristic for Castle were mechanical tricks such as 'Percepto', 
whereby people would get a signal that a monster was loose in the auditorium, 
and the only way to kill it was to scream. His 1958 film "House on Haunted 
Hill" boasted 'Emergo', a system of fitting theatres with huge plastic 
skeletons that would jump out on unsuspecting members of the audience.
It is probably impossible to recapture Castle's unique brand of 
stunt-orientated entertainment for today's moviegoers. Gone are the days when 
cinemas would consider letting you fit seatbelts or electro-shock buzzers in 
their seats, and it's doubtful that savvy modern kids would respond to 
B-movies as enthusiastically as youngsters did in the 1950s.
The new remake of "House on Haunted Hill", which has been directed by William 
Malone and produced by Hollywood giant Joel Silver, is an admirable if not 
completely successful attempt to get into the spirit of Castle's genre. It 
has few ironic references, and most of the actors don't go to great lengths 
to point out that their tongues are in their cheeks -- the movie really does 
play like an attempt to scare us using grotesquely over-the-top atmosphere 
and fairground techniques. We only know the filmmakers aren't that stupid 
because we trust nobody would ever expect us to take this schlock seriously.
The characters are a goofy bunch, perfunctorily thrown together in accordance 
with some hack screenwriter's manual. You've got a dumb blonde (Bridgette 
Wilson) and a smart one (Ali Larter); a cheap, goofy loser (Chris Kattan) and 
an affluent professional (Peter Gallagher); and a wise-cracking tough guy 
(Taye Diggs), who also happens to be the token black character, as all the 
others are white and there isn't really room for anyone else. These kids find 
themselves invited to a spooky mansion that used to be an asylum, by 
eccentric zillionaire Stephen Price (Geoffrey Rush). He makes an offer of one 
million dollars... "To whoever can survive the night!"
Price is an innovator in theme-park design, you see, who loves his work and 
gets a kick out of scaring people in new and exciting ways. He has rigged the 
house with perilous gadgets galore in order to do this, too, but -- need I 
even say it? -- the house really does turn out to be filled with evil 
spirits, and all the characters find themselves fighting for their lives.
Rush gives a good performance here, with a sly, trailing voice that is 
perfect for relishing his odd, playful lines -- his character is the kind 
who, if asked whether a phone call is business or pleasure, would give a 
twisted grin before responding "Neither... it's my wife!" He has a crazy 
little moustache that was grown to be twirled, and bushy eyebrows meant for 
raising. Rush is the only big star in the picture, and that's a nice touch, 
as Vincent Price had the same distinction, and the same role, in the original.
Other visual and aural treats arise from the haunting itself -- to be honest, 
a few of them really did creep me out in some basic, crude way.  We see the 
passageways of the house as grimy, labyrinthine, ominous; the soundtrack 
manipulates the rear speakers brilliantly, giving us the sensation that 
sinister whispers, scratches and squeals are happening in the aisles of our 
screening room.
I was not as endeared by the human violence in the movie -- much of it is 
inappropriately gruesome, in contrast to the innocence of the supernatural 
gore. And the film never quite goes as far off the rails as it should -- 
those original B-movies, you will recall, resembled loud protests against 
refinement, craftsmanship and good taste.
Still, I'm impressed that the film is watchable at all. Remakes and horror 
movies are so hard to do right they're disaster areas for filmmakers, and 
embarking on a horror remake is like actively seeking public embarrassment. 
"House on Haunted Hill" was critically savaged in the States, where it was 
seen as a slapped-together attempt to cash in on Halloween. That's unfair -- 
it's a lot more sophisticated than the adverts suggest. I didn't exactly like 
it, but it's hard not to have some affection for it; no film that reminds me 
of dear old William Castle can be all that bad.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on 24 March, 2000;=20
certificate 12; 129 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Lasse Hallstr=F6m; produced by Richard N. Gladstein.
Written by John Irving; based upon his own novel.
Photographed by Oliver Stapleton; edited by Lisa Zeno Churgin.
"The Cider House Rules", rich in texture and Dickensian in themes, is such a=
=20
skilful dance of a film that it hops over cinema's trickiest hurdles and we=20
hardly even notice. It makes sentimentality enjoyable, adapts a novel withou=
t=20
condensing it into a patronising Hollywood formula and avoids silly=20
speechmaking when commenting on the complex issue of abortion.
The source material is a 1985 best seller by John Irving, which ran eight=20
hundred pages and covered forty years in the life of an orphan named Homer=20
Wells. In adapting his book to the screen, Irving wrote a multitude of scrip=
t=20
drafts and took them to several directors; it's taken so long he's written a=
=20
book on the project itself. Miraculous, then, that the movie has been=20
realised at all, let alone so well.
It is set in the 1940s, and Homer (Tobey Maguire) has grown up in a Maine=20
orphanage, St. Cloud's. He was adopted twice as a baby, sent back once=20
because he didn't cry enough, and taken back on the other occasion because=20
one set of parents beat him. His father figure is the dedicated Dr. Larch=20
(Michael Caine), who is addicted to ether, and performs abortions at a time=20
when they are illegal, but is a good man nonetheless -- in taking Homer unde=
r=20
his wing, and making sure he is "of use", he has taught the boy enough about=
=20
medicine to qualify him as a skilled surgeon.
Homer is not convinced he wants to be a doctor, though, and has reservations=
=20
about the moral validity of abortion. He would like to see the outside world=
,=20
and gets his chance when the cute young couple of Wally (Paul Rudd) and Cand=
y=20
(Charlize Theron) come to St. Cloud's to get rid of an unwanted pregnancy.=20
Wally's family has an orchard near the ocean, and Homer is offered a job=20
there.
Wally gets called up to serve in World War Two, but since Homer has a heart=20
condition, he remains at his new home, picking apples. He and Candy begin a=20
love affair, which is significant because it's a taste of normal life, and=20
once he's sampled the joys of the real world, Homer must face up to its=20
grimmer realities too. When a seemingly upright orchard worker impregnates=20
his teenage daughter, Homer feels compelled to intervene, as the question of=
=20
abortion suddenly seems much less clear-cut. And so does his decision to=20
leave St. Cloud's -- perhaps Larch was right all along, and Homer is his=20
natural successor.
I am simplifying the story to a damaging degree; it does make good sense,=20
even though Irving had to compress the events of the novel into a two-year=20
period. The film is tighter and more focused for it; the abortion thread is=20
woven in with great skill, whereas in the book it seemed a tad tacked-on. An=
d=20
the messages are clearer -- rules may be for the good of humanity, but part=20
of being truly human is knowing when to break them; and people belong where=20
they can do the most good.
Both works feature mature character depictions, like that of the incestuous=20
father, Mr. Rose (Delroy Lindo). He doesn't realise he's done anything=20
damaging, and that's the kind of self-delusion which similar people go=20
through in real life. Homer, the hero of the piece, doesn't do any=20
grandstanding; Tobey Maguire's performance is engaging because of boyish=20
innocence and quiet dignity. The character was raised in an orphanage,=20
remember, and has learnt to reveal in his eyes alone what he feels about his=
=20
wonderful and terrible discoveries.
The movie is more obviously sincere than the novel, which, although generall=
y=20
absorbing, had moments of messy wording that left me unsure of their tone.=20
The director, Lasse Hallstr=F6m, and his cinematographer, Oliver Stapleton,=20
have crafted an intimate New England look reminiscent of the third act in=20
"The Shawshank Redemption", full of naturally beautiful browns and greens. W=
e=20
can't help but be moved by all the cute little orphans, either, and it's nic=
e=20
to see Jane Alexander return to the screen, in the role of one of Larch's=20
nurses.
This is not quite a perfect movie. It doesn't emphasise any particular plot=20
point as being the driving force behind the narrative, the romance is=20
underdeveloped and Homer's final farewell to is too brief. But generally it=20
is an effective tearjerker, with old-fashioned pacing, sweet violin music an=
d=20
an admirable social conscience. Please, sir... I want some more.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which=20
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Down to You (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Film Four on May 19, 2000; certificate 12; 92 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Kris Isaacson; produced by Jason Kilot, Joana Vicente.
Written by Kris Isaacson.
Photographed by Robert Yeoman; edited by Stephen A. Rotter.
The characters in "Down to You" are stupid, all right, but at least they're 
more convincingly ALIVE than most young folks in American movies. These are 
college-age kids in a cutesy romantic comedy who screw, drink, smoke tobacco 
and pot, are familiar with music that came out before the invention of the 
CD, and have detailed discussions about pornography. None of this is 
presented as risque, as it was in "American Pie" -- it's seen as normal.
That's refreshing. The rest of the movie is pretty lame. Freddie Prinze Jr, 
from last summer's teen romance "She's All That", plays the guy, Al. Julia 
Stiles, from last summer's teen romance "10 Things I Hate About You", plays 
the girl, Imogen. They fall in love, break up, and fall in love again. The 
end.
The vices of the characters and texture of the atmosphere make "Down to You" 
watchable -- I know that kids from the USA aren't as hard-edged as youngsters 
from this side of the pond, but surely they can't be the bland, non-alcoholic 
virgins that most teen flicks make them out to be. The downside of the movie 
is the way it frames its story in retrospect, with embarrassing 
direct-to-camera interview-style dissections of what's going on onscreen, and 
a voice-over narration that treats a typical Hollywood love story as 
something Really Important. Woody Allen can get away with that, because his 
screenplays offer witty insights and entertaining self-obsession. Here it's 
gimmicky and annoying.
What I will remember about seeing the film is that the group of young girls 
in front of me thought I was Freddie Prinze Jr. Every time a close-up of the 
star filled the screen, one of them would turn around, make eye contact with 
me, then shoot round again, whispering "It's him, it's him!" to another. When 
his name appeared in the end credits, a couple of them said it to themselves, 
as if making a mental note. I dimmed the lights when I got home, and checked 
my reflection in the mirror, and yeah, I can sort of see a resemblance. 
Similar cheekbones, similar hair (on that day), et cetera. But I don't look 
like him all that much, really, and I hope the girls didn't see me in the 
light. I wouldn't want to spoil their illusion.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Columbia TriStar on 24 March, 2000; certificate 15; 125 
minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by James Mangold; produced by Cathy Konrad, Douglas Wick.
Written by Lisa Loomer, James Mangold, Anna Hamilton Phelan; based on the 
book by Susanna Kaysen.
Photographed by Jack Green; edited by Kevin Tent.
"Girl, Interrupted" argues that mental institutions keep the sane and release 
the unstable, because of stuffy procedures and restrictive rules written by 
bureaucratic doctors disconnected from reality. While I am sure these things 
are true, the film never makes us care, because its heroine is a bitchy 
little nut-job. 
"Haven't you ever confused a dream with reality, stolen something when you 
had the cash, or thought your train moving as it sat in the station?" she 
pleads with us in the opening scenes. But that's not the kind of behaviour 
she's being locked up for. This is a young lady who responds "What?" whenever 
anyone asks her a question, drifts into daydreaming in the middle of 
sentences and thinks it's perfectly acceptable to guzzle great quantities of 
pills and vodka.
Her name is Susanna Kaysen, a real-life figure whose book this movie is based 
on. If the film is anything to go by, I'm lucky that I never read it. "Girl, 
Interrupted" is a pathetic example of someone denying she's in denial; it's 
as stupid as Sylvia Plath's "The Bell Jar" without the engaging style. There 
are journal entries in the film we're supposed to accept as profound 
philosophising. Most of them are just the kind of pretentious 
stream-of-consciousness drivel that many teenage girls write, only to look 
back on years later and cringe with embarrassment.
The story is set in the 1960s -- boys are being shipped to their deaths in 
Vietnam, and Susanna (Winona Ryder) thinks she's got a hard life because her 
mother is hassling her about going to college. After a suicide attempt, she 
is encouraged to sign herself into Claymoore, an expensive mental hospital 
where the head nurse (Whoopi Goldberg) gives a straightforwardly accurate 
diagnosis: "You are a lazy, self-indulgent little girl who is driving herself 
crazy."
Susanna does a lot of mellow lying around, drunk on her own superiority, 
convinced she's "artistic" rather than crazy. Fellow inmate Lisa (Angelina 
Jolie) offers her support, probably because the two women have the same 
problem -- thinking they know the secrets of the universe, when they're 
actually defective jerks. Other friendly faces include a pathological liar 
(Clea Duvall) and a girl who likes to set herself on fire (Elisabeth Moss). 
Anyone in a position of authority, or who displays the least bit of 
conventionality, is portrayed as an uptight white-collar conservative square. 
I am reminded of "Reality Bites" (1994), another film starring Ryder in which 
the alleged heroes were self-obsessed layabout losers.
"Girl, Interrupted" is moronic and arrogant crap, not least because its 
obnoxious onscreen behaviour is accompanied by a voice-over that asks, 
essentially, "Can you BELIEVE these stuffed shirts thought I was obnoxious?" 
Perhaps the book or true events would lead me to a different conclusion, but 
the Susanna Kaysen of this film could use a good hard slap in the face.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on April 28, 2000; certificate PG; 102 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Dean Patriot; produced by Mark Johnson, Charles Newirth.
Written by Robert Gordon, David Howard.
Photographed by Jerry Zielinski; edited by Don Zimmerman.
Sometimes when I feel lazy I sit on the couch and flip through satellite TV 
channels. One of my discoveries is a station called Granada Plus. In the 
daytime it airs a lot of the programmes that I saw when growing up  -- cop 
shows like "Starsky and Hutch" and "Cagney and Lacey", as well as 
science-fiction fare like "The Time Tunnel", "The Incredible Hulk", "The Six 
Million Dollar Man", "Lost in Space" and "Star Trek".
I thought of such delicious pieces of pop culture while watching "Galaxy 
Quest". The movie opens at a comic book convention, where the celebrity 
guests were performers in a very "Star Trek"-like TV show called, well, 
"Galaxy Quest". It was cancelled in the early 1980s, and now its actors are 
out of work, spending their time showing up at gigs to sign autographs. Main 
star Jason Nesmith (Tim Allen), who bears a suspicious resemblance to William 
Shatner, is a goofball who drinks too much and takes his fans' affections for 
granted. Blonde bombshell Gwen DeMarco (Sigourney Weaver) still laments that 
interviewers only ever asked her about her breasts. Classically-trained 
thespian Alexander Dane (Alan Rickman) is known for his moaning: "I played 
Hamlet once!" he wails into the mirror.
These guys, along with three other former cast members, run into some 
strange-looking fans who talk in robotic voices and make jittery movements. 
They make a plea of Jason, which he interprets as a request for another star 
appearance. As it turns out, though, this band of admirers are actually 
aliens who have seen and admired "Galaxy Quest" from outer space, believing 
it to be a set of historical documents. They want help from their heroes to 
battle their intergalactic foes.
After a period of initial shock, Jason excitedly leaps into this opportunity. 
"It'll be fun! Just like being on the show!" His colleagues have to take him 
aside to remind him that they are not real space warriors, just actors. Not a 
problem, it turns out: The friendly aliens' spaceships have been modelled on 
those of "Galaxy Quest", and the controls have been based on the actors' 
movements.
What I love about this movie is that it replicates the feel, structure and 
rhythm of sci-fi adventures with a rejuvenating sense of lightheartedness. In 
other words, it's as exciting as those old shows were from a kid's point of 
view, and very funny, too. The film has a lot of self-referential dialogue, 
but that's nothing new any more -- its general sense of whimsy is much more 
enjoyable. And it has a moment I've been waiting to see for years: Instead of 
the spaceship pulling out of its tiny loading bay with perfect ease, the 
pilot ends up bumping it against the wall, and having to say "Oops! Sorry!"
The cast is terrific. Tim Allen, Sigourney Weaver, Alan Rickman and Tony 
Shalhoub are familiar faces, and look so out of their depth in the middle of 
all this silliness that of course we find ourselves smirking. They also 
create characters we care about. Just because they're in a comedy doesn't 
mean they turn into robots who spit out one-liners -- they interact like real 
people, making everything they have to deal with just that little bit more 
absurd, and entertaining.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Boiler Room (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Manchester City Centre)
Released in the UK by Entertainment Distribution on May 5, 2000; certificate 
15; 119 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Ben Younger; produced by Jennifer Todd, Suzanne Todd.
Written by Ben Younger.
Photographed by Enrique Chediak; edited by Chris Peppe.
It's only two weeks since I reviewed "American Psycho", but here already is a 
more powerful movie dealing with similar themes, without the dumb gags or 
vicious streak. "Boiler Room" is often a comedy, because it lets us spend 
time with some of the most risible people alive -- stockbrokers. It's also a 
very serious thriller, because the protagonist gets seduced by their 
money-grubbing lifestyle and ends up in over his head.
His name is Seth (Giovanni Ribisi), a 19-year old New Yorker who dropped out 
of college and supports himself by running an illegal casino out of his 
apartment. When his father, a federal court judge, discovers this, he hits 
the roof, and tells him to get a proper job. Seth can't handle dad's disgust. 
He determines to find an occupation that requires him to wear a suit.
Then one of his friends sets him up at the firm of J.T. Marlin -- a 
telemarketing 'chop shop' that sells people stock for companies that don't 
exist, then charges them huge commission rates to dump it on the open market. 
This is more dishonest than the casino, but hey, it looks respectable enough. 
And it pays better. That's made clear in a pep talk by the recruiter, Jim 
(Ben Affleck), who seems to have used Alec Baldwin's chilling monologue in 
"Glengarry Glen Ross" as a self-help tape. "Work here," he tells the men in 
front of him, "And within three years you'll be a millionaire. Anybody who 
says money is the root of all evil doesn't have any."
The guys know Oliver Stone's "Wall Street" off by heart, too. They proudly 
recite the villain's speeches; oblivious to the message, and getting a kick 
out of the lingo. When they're all on the phone, screaming stock pitches to 
potential victims, the obsession and aggression in the office is palpable, 
and so very evil and illegal that we know something disastrous is bound to 
happen.
Since we are so engaged by Seth, we watch this with more tension than 
disgust. He is a well-written hero for the piece because he's an essentially 
good kid; we can sympathise with his desire to make money, and though he does 
dishonest things, he doesn't realise it, because he hasn't evaluated the 
situation in that way. The climate in J.T. Marlin teaches him to consider 
only money, and if there's nothing wrong with the pay check, what could be 
wrong at all? Seth has to be suckered in before he can realise what a sham 
this is, and "Boiler Room" is fascinating because it lets us see the whole 
process unfold. 
All of the movie's dialogue is impressive. Brokers' conversations sound like 
a cross between financial jargon and military planning. And Seth's scenes 
with his father (Ron Rifkin) and the film's love interest (Nia Long) are 
staged like clichés but played with humour, emotion, presence and 
personality. The characters talk about their backgrounds, hopes and needs in 
convincing ways. "Boiler Room" works as a morality play by presenting us with 
people whose moral compasses it's actually possible to care about.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Love, Honour and Obey (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on April 7, 2000; certificate 18; 98 minutes; 
country of origin UK; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Dominic Anciano, Ray Burdis; produced by Dominic Anciano, Ray 
Burdis.
Written by Dominic Anciano, Ray Burdis.
Photographed by John Ward; edited by Rachel Meyrick.
The main actors in "Love, Honour and Obey" are making a serious gangster 
flick, the supporting performers are trying goofy comedy, and the filmmakers 
are wasting celluloid. This is a seriously confused movie which switches 
uneasily from lame gags to out-of-context drama, and mixes in a series of 
karaoke numbers and a dead man in a clown outfit telling a story that has 
nothing to do with the images onscreen. Confusing? You betcha.
The first person we meet is Sadie (Sadie Frost), a soap opera actress who is 
engaged to a leading London gangster, Ray (Ray Winstone). The outlaw's nephew 
is a flashy geezer named Jude (Jude Law), whose best pal Jon (Jonny Lee 
Miller) is just about to enter the crime business himself. This gang's two 
main henchmen are Dominic (Dominic Anciano) and Ray (Ray Burdis). Rivals 
include Sean (Sean Pertwee) and Matthew (Rhys Ifans).
You will have noticed that most of the characters are named for the actors. 
In last year's best film, "The Blair Witch Project", this tactic helped keep 
up the pretence that the story was true. Here it's just a gimmick -- one that 
Anciano and Burdis (who wrote, produced and directed) also used in "Final 
Cut", a film I have not yet seen but am told is abysmal. Perhaps the 
intention is to boast that the movie has been made by a team, who are so 
close that everyone's role is tailor-made. If so, I'm at a loss to understand 
why talented thesps are so happy to be working with incompetent hacks.
This is a picture devoid of story or tone. It opens by focusing on the 
relationship between Ray, Jude and Jon, which we suspect will disintegrate 
into a violent mess, because of the elegiac tones and past tense of Jon's 
narration. But this is never allowed to develop -- every time a scene is set 
up with these characters, the film cuts away to some odd subplot, like the 
one with Dominic and Ray talking about their sex lives. Ray is suffering from 
impotence; Dom is giving him lectures on kinky toys that should relight his 
fire.
These silly comic asides aim pretty low; they expect us to titter at rude 
words and guffaw when a woman uses a cucumber to imitate fellatio. The 
potentially good performances of Winstone, Law and Miller, who take things 
seriously, are ruined by these stupid interruptions. Anciano and Burdis act 
them with such forced emphasis and lack of spontaneity that it's 
embarrassingly obvious they're reciting memorised passages.
"Love, Honour and Obey" sounds like it was recorded with an old camcorder 
microphone, and the editor uses flashes of lightning and abrupt fade-outs to 
move between scenes. Crude production values, though, are hardly the 
principal problem, because slicker ones would not have smoothed over the 
film's jumpy shifts from humour to menace. We see participants in a vicious 
gunfight suddenly begin a laughing fit. A man writhing in pain from a stab 
wound while everyone around him takes it as a joke. Two messengers getting 
stripped and tortured by guys who then feed them dog food. Ho ho ho ho ho. At 
one point I asked my companion if we were watching a comedy or drama. "I 
don't know," she said, "but I hate it either way."
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Pokémon the First Movie: Mewtwo Strikes Back (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Warner Bros on April 14, 2000; certificate PG; 69 
minutes; country of origin Japan; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Kunihiko Yuyama; produced by Norman J. Grossfeld, Tomoyugi 
Igarashi, Takemoto Yori, Choji Yoshikawa.
Written by Takeshi Shudo.
Photographed by Hisao Shirai; edited by Toshio Henmi.
CAST.....
Voice of Veronica Taylor..... Ash Ketchum
Voice of Rachael Lillis..... Misty Williams/Jessie of Team Rocket/Minor voices
Voice of Eric Stuart..... Brock Harrison/James Morgan of Team Rocket/Minor 
voices
Voice of Ikue Otani..... Pikachu
Voice of Philip Bartlett..... Mewtwo
Voice of Addie Blaustein..... Meowth of Team Rocket
Voice of Ted Lewis..... Giovanni
Pokémon are cartoon warrior pets that are stored in magical tennis balls and 
carried around by human masters. The characters began life in a Nintendo 
video game and then inspired an immensely popular card activity that is 
essentially a dressed-up version of Trump Cards. There's also a comic book 
and television show. It's a weird and soulless phenomenon, exclusively for 
people under the age of twelve, who seem less interested in the merchandise 
itself than its escalating monetary value.
The TV programme is the most detestable of these spin-offs; the Japanese 
style of animation makes the Pokémon look like mouldings of gelatinous goop, 
and the dialogue and voices are a reminder of such crude productions as 
"Speed Racer" and "Lost in Space". It was therefore with great reservations 
that I entered "Pokémon: The First Movie - Mewtwo Stikes Back". My mood was 
worsened by the preceding 20-minute short film, which played like a bad acid 
trip.
In the story, a genetically modified Pokémon named Mewtwo plans to lure the 
greatest living Pokémon to his island for a fight tournament, and then kill 
them and create improved clones. He's ever so subtle in revealing his plans: 
"I shall destroy you for consorting with humans, and then take over the world 
with a band of super-Pokémon!"
Most of the running time is taken up by long Pokémon battles. We also get so  
many meditations on the greatness of the Pokémon way that you'd think it was 
a real religion. The movie is an overlong advertisement; logos and brand 
names are all over the place, and the only function of the human characters 
is to collect more Pokémon. "The Simpsons" couldn't satirise this, because 
it's far too over the top already.
If we ignore how dangerous this kind of materialist brainwashing is for our 
children, we can possibly enjoy "Pokémon: The First Movie" as good cheesy 
fun. It's hard not to admire the courage of a film that actually has lines 
like "Now I realise we weren't put on this earth to fight each other!" and "I 
guess we've all learned an important lesson!" The voice-over narration seems 
to have come straight out of an infommercial. The Pokémon owners all speak 
with tones more phoney than those of the humans in the "Teenage Mutant Hero 
Turtles" cartoons. And one little Pokémon, a squeaky little thing called 
Pikachu, is actually rather cute in some tacky kind of way. He made me want 
to go home and cuddle my dog.
I'm not recommending "Pokémon: The First Movie" because I'm not sure how much 
of its so-bad-it's-good appeal is intentional, and besides, much of it is 
boring and repetitive. This is not a wonderful guilty pleasure in the 
tradition of "Mortal Kombat", although at times it does come close. Possibly 
my judgement has been coloured by my initial determination to hate the film, 
but I don't think so; I can admit that it's distinctive and lively, and will 
probably be eaten up by Pokémon fans. Right after they take their medication.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Entertainment Distribution on May 19, 2000; certificate 
15; 90 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by James Wong; produced by Glen Morgan, Craig Perry, Warren Zide.
Written by Glen Morgan, Jeffrey Reddick, James Wong; from a story by Jeffrey 
Reddick.
Photographed by Robert Maclachlan; edited by James Coblentz.
I found myself forced to fill in a questionnaire the other day, which at one 
point asked: "Are you offended by anything that offends good taste?" I had to 
answer no. While I do usually take a highbrow approach to things, there are 
no absolutes when it comes to possible emotional reactions. Sometimes it's 
healthy to view things from a low down and dirty point of view.
"Final Destination" proves my point. It's not a great horror movie, nor a 
scary one, and it doesn't even try to satirise its genre. It simply inspires 
its viewers to indulge lurid fascination with violence. I usually find that 
repellent -- look at my scathing reviews of "The Bone Collector", "Ravenous", 
"8mm" and "Urban Legend". What distinguishes this film from those is how 
up-front it is about its morbidity; it's unashamed Grand Guignol, rather than 
sick titillation pretending to be serious drama.
The story begins when a group of forty high-school students board a plane for 
Paris. One of them, Alex (Devon Sawa), has a vivid premonition of the 
aircraft exploding into flames after take-off. He freaks out trying to warn 
people, and in the ensuing commotion gets thrown off the plane, along with a 
teacher (Kristen Cloke) and five other students (Ali Larter, Kerr Smith, Chad 
E. Donella, Seann William Scott, Amanda Detmer). From the airport this group 
see that Alex was right -- the plane blows up before their eyes.
Are the survivors lucky? Well, no, because they soon start dying off anyway, 
and in a speech full of hammed-up grimacing and portentous groaning, a 
strange mortician named Bloodworth (Tony Todd) offers them an interesting 
theory as to why: In cheating death by getting off the plane, they've gone 
against the Grim Reaper's plan, and the creature is now stalking them to make 
up for it. All our heroes have to do is figure out the nature of this plan, 
and how to cheat it again. Ah, no problem.
It's unconventional to find a teen horror movie in which Death himself is the 
villain. Refreshing, too, since there is no opportunity for silly slasher-pic 
clichés involving friends creeping up on each other and causing false alarms, 
or moments where people creep around in the dark while a killer lurks in the 
shadows. Instead we get elaborate supernatural death traps, which are so 
twisted that our morbid curiosity is enthralled. I don't want to give too 
many specifics away, because the appeal of "Final Destination" lies in 
waiting to see how creative its moments of doom will get, but let me whet 
your appetite for their gleefully sadistic flavour: In one scene, a leak 
causes a kid's bathroom floor to get slippy, while he, unaware, uses a razor 
to nick a pimple from his neck, cuts his nose hair with a sharp scissors, and 
stands opposite a cord that could strangle him if he fell on it. We know he's 
going to die, we can see he's surrounded by potentially fatal objects, and we 
can't turn our eyes from the screen until we've seen him stumble into his 
demise.
This is of course sick, but it's fun, too, even after it's been repeated 
seven times. We leer at how gruesome the film is, allow ourselves to jump 
when death strikes, then laugh at ourselves for jumping. I suspect "Final 
Destination", unlike most horror movies, will not look dated in years to 
come, as it deals directly with the universally interesting theme of 
mortality. Okay, so it deals with it in a goofy way, but goofiness will live 
forever, too.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Ordinary Decent Criminal (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Icon Entertainment International on March 17, 2000; 
certificate 15; 93 minutes; country of origin Ireland/USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Thaddeus O'Sullivan; produced by Jonathan Cavendish.
Written by Gerard Stembridge.
Photographed by Andrew Dunn; edited by William Anderson.
"Ordinary Decent Criminal" is what happens, I suppose, when a few hundred 
actors gain access to photographic equipment and drugs. Is there another 
explanation for the film's existence? Could serious businessman and artists 
have conceived, written, financed and produced it? Mybe some anti-social 
scumbag in the film industry decided he needed to create something grotesque 
to release on St. Patrick's Day weekend, so that the few people in the 
country without hangovers would be suffering ordeals too.
This movie is technically and artistically inept. Shots are set up from 
arbitrary angles, meaning there is no rhythm to the cuts between them. Most 
of the transitions are slightly jarring anyway, as in some cheap 1970s porn 
film. The music seems to be from one of those flicks, too, on a soundtrack 
that doesn't match the picture properly; the timing of the lip-synching is 
off, and all the sound effects are at the same volume, which sounds creepy.
It doesn't help that the actors speak with phoney voices. The cast is headed 
by two Americans, Kevin Spacey and Linda Fiorentino, and they are joined by 
British actors Helen Baxendale and Peter Mullan. All try and fail to put on 
Irish accents, and since most of the cast is made up of foreigners with the 
same problem, our ears can hardly bear it. Did it never occur to the 
filmmaker, Thaddeus O'Sullivan, that plenty of available actors are native to 
Eire?
Some of them can be seen in John Boorman's film "The General", which was 
released to acclaim in 1996, and followed the legendary career of a real-life 
criminal named Martin Cahill. "Ordinary Decent Criminal" borrows from the 
same story, which didn't need to be told again, especially not in this dumb 
way. The character, renamed Michael Lynch and played by Spacey, is shown as a 
loveably crafty and confident rogue, who is always outsmarting incompetent 
police with such hilarious tactics as kidnapping and car bombs. Ho, ho, ho, 
what fun!
Spacey is expected to win an Oscar next Sunday for his performance in 
"American Beauty", the tragi-comic story of a suburban loser's search for 
happiness. Obviously the great actor isn't having a hard time finding 
challenging material. So why did he agree to star in "Ordinary Decent 
Criminal"? It's the kind of film you stare at in appalled silence, amazed 
that your local cinema would actually book it. It's impossible to write a 
satisfactory review of the experience. Please accept this fragmented list of 
gripes.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Beau travail (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by Artificial Eye on July 14, 2000; certificate 15; 93 
minutes; country of origin France; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Claire Denis; produced by Patrick Grandperret, Jerome Minet.
Written by Claire Denis, Jean-Pol Fargeau.
Photographed by Agnes Godard; edited by Nelly Quettier.
Galoup is not in uniform, but he is in funereal black. He's in a night club, 
but with only mirrors for company, which force his sour image at him like 
deliberate mockery. He dances fast, but seems dead, like his body's being 
shaken around. The song lyric playing ceaselessly: "The rhythm of the 
night... this is the rhythm of my life."
His is indeed a dark beat. Galoup is played by Denis Lavant -- he of those 
Stella Artois commercials that have played along with the coming attractions 
at every movie for the last two years -- in a performance of unmoving, 
bitter, canine expression that was probably not difficult to perform but is 
effective nonetheless. He is an empty man -- devastated because of his 
dishonourable discharge from the French Legionnaires, but also lacking in 
soul, and his problems were eating away at him even when he was a commanding 
officer.
Claire Denis's "Beau Travail" documents the process. The final scene, 
described above, feels tragic; the rest of the movie is quite boring. It 
takes place in some African country, where the Legionnaires train for area 
guarding in tortuous heat, and unspoken tensions drive men mad. Galoup seems 
to look at his colleagues and subordinates with a suspicious eye, becoming 
convinced they are mocking or trying to usurp him. Eventually he starts to 
victimise a Russian-born platoon member, setting him unreasonable punishments 
for non-existent offences, and then travelling to a deserted area and leaving 
him for dead.
This could have been a chilling character study of bitter poignancy, because 
the obvious uneventfulness of life in the camp (there is hardly any dialogue 
in the movie, and everyone moves in a slow, mechanical manner) makes Galoup's 
paranoia all the more sad. It feels unintentionally aimless, though, because 
there is a voice-over narration of grand musings that falsely suggests 
there's some higher meaning to it all. Why can't Denis let the story be a 
tragedy about one pathetic man? Why does she suggest that there's a Big 
Intellectual Message? If she's trying to make a general point about how a 
life of army solitude is bound to turn all soldiers insane, then she fails, 
because her depiction of camp life is Galoup's perception, not realism. 
Actual military personnel would not be robotically executing tasks or 
vacantly staring into space; they'd be digging into their duties in between 
joking with each other, playing cards and drinking. Does she know anyone in 
the army? On the basis of "Beau Travail" I doubt it.
The picture's most striking aspect is the homoerotic aura of its training 
scenes, with sweaty, half-naked, muscular men slowly and silently flexing and 
gyrating in the hot sun against a backdrop of dry sand. I wonder if a male 
director would get away with shooting a female cast like that. I'd also like 
to see that movie, if ever it gets made.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by Film Four on May 5, 2000; certificate 15; 116 minutes; 
countries of origin France/Germany/Japan/USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Jim Jarmusch; produced by Richard Guay, Jim Jarmusch.
Written by Jim Jarmusch.
Photographed by Robby Müller; edited by Jay Rabinowitz.
The hit man has no name. People in the neighbourhood just call him 'ghost 
dog'. He lives on the roof of a New York City apartment block, in an iron 
shack, surrounded by pigeons. His only friend is a Haitian ice-cream vendor 
who does not speak his language. Completely disconnected from reality, he 
uses the code of ancient samurai warriors as a guide on how to conduct his 
life and work.
"Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai" was written and directed by Jim Jarmusch, 
the perfect and perhaps only filmmaker for this material. He's fascinated by 
the quietly insane, or at least the quirky outsiders, of society. Think of 
the layabouts in "Stranger Than Paradise", the mixed bag of oddballs in 
"Mystery Train", the trio of plodding inept crooks in "Down By Law". Good old 
Jim has dedicated his career to looking at nutcases with a tender grin.
In "Ghost Dog", he makes clear that the plot will contain no surprises, so he 
can devote his attention to observing little details. The early scenes show 
us that Ghost Dog (Forest Whitaker) does contract killings for a gang of 
Italian mobsters. He feels indebted to one of their number for saving his 
life when he was a kid. For reasons I wasn't really paying attention to, it 
is decided that Ghost Dog himself must die, and by the end of the movie, of 
course, this is what's going to happen.
As ever, Jarmusch's pace is slow, and his camera stays pretty much 
stationary. Scenes are deliberately flat, lending a poignancy to the pathetic 
atmosphere all the characters live in, and also a comedic contrast to the 
topsy-turvy nature of the things going on. Realistic foibles are thrust onto 
action-adventure set-ups: The film is full of little moments like the one in 
which a pair of tough-talking gangsters sit around in serious, contemplative 
confusion at why Ghost Dog communicates with them by carrier pigeon. Try to 
imagine the scene in "Pulp Fiction" where the two guys are nitpicking about 
how to clean their blood-drenched car, spun out to feature length.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani 
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Stir of Echoes (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Fox on May 26, 2000; certificate 15; 99 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by David Koepp; produced by Judy Hofflund, Gavin Polone.
Written by David Koepp; based on the novel by Richard Matheson.
Photographed by Fred Murphy; edited by Jill Savitt.
"Stir of Echoes" is one of the year's best films, is based on a best selling 
novel, and features Kevin Bacon in one of his most skilful performances. 
Films of this calibre don't often hit our screens. And yet it has arrived 
with little advance buzz and a cheap publicity campaign. Why? Maybe because 
people are still eating up "The Sixth Sense", the ghost story from last year 
that got six Oscar nominations and topped box office charts. "Stir of Echoes" 
shames that silly con trick, matching its spooky atmosphere in every frame, 
and going much further in developing a story.
Bacon plays Tom Witzky, a blue-collar guy from Chicago who one night jokingly 
dares his kooky sister-in-law Lisa (Ileana Douglas) to hypnotise him. "How 
can you believe in all that superstitious crap?" he asks. When Lisa has him 
under, she leaves him with what's known as a Post-Hypnotic Suggestion, 
leaving a message in his brain. She asks him to be more open-minded.
And that he becomes, but not in the way she intended. After Tom wakes up he 
has disturbing visions and feelings of strange sickness, because he's now a 
'receiver' -- a person able to see everything around him, both material and 
supernatural. His son Jake (Zachary David Cope) has always had the gift, and 
tells his father "Don't be afraid of it, daddy." When Tom calms down, and 
tries to make sense of the phenomena going on around him, he realises he's 
being haunted by the ghost of a dead teenage girl who wants him to unearth 
something related to her memory.
There are a lot of plot threads in "Stir of Echoes", all of which somehow 
become related to this girl. But they don't feel like story manoeuvres, they 
feel like atmosphere, because everything is set up through either realistic 
supporting characters or Tom's visions. Things are glimpsed just enough so we 
can mark and remember them, but not so much that we can figure out what 
everything means or is leading up to. While we're watching the movie, all we 
can focus on is the fact that Tom is going through something weird, and I 
found myself shivering, jumping and glaring in disgusted disbelief, as the 
haunting got more serious, tormenting and dominating Tom's life. We see what 
he sees, and it gets under our skin by coming in violent flashes, through 
bizarre angles, colours and speeds.
Disorientating apparitions alone cannot carry a film. Here they are supported 
by a) cinematography whose dark, shady tones walk the line between realistic 
and spooky, so we can never quite relax; and b) a performance of intensity 
from Bacon. He's not always cast in sombre roles, but he's perfect for them 
-- his good looks and sense of humour can always win audiences over, and his 
strong features and hungry face mean that when his character is taking 
something seriously, we do too. In "Stir of Echoes" he plays a man whose head 
gets torn apart, and we're sure as hell let know it.
It's also good to see a picture like this set in a regular neighbourhood; 
usually in these movies only the affluent get ghouls or spirits coming to 
visit. That's one example of the richness of "Stir of Echoes", which is as 
detailed in texture as a novel, and doesn't contain standard movie clichés 
like Tom taking a long time to realise the obvious, or keeping his 
experiences secret from his wife. Consider also the final shot, which is not 
just a cheap scare, but a remembrance of the implications of the story. I 
haven't read the Richard Matheson source material, and in fact perhaps I 
should stop reading books altogether. After all, most of the literary 
adaptations I have enjoyed this year have been based on things I haven't 
read. Then again, maybe this is just a wonderful movie.
 COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Ninth Gate, The (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Bromborough)
Released in the UK by UIP on June 2, 2000; certificate 15; 133 minutes; 
countries of origin France/Spain/USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Roman Polanski; produced by Mark Allan, Antonio Cardenal, Inaki 
Nunez, Roman Polanski, Alain Vannier.
Written by John Brownjohn, Roman Polanski, Enrique Urbizu; based on the novel 
"El Club Dumas" by Aturo Pérez-Reverte.
Photographed by Darius Kondjhi; edited by Hervé de Luze.
Chandeliers are grand, ornate and thoroughly ridiculous, and sometimes fall 
down on people. Roman Polanski's "The Ninth Gate" is like that -- a 
supernatural thriller and detective movie that begins by playing tricks with 
its genre and ends up playing one on the audience. It deliberately leaves us 
unsatisfied, but is silly and goofy and a whole lot of fun.
Johnny Depp stars as Dean Corso, a rare book dealer hired by a strange 
collector (Frank Langella) to track down a book entitled "The Nine Gates of 
the Kingdom of Shadows". Legend has it that its illustrations, when used in 
satanic ritual, can summon up Lucifer himself. Corso, in trying to find it, 
runs into one strange person after another, and we are reminded of such films 
as "The Big Sleep" and "Angel Heart", although "The Ninth Gate" is goofier, 
and the structure and details of the plot make it extremely predictable.
Until, that is, the last act, when the fire-and-brimstone conclusion we've 
been expecting doesn't happen, and there is a confusing final shot that 
leaves us wondering whether Corso has lost power over his soul, sold it, or 
gone to battle.
Polanski, the director, is manipulating us. He knows how to make a serious 
detective movie ("Chinatown"), tale of witchcraft ("Macbeth"), or movie about 
the Devil ("Rosemary's Baby") -- but he's decided to forget about that and 
have a little fun. The early scenes involve us with a subtle, odd sense of 
humour: they undermine the seriousness of the plot by focusing on ridiculous 
images like a light fixture a guy hung himself on; and by letting Depp skulk 
through the movie with an eyebrow raised, as he did in "Sleepy Hollow". Then 
the anti-climactic nature of the ending reveals that Polanski's chuckles 
extend to us, because he's toying with us just as surely as he is with the 
film noir genre. Odd, but not uninteresting.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Warner Bros on March 3, 2000; certificate 15; 115 
minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by David O. Russell; produced by Edward L. McDonnell, Charles Roven, 
Paul Junger Witt.
Written by David O. Russell; from a story by John Ridley.
Photographed by Newton Thomas Sigel; edited by Robert K. Lambert.
David O. Russell's "Three Kings" is the first war movie I have seen that 
takes the camera into an imaginary bullet wound to show it filling up with 
bile. What's more, the moment seems perfectly normal in the context of the 
film. This is a fast-talking, cheerfully deranged depiction of army 
intervention in Iraq, which plays with style, structure and tone in the 
dangerously excited manner of a fire-eating juggler.
The story takes place in 1991, just after the end of the Gulf War. In a camp 
of American soldiers who are rounding up prisoners and waiting to go home, 
Major Archie Gates (George Clooney) discovers an "ass map" -- a treasure map, 
that is, found between a captive's butt cheeks. Gates orders a goofy 
hillbilly, Private Conrad Vig (Spike Jonze), to take it out. "Can't I have a 
glove, Sir?" he asks. "No," Gates replies, "That's how the chain of command 
works."
Gates and Vig consult two reliable young comrades, muscle-bound family man 
Sergeant Troy Barlow (Mark Wahlberg) and firm, shrewd staff sergeant Chief 
Elgin (Ice Cube). Together the quintet deduce the location of the loot to be 
an Iraqi army bunker near Cordoba, and guess that it will be several million 
dollars worth of Kuwaiti gold bullion. Their plan: To steal it. If they get 
caught: They'll say they were on a legitimate mission to rescue their allies' 
property from the enemy.
Since we never see movie characters plan heists and then follow them through 
without a hitch, we know this scheme will somehow go wrong. Our heroes' 
obstacle comes when they're about to leave the village in which the 
gold-filled bunker is situated. Iraqi guards are making clear they plan to 
harm civilians, and it would be wrong to leave them to do so.
There is a scene of agonising effectiveness here, as the action goes into 
slow motion to mark the cease-fire's dissolution into chaos. A mother is shot 
in full view of her husband and children. Soldiers resume fighting. Watching 
this at a delayed pace accentuates the tension, the horror, and the reality 
of each bullet, and all we can do is sit there, watching, feeling helpless.
Of course, that's all the American soldiers can do for most of the time. 
George Bush may have urged Iraqi citizens to rise up against Saddam Hussein's 
evil regime, but he's not letting his troops help them, because the Gulf War 
wasn't about liberating people, and was fought to make sure Kuwait could keep 
supplying oil to the Western world. Most people already realise and are 
resigned to that, but "Three Kings" angrily indicts Bush for it, with a 
second half that is dramatic and political. The film surrounds Gates, Vig, 
Barlow and Elgin with hypocrisy and devastation as they attempt to get back 
to their base, fight off hostile fire, save the lives of refugees and salvage 
some bullion.
That's a little anticlimactic, as the opening chapters are full of 
brilliantly crude slapstick satire, and at times thereafter the film becomes 
inappropriately slowed down when accommodating its serious stuff. Russell, 
who wrote and directed, should have found some way to blend the different 
elements in less jarring fashion. It is creative to follow an elaborate 
practical gag about pretending to be Saddam with realistic footage of refugee 
orphans, but it isn't necessarily wise, because it means the audience is 
still laughing when we should be settling down for sober thought.
What "Three Kings" conveys brilliantly, throughout everything light and 
heavy, is the utter confusion of war -- in the opening words ("Are we still 
shooting?"), the disorganisation of the U.S. forces' barracks, and the mad 
dash to safety the film spends most of its time on. We can decipher what's 
going on during immediate moments, but the general experience is 
intentionally perplexing and dizzying. Ambiguous individual point of view 
shots contribute to this, as does unstable, screw-loose pacing.
Newton Thomas Sigel's cinematography is the most crucial element in putting 
us in the middle of the unpredictability. In the tradition of a lot of recent 
Hollywood war dramas, it's shaky and grainy, but its underdeveloped film 
stock is a much more original touch, making the frame extremely sensitive to 
light. There are huge contrast changes all the time, and the film seems to be 
REACTING to situations, and SEEING images, rather than creating them.
The four main actors work subtle wonders, too, performing in ways that 
balance each other's efforts nicely. Clooney has authoritative star power; 
Jonze, who has also done good work as a director, is pleasing in what is 
essentially a jester role; Wahlberg is charming and boyish; Cube reassures us 
that there's someone sensible in this motley crew.
As of yet, the only other theatrical motion picture dealing with the Gulf War 
has been Edward Zwick's "Courage Under Fire", from 1996. So it's amazing, 
when you think about it, that Russell has so soon found the courage to make a 
bizarre comedic commentary on the subject. Shame on Warner Bros for marketing 
it as a dumb action flick, in ads that juxtapose serious-sounding lines with 
explosions. They're shooting themselves in the foot, as fans of that sort of 
thing will be put off when they learn what the movie is actually about, and 
most other people will the alienated by the commercials. "Three Kings" 
deserves better treatment -- uneven patches notwithstanding, it's original, 
powerful, and very unexpected.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on March 10, 2000; 
certificate 15; 158 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Michael Mann; produced by Pieter Jan Brugge, Michael Mann.
Written by Michael Mann, Eric Roth; based on the "Vanity Fair" article "The 
Man Who Knew Too Much" by Marie Brenner.
Photographed by Dante Spinotti; edited by William Goldenberg, David 
Rosenbloom, Paul Rubell.
The tobacco industry is one of the most greedy and deceptive there is. All 
its major companies have covered up official research which proves their 
products are disease-causing fire hazards, marketed them to underage kids, 
manipulated levels of nicotine to promote addiction and lied about these 
actions in open court. Everyone is disgusted at its behaviour -- onlookers, 
customers and even employees.
A case in point is Jeffrey Wigand, a former smoker who once headed the 
research department of Brown & Williamson, the third biggest cigarette 
manufacturer in the USA. B&W fired him for shooting off his mouth about 
company policy after his employers kept ignoring his evidence on how to 
produce a safer smoke. And then it went to great pains to destroy his life, 
when it became apparent that he intended to blow the whistle on its official 
secrets.
Michael Mann's "The Insider" stars Russell Crowe as Wigand, tells his story 
from the moment he was fired, and for the most part remains faithful to the 
facts. At the start of the film he is a man who does not want to rock the 
boat, despite his important knowledge about his bosses' dirty tricks. He 
usually speaks his mind, but breaking his confidentiality agreement with B&W 
would cut off his severance payments and medical insurance.
He denies an interview request from Lowell Bergman (Al Pacino), an 
investigative reporter for the television news magazine "60 Minutes". Until, 
that is, B&W send him uncalled-for violent reminders to keep quiet, which 
include a bullet in his mailbox, e-mail death threats and up-front stalkers. 
Then Wigand, furiously angry, agrees to record the interview, in which he 
reveals damning facts about the perjury and illegal cover-ups his firm was 
involved in.
CBS, the channel that runs "60 Minutes", decides not to broadcast the 
footage, because their executives have been threatened with a B&W lawsuit for 
"tortious interference". Bergman's fight against this decision is passionate, 
and takes up the second half of the film, but Wigand is offended that it was 
made in the first place. His involvement with Bergman has broken up his 
marriage, and provoked B&W to cancel his financial benefits and orchestrate a 
smear campaign against him. He starts to drink, shout, hate; in short, his 
life goes to hell. 
But "The Insider" is not, as some reviews have stated, a character study of 
ambiguous American heroes. Nor does it make much of an impression as a tale 
of the struggles involved in investigative journalism. It involves both these 
things, yes, as well as elements of courtroom drama, but most critics are 
simply trying to find sophisticated ways of saying the movie isn't an attack 
on the tobacco industry, when that's exactly what it is. Every scene is 
haunted by the evil intimidation of Brown & Williamson: When Wigand's life is 
crumbling, when close relationships disintegrate, when Bergman's superiors 
are afraid to air his story, when court proceedings keep getting obstructed 
-- it's always obvious who's throwing the spanner in the works.
The news that big corporations use their influence destructively hardly 
surprises us (it's widely rumoured that the oil industry, for example, is 
just as bad as Big Tobacco). But we're still angered by it, and that's why 
"The Insider" works, unlike the Marie Brenner magazine article it's based on, 
which was interesting, but developed into a puzzle of facts and figures that 
was impossible to follow.
Mann, the director and co-writer, gets past this problem by organising the 
material in the manner of a slick Hollywood thriller. That's his forte -- he 
made "Thief", "Last of the Mohicans" and "Heat", all of which are acclaimed 
epic action pictures. Bergman's story, when told with their intensity and 
immediacy, becomes something we can easily get involved in. It's a pity that 
Mann is less interested by Wigand's (more attention-grabbing) plight. The 
developments in that character's life seem to be skimmed over in comparison 
to Bergman's; there's less of a structure to his tale.
Luckily, Russell Crowe gets across the point well enough with his startlingly 
brave acting. The physical side of his role involved putting on a dangerous 
amount of weight, wearing a grey wig and ageing make-up, and replacing his 
young Australian voice with the accent of a middle-aged man from Kentucky. 
Psychologically, he challenges us to admire Wigand's courage despite his bad 
temper, indecisiveness and shifty body language. Crowe always seems to be 
shaking a little, with eyes glaring and angry, and paranoid fingers fumbling 
-- but of course there's every justification for these nervous ticks.
This is great characterisation, and the way Crowe paints Wigand's breakdown 
incenses us at those who would seek to destroy his reputation. On that note, 
though, lies one of the significant problems I had with "The Insider", which 
is its unnecessarily dark portrayal of Mike Wallace, the presenter of "60 
Minutes". I understand the need for screenwriters to take dramatic license 
when adapting true stories, or to condense events to make them cinematic. But 
Wallace, who in reality fought alongside Bergman, is shown bowing to CBS 
corporate pressure for no other reason than to make Al Pacino look more 
heroic. This is a film that wants to discuss the importance of truth. Lies 
and hypocrisy are not the best way to kick off the debate.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Entertainment Distribution on April 21, 2000; 
certificate 18; 101 minutes; countries of origin Canada/USA; aspect ratio 
2.35:1
Directed by Mary Harron; produced by Chris Hanley, Edward R. Pressman, 
Christian Halsley Solomon.
Written by Mary Harron, Guinevere Turner; based on the novel by Bret Easton 
Ellis.
Photographed by Andrjez Sekula; edited by Andrew Marcus.
Patrick Bateman is someone Tom Wolfe might have come up with if he had 
written his books on acid. He's an arrogant suit from Wall Street obsessed 
with physical fitness, facial care products, designer clothing and expensive 
restaurants. And scoring cocaine. And misogyny. Oh, and he likes to mutilate 
people, and play around with their guts, too.
The character is the creation of Bret Easton Ellis, whose 1991 novel 
"American Psycho" was set amid the Manhattan yuppie scene of the late 1980s. 
The book was twisted, but it needed to be, because it had extreme things to 
say. Ellis saw the widespread obsessive egoism and greed of the Me Decade as 
dangerously sick, and his vision of its potential to produce vicious 
murderers makes a fair amount of sense. After all, any idiotic businessmen 
who made enough bucks could follow their every impulse and shit on whomever 
they wanted to, and their attitude was championed as fashionable.
Now "American Psycho" is a film directed by Mary Harron, with Christian Bale 
in the lead role. As in the source material, Bateman divides his time between 
working out, making lunch appointments, sitting around in his office and 
butchering fellow New Yorkers. Onscreen we see him stabbing a homeless man 
and a female acquaintance, decapitating a hooker with a chainsaw, blowing up 
a crowd of cops, chopping up one of his colleagues with an axe and telling us 
about numerous other crimes. Even when a private detective (Willem Dafoe) 
starts investigating the disappearances, though, Bateman never comes close to 
being caught. Why would anyone suspect a 'normal', standard, efficient young 
capitalist earner of criminal activity?
The killings in the story hammer home in a jarring manner the message of how 
inhuman Bateman and his ilk are; although his chums don't kill people or know 
that he's doing so, they do share his level of detachment from decent values. 
Most of the film illustrates this through black humour. In one scene, for 
example, a group of men use their business cards for a vanity contest, 
comparing them like cowboys showing off the sizes of their guns.
The problem with the comedy in the film is that Harron doesn't trust the 
material to be intrinsically funny, and has her actors deliver lines in 
broad, goofy tones, making clear they're in on the joke. That doesn't prevent 
us from laughing, but it does affect the satirical power of many moments -- 
we giggle mainly because the characters are talking in a preposterous manner, 
rather than because they're saying preposterous things.
Since almost every scene is performed in this silly way, the film is nowhere 
near as intense as the novel. If we laugh at the characters' paper-thin 
morals, that's the extent of our reaction; Harron doesn't let us give them 
enough thought to also be appalled by them. You could take the murders out of 
her "American Psycho" and it would be the same movie -- its purpose is to 
merely point at the vacant pomposity of the male yuppie, and ridicule it.
Still, on that level the movie works well. Although it is a missed 
opportunity (Ellis's angry expression of the madness of the situation was 
more affecting), it is at least an entertaining deflation of white-collar 
stuffed shirts, and those guys can be the most despicable of people. I see 
them all the time in bars and restaurants, thinking their suits make them 
mature, arrogantly raising their voices, telling stupid childish jokes to 
each other, rambling in stockbroker jargon that they think impresses 
onlookers. And now, whenever that happens, I can smile to myself that someone 
else in the vicinity will have probably seen this movie, and will be laughing 
inside at what morons it shows them to be.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Hanging Up (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Columbia TriStar on May 12, 2000; certificate 15; 95 
minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Diane Keaton; produced by Nora Ephron, Laurence Mark.
Written by Delia Ephron, Nora Ephron; based on the book by Delia Ephron.
Photographed by Howard Atherton; edited by Julie Monroe.
"Hanging Up" is not the worst movie I have ever seen, but it is the only one 
I can think of that made me want to pull out a gun and start shooting at the 
images onscreen. It's a horrible experience, as if somebody had discovered my 
pet peeves and decided to devote a whole film to winding me up. Although I 
own a cellphone and am acquainted with whiny women, they are both things I 
detest, and for emergencies only. Watching them for 95 minutes is not my idea 
of a good time.
The film is supposed to be the story of a man's family reacting to his 
descent into death. It's actually just an irritating bunch of phone 
conversations between three witless sisters, who might actually develop 
personalities if they cancelled their AT&T subscriptions and lived in the 
real world. Meg Ryan plays Eve, the one who stays by her father's hospital 
bed, deals with his eruptions of dementia, and calls up everyone else, trying 
to get them to visit him. Maddy (Lisa Kudrow), the youngest sibling, is an 
insecure little tramp who complains that nobody will take her seriously; she 
doesn't think it odd that at age 29 she was still dreaming of becoming a rock 
star, and in her mid-30s she expects she's going to be an actress. Georgia 
(Diane Keaton), the eldest, is smarmy, dishonest and lies about her personal 
life when it will bring her gain.
So much of "Hanging Up" takes place on the phone, with the annoying trio 
barking insipid platitudes down receivers, that when I left the cinema my 
ears were still ringing from clicks, beeps and dial tones. Perhaps this movie 
was inevitable, such is contemporary society's obsession with 
telecommunication. Delia and Nora Ephron, who wrote the screenplay, and Diane 
Keaton, the director, seem to think this presentation of people is normal, 
and that's rather sad.
Worse is the grating nature of the performances. Keaton plays her detestable 
character with the kind of glee that shoves right into our faces and makes us 
want to scream. Ryan is unconvincing, because she uses the same disorganised 
comic presence as in "When Harry Met Sally" and "Joe Versus the Volcano", and 
expects it to work when her character is supposed to be a cornerstone of 
emotional stability. As for Lisa Kudrow, well, she's a joke, who exudes 
stupidity from all of her phoney body, dead eyes, and flat, sarcastic whimper 
of a voice.
You know when you're on a crowded train, and you're wedged into the window 
seat when three other people need to sit in the same booth as you? "Hanging 
Up" is a lot like that, as long as the three people are vapid yuppie bitches 
whining and crying about their boyfriends and families into mobile telephones 
that play a little tune when they ring. This is a film that could get 
Gandhi's blood boiling. If it becomes your wife's favourite video, no sane 
jury will convict you of domestic abuse.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for End of the Affair, The (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Columbia TriStar on February 11, 2000; certificate 18; 
101 minutes; country of origin UK/USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Neil Jordan; produced by Neil Jordan, Stephen Woolley.
Written by Neil Jordan; based on the novel by Graham Greene.
Photographed by Roger Pratt; edited by Tony Lawson.
Graham Greene once said that he had to read aloud, because he found himself 
unable to read by the eye. No doubt his thoughts were screaming vociferous 
theological debates at each other too loudly for the man to concentrate. Many 
people find a clash between their religion and behaviour; few are so obsessed 
with the problem that they write about it as prolifically as he did.
"The End of the Affair", one of Greene's least well-known but most intensely 
personal novels, inspired by his own real-life dalliance with an American 
lady named Catherine Walston, is about how a pact with God brings misery to 
two of its characters by supplying them with a reason to end their adulterous 
love affair. The desires of their flesh are strong, but the partner who made 
the pact is too afraid to break it, and the other one becomes too frustrated 
to continue being loveable.
The man is Maurice Bendrix, a young novelist whose reputation is steadily 
growing, played in Neil Jordan's film adaptation by Ralph Fiennes. His lover 
is his neighbour Sarah Miles (Julianne Moore), the wife of civil servant 
Henry (Stephen Rea), an ineffectual chap who has never been much interested 
in engaging his bride in physical passion. Maurice and Sarah meet at a 
cocktail party thrown by Henry for his colleagues, and become drawn to each 
other mainly out of need -- the film is set in London during World War II, 
and neither of these people have companions for the cold, the silences or the 
air raids.
It is one of these raids which disturbs the course of their relationship. 
Maurice seems to have been crushed by rubble; Sarah panics, pleads with God 
to save his life, and says that if her wish is granted she will put an end to 
their seedy liaisons. Maurice turns out to be alive, and Sarah breaks contact 
with him.
The book, narrated by the Maurice character as a bitter "journal of hate", 
was quintessential Greene because it didn't have a clear idea of who God was, 
or if He even existed, but still threw strong anger at Him. And it was a 
fascinatingly tragic and pathetic drama because Maurice was using God as an 
excuse for the demise of something that could never have lasted. Affairs 
always deceive someone who won't stand to be deceived, and hence are doomed. 
Maurice refuses to face this, and lays the blame on friends, family, 
onlookers, Henry, Sarah and the Almighty.
The film's first hour is very good, capturing this tone of a poet slinging 
back whiskies as he tells a barman how sickening it is that the good times 
are over. Fiennes's face is unmoving, constricted, sour and angry. The 
surroundings are damp, ominous and dark; cold, lifeless streets plagued by 
rain act as the visual accompaniment to the harsh voice-over.
Such technical proficiency continues throughout, but at some point in its 
second half, Jordan's screenplay suddenly turns into a depressingly 
conventional story of forbidden love. Sarah decides she can't keep her 
promise to God, and her and Maurice reunite! When they are finally separated 
by her death, the movie's conclusion is the same as the novel's -- Maurice 
protesting against the merciless nature of God -- but his reasons are a lot 
less interesting. Sarah's promise is, quite rightly, the cornerstone of 
Greene's story, but it's rather irrelevant under Jordan. He just sees it as a 
handy plot device to cause the lovers' initial break-up.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Maybe Baby (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Redbus on June 2, 2000; certificate 15; 104 minutes; 
country of origin UK; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Ben Elton; produced by Phil McIntyre.
Written by Ben Elton; based on his novel "Inconceivable".
Photographed by Roger Lanser; edited by Peter Hollywood.
To see Ben Elton's "Maybe Baby" is to suffer one of the most embarrassing of 
things -- a comedian straining to be funny. Successful humour comes out 
naturally and clearly; it doesn't need to be underlined, shouted or propped 
up by outlandish gags. There is a scene in this movie where a guy is being 
read the results of a sperm test, which tell him that a percentage of his 
little tadpoles are sluggish. "Sluggish?!" he cries. "Couldn't they have 
figured out a better way of putting it, like 'relaxed'? Relaxed sperm!" When 
he's told that some are swimming in the wrong direction: "Hello?! They're in 
a plastic cup!!"
These same lines could be funny, if the guy was desperately muttering them to 
himself, as rambling thoughts. I can picture Woody Allen playing it like 
that. But Hugh Laurie, the actor onscreen, shouts and makes expressive 
gestures, as if playing to a sitcom laughter track. A lot of "Maybe Baby" is 
like that -- although on the surface the problem seems to be a cheesy 
screenplay, it's actually the delivery that's off. I kept imagining what the 
dialogue would sound like if spoken more calmly, and much of it would be 
witty, warm and funny. That is not a defence of writer-director Elton, but 
simply an observation. Comedy is a fifty-fifty balancing act of writing and 
performing, so to screw up even one of these is no small matter.
The story involves a thirtysomething married couple -- happy, well-off, but 
desperately in want of a child. Sam (Laurie) and Lucy (Joely Richardson) make 
love morning and night, in time slots carefully planned around Lucy's 
menstrual cycle, but months go by without any sign of pregnancy. So they 
begin to try In Vitro Fertilisation treatment; a long, frustrating process 
that alternately tests their wits and brings them closer together, what with 
its great need for patience and emotional commitment.
It would be fascinating to see a real movie about the subject of IVF. "Maybe 
Baby" is not it. We don't get answers to our obvious curiosities, such as 
whether or not Sam and Lucy get a kid, or how they react to that success or 
failure. Instead, the plot veers off into Sam writing a screenplay about his 
marriage, producing it in secret, and then having to heal Lucy's anger when 
she finds out. Even when Elton is concentrating on the IVF storyline, he 
seems more interested in the goofy side-characters it gives him a chance to 
introduce. Among them are a loudmouth Scottish film director (Tom Hollander), 
a burlesque Australian nurse (Dawn French), and an insane gynaecologist who 
sadistically dangles his instruments (Rowan Atkinson). None of these people 
are believable, and since this isn't a slapstick comedy, that means they're 
not funny.
As I've said, anything perceptive that might have existed in the dialogue is 
ruined by the over-the-top delivery, so ultimately we're left with nothing 
interesting but a couple of sexy shots of Joely Richardson. Elton based 
"Maybe Baby" on his novel "Inconceivable", which he has said was inspired in 
concept but not content on his own IVF experiences. His reason for not making 
it more autobiographical was that he felt it would be more personally 
comfortable to invent contrived humour for the story than use the truth. 
That's exactly the opposite of how comedians are supposed to work.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Warner Village (Birkenhead)
Released in the UK by UIP on July 7, 2000; certificate 15; 124 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by John Woo; produced by Tom Cruise, Paula Wagner.
Written by Robert Towne; based on a story by Ramon Braga, Ronald D. Moore; 
from the television series created by Bruce Geller.
Photographed by Jeffrey L. Kimball; edited by Christian Wagner.
"Mission: Impossible II" is not quite the equal of its predecessor -- Brian 
De Palma's 1996 adaptation of the hit TV show was a modern classic in action 
cinema -- but it is an effective spectacle of violence. It could have been 
better. It could also have been worse. Since we get to see Tom Cruise looking 
firm and strong, wearing cool clothes, fighting hard, working out genius 
plans and blowing stuff up, it's good enough for me.
And make no mistake about it, "Mission: Impossible II" is all about Cruise. 
Gone is the teamwork that figured so prominently both on television and in 
the original film: Cruise's character, Ethan Hunt, is now the centre of 
attention. Even though he's aided by two other secret agents who come out of 
retirement to help him, a woman who injects herself with poison to assist his 
cause, and a boss played by Anthony Hopkins, these people are pushed into the 
background to make the main man look that little bit more heroic.
As pretty much every review of the film has mentioned, this can't help but 
resemble James Bond. De Palma's cool white visuals and playfully complex plot 
have been replaced by exotic locations and a predictable tale of a turncoat 
agent hijacking a deadly chemical virus. Taut structure has been forgone in 
favour of long scenes with a love interest, and a big showdown in the bad 
guy's lair. Set-pieces have been lifted from "Mission: Impossible" such as 
Cruise's dangling from a ceiling to steal information, as well as trademarks 
like the rubber-mask disguises, but nothing that stops "Mission: Impossible 
II" from being a one-man show. 
It's a good one, though. The director, John Woo, is a god among action 
filmmakers. His techniques in movies like "Hard-Boiled" influenced Hollywood, 
then Woo himself moved to the States and started making pictures in which the 
style was a mixture of originality, ripping himself off, and ripping off 
America. You're assured an efficient summer thrill ride when a guy like that 
gets a project like this -- it has a great star, groundbreaking stunts, 
expensive effects, slow-motion, fast motion, repetition... so much showiness 
has been crammed into "Mission: Impossible II" that future film students will 
use it as a reference for action genre trends of the late 1990s.
Where can the "M: I" franchise go from here? I have a clear idea, although 
I'm not so sure that the same can be said for the studio. They have assigned 
Woo to direct a third picture, but I'm not keen on that idea, because it 
probably means we'll get a retread of this one. James Bond is allowed to 
repeat himself, but repeating his repetitions sounds boring as hell. The best 
thing to do is get a different established director to tackle each sequel. 
We've had De Palma and Woo -- wouldn't you like to see the attempts of 
Quentin Tarantino, Steven Spielberg, Martin Scorsese, George Lucas and Ron 
Howard? Keep the series going by making each new instalment a showcase for a 
great artist -- don't let it self-destruct in three movies.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on February 25, 2000; 
certificate 15; 140 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Anthony Minghella; produced by William Horberg, Tom Sterngerg.
Written by Anthony Minghella; based on the novel by Patricia Highsmith.
Photographed by John Seale; edited by Walter Murch.
CAST.....
Matt Damon..... Tom Ripley
Jude Law..... Dickie Greenleaf
Gwyneth Paltrow..... Marge Sherwood
Cate Blanchett..... Meredith Logue
Philip Seymour Hoffman..... Freddie Miles
Jack Davenport..... Peter Smith-Kingsley
James Rebhorn..... Herbert Greenleaf
Sergio Rubini..... Inspector Roverini
Philip Baker Hall..... Alvin MacCarron
For years Hollywood made films with black and white characters -- only 
recently has it realised that people are not so simple, and come in shades of 
grey. Heroes are more flawed these days than they were fifty years ago, and 
villains no longer sit twiddling their moustaches, giggling maniacally or 
stroking kittens. Anthony Minghella is one of the few filmmakers whose work 
goes even further. He doesn't just throw his characters a few ambiguous 
traits. He makes us respond to them in challenging ways.
Consider his Oscar-winner "The English Patient", which required us to 
sympathise with the passion and pain of a man who could be cold, selfish and 
cowardly. And now "The Talented Mr. Ripley", adapted from the first novel in 
a series by Patricia Highsmith, whose hero is a deceptive psychopath we fear 
but feel compassion for.
His name is Tom Ripley (Matt Damon), a bathroom attendant who is mistakenly 
believed to be a graduate of Princeton University by rich shipbuilder Herbert 
Greenleaf (James Rebhorn). Tom is only happy to play along; later, to another 
character, he will admit his greatest talents to be "telling lies, forging 
signatures, impersonating practically anybody."
Greenleaf thinks Tom was a classmate of his son Dickie (Jude Law), and 
persuades him to take an all-expenses-paid trip to Italy for the purpose of 
bringing the chap back to America. Dickie is living in Mongibello with his 
girlfriend Marge (Gwyneth Paltrow), spending his easy-going days lounging on 
the beach in pursuit of such epicurean delights as eating, drinking, 
screwing, sailing and saxophone-playing.
Tom ingratiates himself without difficulty, and has a great time living with 
Dickie and Marge, accompanying them on all their adventures. He's a yes-man, 
always smiling, wanting to be shown things; he makes Dickie feel important. 
But the rich brat gets fed up with this, and decides to toss Tom aside. "We 
should spend some time apart," he says. "You can be a leech! You bore me!"
Tom's response is to murder the man (who he had fallen in love with), assume 
his identity and use it to arrange a life for himself in Rome. He changes his 
appearance just enough to match Dickie's passport photo, checks into hotels 
under his name, buys things with his traveller's checks. It's better to be a 
fake somebody, he reckons, than a real nobody.
I expected "The Talented Mr. Ripley" to be one of those movies where we get 
some sort of dark glee out of the protagonist's villainous actions. And it 
could have worked well on that level, but Minghella's sincerity makes it 
something more compelling -- a torrent of conflicting emotions, like I 
suggested in my opening paragraphs. We share the love and anger Tom feels 
toward Dickie, because he is a selfish child who treats other people as 
playthings, but does become wonderfully warm when paying attention to 
someone. We agree with Dickie's eventual judgement that Tom is creepy and 
phoney, and yet it seems so unfair, because we sense Tom had never had any 
good fortune before meeting Dickie and Marge.
The biggest contradiction throughout the film is the one between our 
revulsion and seduction. Dickie's life is a grotesquely lazy one, and Tom 
living it as an impostor is downright evil, but then again, we can sort of 
see the attraction. Minghella has updated the setting of the novel by almost 
a decade, so the story now takes place in the late '50s, and coincides with 
Italy's 'dolce vita' period. Cinematographer John Seale captures its dreamy, 
boozy atmosphere with images of rich, luxurious colour, and it is, as Tom 
puts it, "one big love affair".
Even the earliest moments of this, though, have an underlying tension to 
them. Before meeting Dickie and Marge, Tom has introduced himself as Dickie 
to a cute young woman named Meredith (Cate Blanchett), so from the outset we 
know he's plotting something. Meredith forms a fascination with Tom that acts 
as an ironic counterpoint to his own obsession with Dickie, but her character 
is really in the movie to complicate the plot. A lot of its second half, you 
see, revolves around Tom keeping up both of his identities, and much tension 
is generated by this one idea, with Tom having to carry on creating lies to 
keep his head above water with different sets of people. The longer he goes 
without getting discovered, the more tense things get, because it's more 
improbable he can stay in control of such a labyrinthine web of deceit.
At the centre of this breathtaking thriller are some great performances. Law 
and Philip Seymour Hoffman are perfect as young, arrogant members of the idle 
rich, giddily staggering around with excited eyes, ecstatic at both the 
beauty of their surroundings and the knowledge they could buy them. Paltrow 
is uncomplicated, clear and honest as the one normal character in the 
picture, who eventually realises what Tom's up to, but can't get anyone to 
believe her. And then there is Damon, who struts with force and confidence 
when pretending to be Dickie, but plays Tom as someone constantly faking a 
nervous and plain front. That's pathetic, because it shows he's got no 
confidence in his own personality, and chilling, because he doesn't mind 
killing for somebody else's.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic 

Title
Review for Wo hu cang long (2000)
Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon     ***1/2
 Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Manchester City Centre)
Released in the UK by Columbia TriStar on January 5, 2001; certificate 
PG; 120 minutes; countries of origin China/Hong Kong/Taiwan/USA; aspect 
ratio 2.35:120
Directed by Ang Lee; produced by Li-Kong Hsu, William Kong, Ang Lee.
Written by James Schamus, Kuo Jung Tsai, Hui-Ling Wang; based on the 
book by Du Lu Wang.
Photographed by Peter Pau; edited by Tim Squyres.
"Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon" is a movie made with such grace, beauty 
and passion that the effect is somewhat disorientating. The filmmaker, 
Ang Lee, has made serious comedies ("Wedding Banquet", "Sense and 
Sensibility"), thoughtful dramas ("The Ice Storm") and even a Civil War 
epic ("Ride With the Devil"). Now he gives us a martial arts picture.
There are familiar elements throughout. The male hero, played by 
Oriental action star Chow Yun-Fat, is a legendary warrior on a 
passionate quest, attempting to recover his stolen sword and avenge the 
death of his master. He and the female hero (Michaelle Yeoh) are both 
experts at fighting, and there is much respectful talk about their 
hallowed craft. There are old scores brought up, new double-crossings 
perpetrated, instances of witchcraft and malevolence, displays of 
nobility and bravery -- and there is fighting.
We're used to seeing this kind of thing depicted with strained faces, 
accompanied by ridiculously melodramatic drum sounds, while both heroes 
and villains let out shrieks, and speak through bad dubbing tracks. 
That's not the sort of thing we'd expect from Lee, nor do we get it. 
"Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon" is directed with a tender, dramatic 
touch; when the characters talk about their beliefs, the words come out 
with the same sincerity and intensity as they do in the films of Akira 
Kurosawa. This is chop-socky material elevated to art.
Because the movie feels so much like a drama, I felt at arms length for 
a great percentage of its running time -- what I was getting at in my 
opening comment is that the distinguished nature of the style leads us 
to expect that the story is going to coil and spring in some grand, 
unexpected way. It is not until late on in the piece, when the structure 
has become clear, that we realise Lee's aim is simply to approach 
familiar material in an unfamiliar way, and we can relax and let the 
story reach us. A second viewing might help me appreciate the picture 
more, as might have a little less pre-release hype.
What strikes us instantly and unmistakably are the scenes of action, 
beautifully choreographed by the same guy who trained the actors in "The 
Matrix", and none of them created through CGI. There is, for example, a 
breathtaking early moment in which the actors chase each other along 
rooftops, gliding over ceilings and skipping down walls in almost 
musical rhythm. And a hypnotic battle in which two opponents drift past 
each other while gripping onto tree branches as they sway in the breeze. 
Spectacular.
COPYRIGHT 2001 Ian Waldron-Mantgani

Title
Review for Sunshine (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by Alliance Atlantis on April 28, 2000; certificate 15; 
180 minutes; countries of origin Austria/Canada/Germany/Hungary/UK; aspect 
ratio 1.85:1
Directed by István Szabó; produced by Adrás Hámori, Robert Lantos.
Written by Israel Horovitz, István Szabó; based on an original story by 
István Szabó.
Photographed by Lajos Koltai; edited by Michel Arcand, Dominique Fortin.
CAST.....
Ralph Fiennes..... Ignatz Sonnenschein/Adam Sors/Ivan Sors
Rosemary Harris..... Old Valerie
Rachel Weisz..... Greta Sors
Jennifer Ehle..... Young Valerie
Deborah Kara Unger..... Major Carole Kovacs
Molly Parker..... Hannah Wippler
James Frain..... Gustave Sonnenschein
David de Keyser..... Emmanuel Sonnenschein
John Neville..... Gustave Sors
Miriam Margolyes..... Rose Sonnenschein
Too many movies use the words "based on a true story" as an excuse for 
blandness. What they don't realise is that just because a story might be true 
doesn't make it interesting. Then again, sometimes the fact that a tale 
really happened might give it more importance or context. If only that had 
been the case with István Szabó's "Sunshine". The film is a silly fiction, 
but if it had really happened, well, that would have been something.
"Sunshine" follows three generations in a Hungarian family in three different 
times of revolution, dividing its three-hour running time evenly between each 
of its three stories. The first main character is Ignatz Sonnenschein, a 
lawyer in the late 19th Century who allows himself to change his Jewish name 
to Sors for purposes of conformity, marries a girl who had been raised as his 
sister, and finds that his work for the imperial government puts him in 
danger when communists come to power. Next we focus on his son Adam Sors, who 
allows himself to change his religion for purposes of conformity, marries a 
girl he hardly knows, has an affair with his sister-in-law, and finds that 
his heritage puts him in danger when the Nazis seem set to take over Europe. 
Finally comes the tale of Adam's son Ivan, who allows himself to get 
entangled in Stalinist persecutions, has an affair with an important army 
general's wife, and finds himself in danger during the Purges.
The connections are obvious: Each man somehow sells out, dives into 
troublesome romance and then winds up in over his head in a deadly political 
situation. What's more, Ignatz, Adam and Ivan are all played by the same 
actor, Ralph Fiennes. Subtle. The theory that the mistakes and sins of 
fathers can be repeated by their sons was present in the background of the 
"Godfather" and "Jean de Florette" movies, through vital situations and 
interesting characters. "Sunshine" thinks it's some kind of profound parable 
where the drama doesn't need to be fulfilling in itself. The people and 
plights are all just one-dimensional cardboard, existing to prove points. 
Nobody is convincing as a living, breathing person, and so we never care, and 
the point of the film is clear but carries no power.
Much of the movie has the silliness of "Legends of the Fall", without any of 
the gusto that made that movie enjoyable. When I saw it, people in the 
audience were laughing in key moments. Consider the amateurish attempts to 
mix the movie's own footage with old newsreel clips, just by developing bits 
in black and white. Or the exaggerated reaction shots of people rolling their 
eyes. Miriam Margolyes, as Ignatz's mother, breaks down crying so often that 
eventually the woman sitting next to me started doing a countdown whenever 
she appeared onscreen.
But even when the film does work on the level of performances and technical 
beauty, that doesn't change how simple-minded it is. Director Szabó's own 
"Mephisto" (1981) took its title from a fairly obvious parallel -- the one 
between its lead character and the story of "Dr. Faustus" -- but the content 
of the film didn't rely on it, and introduced it up front and kept it as a 
side-issue. "Sunshine" spends 180 minutes reiterating the same message, one 
that we've heard before and could be reminded of in a single line.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Warner Village (Birkenhead Conway Park)
Released in the UK by Entertainment Film Distributors on 24 March, 2000; 
certificate 18; 179 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson; produced by Joanne Sellar.
Written by Paul Thomas Anderson.
Photographed by Robert Elswit; edited by Dylan Tichenor.
"They f--k you up, your mum and dad. They may not mean to, but they do. They 
fill you with the faults they had and add some extra, just for you."
--Philip Larkin, "This be the Verse"
"If you refuse to let them go, behold, I will plague all your country."
--Exodus, Chapter 8 Verse 2
Both these quotes have meaning in relation to "Magnolia", a film of bold 
dramatic strokes from which the sins of fathers, sons and lovers come pouring 
onto the audience in a torrent of stifling intensity. In most scenes it is 
raining. By the end of the movie, this water will stop, to make way for a 
biblical plague.
Because the film is a tapestry of pathetic Los Angeles lives, epic in length 
and emotion, we could compare it to Robert Altman's "Short Cuts" (1993). But 
the work, by "Boogie Nights" creator Paul Thomas Anderson, is not that 
distant or darkly comic; it's a penetrating tragedy comprised of painful, 
sweaty close-ups. Jason Robards and Philip Baker Hall both play influential 
showbiz players at different stages in terminal cancer, who want to repent 
for being lousy husbands and parents. Robards's son is Frank TJ Mackey (Tom 
Cruise), a self-help guru who feigns confidence to give dangerous single men 
lectures on how to be effective misogynists. Hall's daughter, played by 
Melora Walters, is less skilled at masking her emotional scars. She uses 
cocaine and self-destructive sex to punctuate a life of screaming and weeping.
Robards produces and Hall presents a television game show entitled "What Do 
Kids Know?" One former star contestant, Donnie Smith (William H. Macy), has 
grown up into a dangerously insecure loser after being mistreated by his 
parents. A current one, Stanley Spector (Jeremy Blackman), looks like a 
candidate for the same path.
Around these characters are good people who understand the pain and want to 
help. John C. Reilly's widower cop will love and listen to Walters and Macy. 
Philip Seymour Hoffman, as Robards's nurse, may not succeed in reconciling 
the old man with anyone, but he can pray for and forgive him. Julianne Moore 
is like a one-woman Greek chorus representing everyone else in the cast; her 
character's role in the story is inconsequential, and her job is to bookend 
the scenes of others with tense looks, strained eyes and frantic breath. Like 
the film's constantly climactic music, she appears to be waiting for 
everything to come to a devastating halt.
Somehow hope and redemption shine through the film's closing moments, but 
even without it, "Magnolia" is compelling, not depressing, because Anderson 
moulds the material into a dreamlike flow. His camera spins and jolts with 
the freedom of the imagination, and transitions between situations are 
connected by audio-visual motifs. In one shot a pack of Camels sits on a 
bedside table. Cut to a pharmacy whose shelves are filled by nicotine 
replacement therapies. Bizet's "Carmen" is mentioned among one set of 
characters, and when we meet up with the next, an aria from the opera is 
blaring on the sound track.
Many contemporary films deal with loneliness, bitterness and despair -- 
"Short Cuts", "American Beauty" and "Happiness" are among the most acclaimed. 
"Magnolia" is better than all of them because its confidence and passion is 
so much louder. At times, it creates emotions so extreme it's like our hair 
is being pulled. But I don't go to the movies to feel unmoved.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Jesus' Son (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by Fox on July 7, 2000; certificate 18; 109 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Alison Maclean; produced by Elizabeth Cuthrell, Lydia Dean 
Pilcher, David Urrutia.
Written by Elizabeth Cuthrell, Oren Moverman, David Urrutia; based on the 
book by Denis Johnson.
Photographed by Adam Kimmel; edited by Stuart Levy, Geraldine Peroni.
What we have here is one of the year's most difficult films -- from a film 
critic's point of view. "Jesus' Son" is effortless to watch and hard to 
recall. That was fine when I was in the cinema, but now I'm at the keyboard, 
trying to convince you to see it, and all I can recall is loosely tied 
together events, sections that seem wandered into and inexplicable decisions 
by the characters.
But that is as it should be. This is the story of a young man who starts out 
a wanderer and then becomes a drug addict. Neither of these phases could be 
said to have reason or meaning. Still they are hypnotic to watch.
We know the guy only as 'FH'. You can pretty much guess what that stands for. 
It rhymes with "duck bed". He and some other anonymous buddies, who shuffle 
around a small Midwestern town in the early 1970s, drift through houses, bars 
and other unofficial hangouts. At one of these, FH (Billy Crudup) meets 
Michelle (Samantha Morton), a fascinating, quiet, petite girl who soon takes 
him to bed for surprisingly tender lovemaking. The morning after, he finds 
her injecting heroin at the breakfast table. He has never seen anyone shoot 
up before, but seems curiously unaffected by it, is enough of a vacuum to try 
it for himself, and soon finds that the narcotic is running his life.
Up to and after this development, "Jesus' Son" refuses to adopt traditional 
story structure. It is as meandering as many of the films from the time in 
which it is set, and indeed has even been photographed in the cheaply crisp 
and colourful style of a thirty-year old road movie. Moments of tragedy and 
comic absurdity all unfold at the same pace, side by side, seen by the idle 
camera as they would be through FH's glazed eyes. There is a harrowing 
split-screen comparison of two junkies' overdoses resulting in different 
fates. A Jarmuschian moment in a hospital where two stoned orderlies deal 
with a patient complaining of "knife in the head". Psychedelic drug fantasies 
wander onto the screen without warning. And yet not once does the sound 
design louden, the pace of the editing quicken, or the camera swerve.
I'm not exactly praising the discipline of the director, Alison Maclean, but 
more her courage to let the material move so stubbornly. The amazing thing is 
that we don't notice the rigid construction -- Maclean's tactics work 
wonderfully, and we get involved in FH's haze. Billy Crudup is well cast in 
the role -- he has the gift of keeping his body language technically lifeless 
while always looking like he's about to speak. He convinces us that FH is 
going nowhere, but still lets us hope for him; his eyes and mouth achieve a 
weird limbo that suggest they may spring into action at any time.
Strange, then, that the third act of "Jesus' Son" doesn't work. This portion 
of the picture is easy to remember, because in boring us, it breaks the 
hypnotic spell of the earlier passages. The screenwriters try to let fresh 
air run into the story, as FH finds redemption; but Maclean keeps up the 
quirky, cloudy ambience. FH's life starts to flow, but the narrative doesn't, 
and it feels wrong to see the film's closing events portrayed with a lack of 
focus, because in them FH finally opens his eyes.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by UIP on March 17, 2000; certificate 15; 112 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Spike Jonze; produced by Steve Golin, Vincent Landay, Sandy 
Stern, Michael Stipe.
Written by Charlie Kaufman.
Photographed by Lance Acord; edited by Eric Zumbrunnen.
When I first heard the premise of "Being John Malkovich", it was hard to 
accept the reality that one day such a film would be made, and I would be 
able to sit and watch it. Now I've seen it twice -- once last November, at 
the Stella Screen Film Festival, and again this week, at the dawn of its 
general release. But I still haven't quite got my head round it. If I'm not 
giving it four stars, perhaps one of the reasons is that I need to see it a 
few more times before its full force really sinks in.
The movie is like a walk through a long maze of rooms, where each new door 
provides a hilariously bizarre payoff to the last. Consider these opening 
scenes. We meet Craig Schwarz (John Cusack), a scruffy street puppeteer who 
doesn't make much money because his shows are too blasphemous and carnal. His 
wife Lotte (Cameron Diaz) encourages him to get an office job until 
marionette work starts to pay; she's raising a chimp, and needs some serious 
cash. Craig becomes employed as a file clerk on floor seven-and-a-half of a 
New York City skyscraper. (The ceilings are very low.) The boss (Orson Bean) 
is a 105-year old pervert obsessed with carrot juice, and his secretary (Mary 
Kay Place) is a paranoid deaf flirt. Even more odd is a hole in the wall of 
Craig's office, which turns out to be a portal into the mind of 
world-renowned actor John Malkovich. It can suck people into the man's brain 
for fifteen minutes and then spit them out onto a ditch on the side of the 
New Jersey Turnpike.
Craig's co-worker Maxine (Catherine Keener) is determined to exploit the 
discovery. She takes out a classified ad and sells tickets. The next stages 
of the plot involve the other ways she uses the situation, and Malkovich's 
discovery of what's going on. I don't want to reveal too much; this is just 
the set-up, and the movie keeps unfolding with eccentric developments and 
devices, which are so delightful because they seem to emerge out of a 
perfectly logical progression. Every event leads to the next quite 
reasonably, and the screenwriter, Charlie Kaufman, gives each one a different 
flavour. In one scene near the beginning of the movie, for example, we're 
laughing at the outrageousness of Craig's puppet show. After that enterprise 
fails, and he gets his job on floor seven-and-a-half, the awkward visuals 
inspire giggles. Later there will be clever celebrity satire, when Craig 
figures out how to control Malkovich's body and turns him into a famed 
puppeteer, and we see a TV documentary featuring stars gushing over his 
talents with ludicrous hyperbole.
Spike Jonze, who directed, brings the twisted turns of his picture to life by 
shooting them in dark, dramatic tones with a subtle hand-held camera. It's 
close enough to documentary style to make things somehow plausible, a feeling 
that is encouraged by the actors, who take things seriously and play their 
roles with sincerity. That attitude, as I'm always saying, is necessary for 
comedy to work properly; it's the audacity of the film's situations that 
creates laughter. "Being John Malkovich" has an exciting enough gimmick, in 
that it has its title figure playing a supernatural version of himself. It's 
even more extraordinary to show people entering his mind (including himself), 
developing and acting on sexual attractions within it, and using it as a 
vessel for re-writing history and enjoying everlasting life.
The profound skill of Malkovich's performance doesn't hit our conscious mind 
until after we leave the cinema. As most reviews have pointed out, he creates 
a distinctive character out of his own pompous image, but his more 
complicated scenes are those in which he's been inhabited by other people. 
His adoption of their mannerisms is so committed that we forget he's acting. 
We just believe it. Malkovich is the man onscreen, but we think we're 
watching Cusack, or whoever, walking around in his body.
I am rambling. Exciting films will make me do that. Take it as a strong 
recommendation, and not a sign that I need to take writing classes. And when 
you see "Being John Malkovich", remember to concentrate hard, as paying 
attention to its small details turns out to be very rewarding. Listen 
carefully for names of companies, a mention of a plank of wood, and Orson 
Bean's explanation of why a certain journey cannot be taken after a certain 
deadline. Intriguing? Good.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Wonderland (1999/I)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by UIP on January 28, 2000; certificate 15; 109 minutes; 
country of origin UK; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Michael Winterbottom; produced by Michelle Camarda.
Written by Laurence Cordiat.
Photographed by Sean Bobbitt; edited by Trevor Waite.
There is a school of thought that believes striving for reality in art is not 
a worthwhile pursuit. I've never understood why; we live in reality, we 
connect with it, it's exciting. Think of all the types of situations you find 
yourself in every week -- there'll always be some forms of happiness, 
sadness, expectation, disappointment, serenity, tumult, calm and anger. Life, 
to use a horrible cliché, dear friends, is an emotional roller coaster!
"Wonderland" is glorious proof of that, a film of scruffy beauty and 
spellbinding power, which seems constructed to capture the appeal of 
eavesdropping. That pastime is involving, of course, because of our 
instinctive fascination with humanity; this movie uses the same hook, diving 
into the lives of several Londoners, all of whom are connected by family 
ties, but are at different stages of their lives and have different 
occupations.
Nadia (Gina McKee) is an attractive but lonely waitress, who places a lot of 
personal ads but allows herself to get upset every time she goes on a date. 
One of her sisters, Molly (Molly Parker), is married and pregnant; the other, 
Debbie (Shirley Henderson), is raising her son alone. Their parents are 
Eileen (Kika Markham) and Bill (Jack Shepherd), two pathetically unhappy 
people who mope around the house, and occasionally cringe; because of barking 
dogs, broken appliances, boredom or simple fear of leaving the house.
We also meet up with partners and ex-partners, friends, acquaintances, 
neighbours, estranged relatives, colleagues... "Wonderland" never announces 
itself as a definite study of anything in particular, which gives it the 
freedom to roam around, to spy on whomever's interesting.
The director, Michael Winterbottom, shoots everything in a grainy, hand-held, 
almost camcorder style which makes events seem imparted to us from the inside 
out, rather than staged and shot. It's as if invisible camera crews had been 
ceaselessly exploring London. It's essential to the sense that we're watching 
real people who aren't aware of our presence.
This could have come across as solemn and grimy, like any of those pathetic 
TV documentaries that follow losers around their places of work and play. But 
in between the quiet, sober scenes are astounding sequences where the camera 
submerges in neon light, the editing plays around with cutting and speed, and 
Michael Nyman's grand score soars on the soundtrack. The whole movie uses 
London as a backdrop, letting us unconsciously absorb it; these grand musical 
moments explicitly rejoice in the city's strange beauty, and announce that 
the film is not scrutinising life, but gazing at it in wonderment.
So music is an important tone-setter in "Wonderland" -- but it's always kept 
for these side-moments, and never interferes with the drama. Scenes do not 
follow typical Hollywood constructions; there isn't a little climax every 
five minutes, characters don't subtly recap their situations to each other to 
let the audience know what's going on. Everything plays out at a realistic 
pace, and we get our bearings by picking up on mood, tone, emotions. 
Winterbottom, his actors, and even his extras, have a knack for capturing the 
way conversational rhythms actually do sound -- in homes, hairdressers' shops 
and pubs; on dates, the phone, and everywhere else the story goes.
And that is why this beautiful film has been made. It is a devoted record of 
modern human behaviour. I dreaded that there would be some hugely 
inappropriate surprise plot development near the ending, but no -- 
Winterbottom and screenwriter Laurence Cordiat know that most of us don't end 
a typical weekend by stumbling into life-changing experiences. "Wonderland" 
is such an acute observance of people that it makes us confront our essential 
feelings about our fellow man. And to any foreigners out there, wondering 
what it's like to be in Britain -- just take a look at this movie.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, The UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odoen (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on April 7, 2000; certificate 15; 126 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Stephen Soderbergh; produced by Danny DeVito, Michael Shamberg, 
Stacey Sher.
Written by Susannah Grant.
Photographed by Ed Lachmann; edited by Anne V. Coates.
It's astounding, how many of us turn into lawyers when we get wrapped up in 
cases. I remember the Louise Woodward affair, for example, when I knew all 
the evidence from the courtroom pictures on TV, and was able to reel off 
detailed arguments crushing people who had just looked at her and assumed she 
was guilty. Passion about justice is what makes people consider law careers; 
it chills me when I see sell-outs trying to condemn obviously innocent 
people, or using dishonest tactics to help the guilty.
Stephen Soderbergh's "Erin Brockovich" is a brilliant story of anger turning 
into courtroom skills; a David versus Goliath-style exposé in the great 
tradition of "Silkwood", "A Civil Action" and "The Insider". At its centre is 
a woman with no judiciary training or expertise, whose mind was not 
complicated with red tape or histories of statutes, and whose discoveries and 
simple logical interpretations helped small-time lawyers win one of the 
biggest lawsuits in American history.
Her name, of course, is Erin Brockovich (Julia Roberts), and when we meet her 
in the opening scenes of this film, she's just a struggling single mother who 
has failed to win a personal injury settlement. Soon after, she hustles her 
way into a filing job at the firm of her solicitor. The boss, Ed Masry 
(Albert Finney), objects, but Erin makes her services hard to refuse: "I need 
a job. Don't make me beg. If it doesn't work out, fire me."
When handling the real estate documents of a town in California, Erin notices 
something odd -- they all include medical records. Researching this further, 
she stumbles on the information that the area's water supplier, Pacific Gas & 
Electric, has been using a dangerous chemical known as 'hexavalent Chromium 
3' in their pipes. 'Chromium 3' can penetrate the body to cause pretty much 
any illness, including all forms of cancer.
What's especially horrific is that PG&E knew about the hazards of their water 
and misinformed its customers that chromium was good for them. The people 
took the company's word, even when they all started to get sick, until Erin 
Brockovich revealed her findings, and used her common touch to encourage the 
folks to stand up and take legal action.
Brockovich is not always a likeable character. At the start of the movie, 
when no job interviewers will look past her lack of a resumé or 
qualifications, her feeling of victimisation is preposterous. She seems to 
think anyone who isn't stuck in the poverty trap must be some sort of snob. 
And she displays gross arrogance when defending her wardrobe, which is made 
up of mini-skirts, tight boob tubes and high-heeled boots. "As long as I have 
one ass instead of two," she tells Masry when he points out that his office 
has a dress code, "I'll wear what I god damn well please."
But none of these flaws take away from her achievement, which is that she 
worked hard, taught herself some tough skills, became a great friend and 
advocate for victims of an abominable crime, and managed to raise a family at 
the same time. This is one of Roberts's most impressive performances, her 
best since "Pretty Woman" (1990), because she really does look affected by 
the pressures her character has to cope with. She allows herself to be 
vulnerable, with a voice that can quiver and stumble. She doesn't always have 
the answers, and could break down at any minute. There are one or two 
irritating episodes of grandstanding, where she rattles off snappy, heroic 
speeches that probably took the screenwriter hours to write; but that's kind 
of obligatory, and I'm just glad that such moments don't dominate the film.
"Erin Brockovich" is not necessarily better than the films I previously 
mentioned, but has advantages over each of them in one way or another. It's 
more fast-paced and accessible than "Silkwood", angrier about its subject 
matter than "A Civil Action" and less sidetracked than "The Insider". I'm 
starting to love director Soderbergh's new visual style, too, which he also 
used in "Out of Sight", and mixes the colour palette and star power of big 
studio movies with the documentary camera and quiet pacing of realistic 
independents. Sounds distracting. But it's oddly compelling.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by UIP on January 28, 2000; certificate 15; 105 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Bruce Beresford; produced by Leonard Goldberg.
Written by Douglas S Cook, David Weisberg.
Photographed by Peter James; edited by Wark Warner.
"Double Jeopardy" wants us to be amazed at the ingenuity of its gimmick, and 
enthralled by the emotion of its story. But the gimmick doesn't make any 
logical sense and the drama has all the power of a soppy TV movie. All that 
remains is an unremarkable thriller plot, which moves dully and mechanically 
toward a foregone conclusion.
Ashley Judd stars as Libby Parsons, an affluent young wife and mother who, 
while on a boating trip, wakes to find that her husband Nick has gone 
missing, and her cabin is covered in blood. There is a knife on the scene. 
There is no sign of anyone else's presence. Libby is convicted of Nick's 
murder and sent down.
While in prison, Libby discovers over the phone that Nick (Bruce Greenwood) 
is still alive, having faked his own death. So she behaves well, gets 
released on parole and determines to track her villainous spouse down, to be 
able to clear her name and get her son back. She steals a car from her parole 
officer, a sullen ex-law professor named Travis Lehman (Tommy Lee Jones), 
then dashes across America on her search. She feels comfortable about how to 
handle Nick when she finds him, because of something she's been told by a 
fellow jailbird: Under the 'double jeopardy' clause of the US constitution's 
fifth amendment, nobody can be convicted twice for the exact same crime -- so 
Libby can kill her husband and the law can't touch her for it.
Yes, this is the gimmick I was referring to, and it's not half as clever as 
the screenwriters seem to think. Since Nick is has been pronounced dead, you 
see, Libby would officially be killing someone else, and could of course be 
convicted. Besides, she would have to serve the remainder of her life 
sentence for violating her parole conditions -- they do not allow her to 
leave the state in which she resides or own a weapon of any kind, let alone 
get away with all the destruction of property she perpetrates over the course 
of her country-wide trek.
Travis is supposed to be chasing her all the while, but "Double Jeopardy" 
never develops into an effective game of cat-and-mouse, because we see very 
little from the pursuer's point of view. Most scenes just show Libby getting 
a little closer to finding Nick, then almost getting caught by Travis and 
having to scarper. We're supposed to be engaged by Libby's desire to find her 
son, but I don't know why -- although the film's opening passages do indeed 
show her enjoying maternal pastimes, they come across as the typical 
calm-before-the-storm moments that are present in every Hollywood thriller, 
rather than something for us to get passionately wrapped up in.
Judd holds her own rather well as the film's heroine, creating body language 
tough enough to convince us she's really survived an ordeal, yet preserving 
the tender gaze of a caring parent. Jones is okay, too, but he's played the 
same role before; in "The Fugitive", which was a great thriller, and its 
sequel "U.S. Marshals", which was certainly not. "Double Jeopardy" ranks 
somewhere in between those two films -- it's not amazing or annoying, just a 
pretty well put-together popcorn flick that's impossible to care a damn about.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, The UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Abre los ojos (1997)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by Redbus on February 25, 2000; certificate 15; 119 
minutes; country of origin Spain; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Alejandro Amenábar; produced by Fernando Bovaira, José Luis 
Cuerda.
Written by Alejandro Amenábar, Mateo Gill.
Photographed by Hans Burmann; edited by Maria Elena Sainz de Rozas.
Being tickled is horrible as well as enjoyable, but worth it for that moment 
of relief when the tickler finally stops. Alejandro Amenábar's "Open Your 
Eyes" is like that. The film involves us in one man's private hell, as his 
life falls apart and his understanding of why keeps lessening; but by the 
time it's over, and he gets an answer, we're so glad to stop holding our 
breath we leave grinning.
It's hard to describe the film's premise without spoiling any surprises. 
Eduardo Noriega plays César, who we first meet in a high-security psychiatric 
facility, trying to convince a psychiatrist that he is not guilty of whatever 
crime he's been accused of, and telling the doctor all he remembers of recent 
months. César was a promiscuous cad, we learn, who was involved in a car 
accident which left him horribly disfigured and bitterly angry.
His vile temper strained his friendships with best buddy Pelayo (Fele 
Martínez) and love interest Sofía (Penélope Cruz), until, César remembers, 
plastic surgeons managed to repair his face. His life started to get better, 
but then he suffered memory loss, saw people's faces change into those of 
others, and experienced various other weird happenings.
What was, and is, going on? Is César mad, or is somebody playing an elaborate 
prank? Is anything real? And of what significance is the cryptic Mr. 
Duvernois (Gérard Barray)? "Open Your Eyes", originally titled "Abre Los 
Ojos", involves and entangles us with these urgent questions until we DEMAND 
an explanation. It's been quite a while since I've seen a movie mystery, but 
this is clearly a good one.
Amenábar, the director, occasionally takes us inside César's dreams, but 
mostly relies on the screenplay's drama to be surreal enough, shooting his 
picture without a lot of flashy tricks. This is a good tactic, because it 
draws us in more realistically than a film like "The Matrix", which was more 
fun for style than story.
The performances, too, walk the line between the mundane and the strange. 
Noriega, Cruz, Martínez and Najwa Nimri speak and carry themselves fast and 
slow, confidently and cautiously. It's odd, and yet not odd, and certainly 
hard to describe... I guess it's intended that way.
"Open Your Eyes" is better than "The Sixth Sense", another recent film with 
an odd feel and surprise ending, which got great reviews, huge revenues and 
six Oscar nominations. I thought that movie was a con, purporting to be about 
one thing, making us wait for that thing's payoff, then pulling a stupid 
trick out of its hat with the hope of dazzling us. "Open Your Eyes", from 
very early on, takes unexpected turns, makes seemingly impossible twists and 
draws us into a confusing puzzle. When we realise what the score is, and 
everything slots into place, it's exactly what we've been waiting for.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Pathé on May 19, 2000; certificate 15; 97 minutes; 
country of origin USA; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Sofia Coppola; produced by Francis Ford Coppola, Julie Costanzo, 
Chris Hanley, Dan Halsted.
Written by Sofia Coppola; based on the novel by Jeffrey Eugenides.
Photographed by Edward Lachman; edited by James Lyons, Melissa Kent.
As I walked out of "The Virgin Suicides", confused, and depressed about my 
confusion, a fellow member of the audience, whose girlfriend had walked ahead 
to the bathroom, struck up a conversation with me.
    "A bit strange, that, wasn't it?" he began.
    "I didn't get it," I replied.
    "Don't think it went down well. Not sure what it was about."
    "No, me neither. I've read the book..."
    "Was that a lot different?"
    "Not exactly, but... it was more metaphorical... this, I just didn't get 
it."
And I really didn't. I was glad to see that my view was shared; I'd 
considered that maybe my knowledge of the source material was distracting me, 
but perhaps that wasn't the problem at all. "The Virgin Suicides" is haunting 
in its performances, and engaging in its parts, but is also unbelievably 
bewildering, and not in the way it intends to be.
The setting is suburban America, 1975. Cecilia Lisbon (Hanna Hall), a 13-year 
old daughter of a boring maths teacher (James Woods) and a strict homemaker 
(Kathleen Turner), kills herself by jumping from her bedroom window. There 
are four other siblings in the household: 14-year old Lux (Kirsten Dunst), 
15-year old Bonnie (Chelse Swain), 16-year old Mary (A.J. Cook) and 17-year 
old Therese (Leslie Hayman).
The neighbourhood lads are fascinated by these beautiful creatures, and a 
grown-up version of one of them narrates the movie, which depicts the year 
following Cecilia's death. The boys try to gauge the girls' emotions, mix 
with them, judge what's going on in their household. And when the event 
suggested by the title happens, it is they who discover the corpses. 
As a novel by Jeffrey Eugenides, "The Virgin Suicides" was about men who had 
not been able to come to terms with growing up. The Lisbon sisters were 
simply emblems of an adolescent male illusion of perfection, and in wondering 
why they had ended their lives, the flustered, elegiac narrator was really 
trying to figure out what happened to childhood innocence.
At times, Sofia Coppola's film adaptation seems to be trying to recapture 
that sense of confusion, mystery and loss. The voice-over narration, 
beautifully delivered by Giovanni Ribisi, speaks of "having pieces of the 
puzzle, but not being able to put them together" and "arguing about it 
still". But the movie contradicts this by unfolding like a straight drama, 
and seeing the girls too clearly as real people. It spends more time in the 
Lisbon household than it does with the boys, even though it wants to keep the 
Lisbon girls a mystery, and see things from the boys' point of view.
I can't quite give the movie a negative review, because I do concur with the 
critical consensus that Coppola has made an impressive directorial debut. Her 
most famous previous work was as an actress in "The Godfather, Part III", 
where she wasn't terribly good. "The Virgin Suicides" reveals her control 
over other performers, and strong ability to evoke a sense of time and place. 
I just don't think it works as an enigmatic mood piece. It wants to wonder 
about events, and yet show them onscreen as well. What's going on?
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website at 
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Cradle Will Rock (1999)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Cornerhouse (Manchester)
Released in the UK by Buena Vista International on April 12, 2000; 
certificate 15; 134 minutes; country of origin USA; aspect ratio 2.35:1
Directed by Tim Robbins; produced by Jon Kilik, Lydia Dean Pilcher, Tim 
Robbins.
Written by Tim Robbins.
Photographed by Jean Yves Escoffier; edited by Geraldine Peroni.
Tim Robbins's "Cradle Will Rock" has many qualities that make us want to like 
it -- it's ambitious, left-wing, and rich in photography, with a great cast, 
flamboyant characters, and an interesting setting. But after it's thrown 
itself into its situation, and sniffed around with a lot of style, it comes 
out without finding what it was looking for. Although I'm tempted to ignore 
the movie's failings and recommend it for its politics alone, what would be 
the point? Liberals don't need to see it to confirm their beliefs, and 
conservatives are probably beyond hope.
The "(almost) true" story takes place in the 1930s. One of President 
Roosevelt's schemes to rebuild America was the Federal Theatre Project, 
intended to employ artists and provide free entertainment for the public. 
Unfortunately it was formed in a time of heated paranoia about Communism, 
when Republicans were behaving in a manner that would later be repeated more 
famously by Joseph McCarthy. The climate of witch-hunting was so ridiculous 
that the Theatre Project was in danger no matter how benign its productions 
were. At one point we learn that a children's pantomime called "The Eager 
Beaver" was accused of being an allegory about proletarian revolution.
While suspicious snitches try to get the theatres in legal trouble, Orson 
Welles (Angus Macfadyen) and John Houseman (Carl Elwes) decide to provoke 
them, by putting on a play called "The Cradle Will Rock", whose writer is a 
gay Communist sympathiser, Marc Blitztein (Hank Azaria). The script is said 
to deal with taboo themes and promote anarchistic ideas. What a stir it 
should cause!
And does. The film's many characters -- white and blue-collar, male and 
female, poor and rich, artistic and philistine -- all find themselves somehow 
arguing about it, one side of the fence or another. At the height of the 
controversy, a judicial committee sends armed guards to close the playhouse 
in which the performance is scheduled. FDR would no doubt disapprove, and 
there is protest, and a way found around the upset, but none of that is the 
point -- the mere fact that a development like that can happen in the freest 
country in the world is shocking.
The movie is exuberantly performed, and although the actors' loud, jumpy 
movements and self-consciously put-on accents often annoy us, they just as 
frequently create delicious humour, when their characters are caught up in 
the topsy-turvy atmosphere of collapsing sets, childish arguments and 
ludicrous obstacles. But somehow "Cradle Will Rock" doesn't quite work. I 
don't think it's that the comedy undermines the drama; the problem is that 
the picture is so epic it feels like it's trying to say more than it does. 
Robbins, who wrote and directed, probably intended a parable about the value 
of freedom in general. All he's given us is a tale about a show causing a 
fuss.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
Please visit, and encourage others to visit, the UK Critic's website, which 
is located at http://members.aol.com/ukcritic

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
Rated on a 4-star scale
Screening venue: Odeon (Liverpool City Centre)
Released in the UK by Pathé on June 30, 2000; certificate U; 85 minutes; 
country of origin UK; aspect ratio 1.85:1
Directed by Peter Lord, Nick Park; produced by Peter Lord, Nick Park, David 
Sproxton.
Written by Karey Kirkpatrick.
Photographed by Dave Alex Riddett; edited by Mark Solomon.
Ginger has been taken to the shed. There lies Mrs. Tweedy's new machine -- 
where chickens go in, and pies come out. Rocky runs in to save her, and 
together they must dodge chutes, chopping blocks, mincers, gravy squirters, 
pastry cutters and an oven.
This is an amazing moment in "Chicken Run", the first animated feature to be 
co-directed by Nick Park of "Wallace and Gromit" fame. The plot involves the 
escape attempts of chickens on Tweedy farm, where the lady of the house has 
decided to ditch egg production and focus on selling meat. If everything had 
been in the same vein as the scene above -- vital to the characters, true to 
their nature, staged excitingly -- then the movie might live up to its ad 
campaign, which hypes it as the latest kiddie flick to revolutionise the 
genre. It doesn't, and isn't even a very good film.
The chickens hold meetings in Hutch 17, there is a Cooler King and a 
hyperactive Scot, and a character played by Mel Gibson at one point shouts 
"Freedom!". But references to "Stalag 17", "The Great Escape", "Braveheart" 
and countless other pieces of pop culture feel forced, because they're 
stuffed into scenes without any thought, like a desperate attempt to make the 
humour hip. "The Simpsons" satirises pop culture with subtlety; "Chicken Run" 
feels like "Scream 3" for primary-schoolers.
That might be less irritating if the movie worked on some basic level. "Toy 
Story" allowed us into the world of toys, "Babe" into that of animals -- so 
long as we suspended disbelief enough to accept toys coming to life or 
different species of beasts communicating with each other. The creatures in 
this picture can read words, write maps, sew, conduct detailed medical 
examinations and perform amazing feats of engineering... so what's the point? 
Is there any interest or suspense in watching poultry act human, when there 
is no logic or limitation to their reality? The climax sees them escape by 
building a plane. Go figure.
Small tots will enjoy "Chicken Run" for its visual delights. The Claymation 
process here has advanced significantly from the "Wallace and Gromit" days -- 
it now involves a different form of shooting, and models built around 
detailed synthetic skeletons. For older children and adults, it's thin soup. 
Watching chickens behave like people, even if they have been brought to life 
with fluid dimensionality, is like watching kids dress in their parents' 
clothes -- cute and amusing for about five minutes, and then you just wish 
they'd find another game to play.
COPYRIGHT(c) 2000 Ian Waldron-Mantgani
http://members.aol.com/ukcritic
